<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID de5e316d-532d-38cc-8417-10e22cddcabb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
with the economic development,the air of the earth is worse and worse .the trees and the
other green piants are too weak to provid us with oxygen and take in carbon .In order to hold
on the wonderful life ,people star to care the environment and pay more and more attention
to low-carbon life .Only live in a low-carbon life can make some difference for our conditions.
When we walk in street，we can see the leaves of trees are fuull of dirt.When we stand near
the river ,smelly air our noses will catch.When the winter is coming,we have no the same cold
sense as before.what do such bad things to our environment ,the answer is "us".We look for the
achievement of economy and take our environment for granted.we must change.Firstly,we still
hope live in a clear environment ,.Secondly,we have no power to steal the beautiful nuture from
our generations. Finally ,for health,for beauty,for permanence or for others whet ever ,we should
live a low-carbon life.
To improve the environment is different,but we still can do many for it.How to live a low-carbon
life?For one,it is easy.Do not usy one-off user,when we are in market ar eat outside. Plant some
flowers in our family .Turn off the water or light swift when we needn't.Take shower instead of bath.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 47cf09a3-6ce9-37a7-86c3-e936ec4453b3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
We all know that the resource in the earth is decressing.Human being face for series resource problem.So save the resource become more and more important,it's not only for country,but also for everyone in the world.The low-carbon life is a great way to save our resource.
Low-carbon life means that we should against for wasting,even give up some active waste lots of power.Today,more and more peope insist low-cabon life and choose this life sytle.It's really a good news to the earth.
Low-carbon life is not only important for the development of human being,but also for the enveronmen.CO2 would incress the tempurature of the earth,it would destroy the balance of life.
Low-carbon life is no far from us,anyone can do this.We can choose bus but cars,we can control our air-conditonal to work less,we can turn up the light when we leave.We should admire that we have duty to do somethings for our home---the earth,and we should choose low-cabon life to make our world better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2eb24ff2-ffc7-3efa-a023-cc53445378a8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Since the industrial revolution improving our modern life, more and more people have been concerned about our living environment, so that a so-called low-carbon life have been turned out.
There is no doubt that low-carbon life take an improve part in our daily life because of the destruction of environment and the unreasonable improving. Just imagining, if we continue useing the resources in a wasting way, our consumption of the natural resources will rise up, and we can not use them no more in the future. What's more, if we won't stop this action, our environment will be destructive!
So how should we do to deal with this problem? It's not hard for us to take some measures to protect our environment and resources, such as turning off the lights before leaving, taking a bus or riding a bike to work instead of taking a car...... Only in this way can our life be more beautiful and wonderful!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d50b1989-0578-37e3-b4d9-497f2c0d725e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people appreciate the life style in low-carbon.There is a new thing which gives us new awarness.
Low-carbon Life will be an important part in our life.As the science and technology developing fastly,pollution of enviornment is more seriouser than before.At the same time,most people have no awarness to protect the surroundings around them.Therefore,it is obviously that low-carbon Life is a good chosen for people.
But how can we do for our low-carbon Life?Firstly,reducing drive is a good way.As we all knowed,vehicle exhaust will increase the content of carbon in atmosphere.We can take the bus more Instead of driving to do someting for our enviornment.Secondly,not only we pay attention for low-carbon Life,but also remind the people who around us.Finally,we ought to take some real actions begin from ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c14c6e14-f4d0-3e87-a270-4e26f2eca1c7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapidly development of economic and technology,the ecological environment now has been damaged seriously.The topic global warming ,which is increasingly fierce,arouse public concern.Low-carbon life is a fine method to our environment.
Initially,low-carbon life can reduce the emission of carbon dioxide;Besides,we can save our natural resources;Additionally,it can nuture people's environmental protection sense.
As the proverb goes, constant dripping wears away a stone.Protecting our word is our obligation.Let's replace the vehicle with bike or metro,stop wasteing paper and water,moreover classify the rubbish.
If everyone makes a little promote,our environment will become much more coloful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fafe957f-6282-391f-8804-e593c3d9bc80> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people care about Low-carbon Life.In our society,pollution is more and more serious,because of lack of awareness of people's environmenal. Many people have realized the importance of harmony with nature.
There is no doubt that Low-carbon Life can improve our living environment.In order to make Low-carbon Life come ture,we must reject to use a one-off chopsticks,reduce the use of car,to promote people to ride bike and so on.
Low carbon Life ,starting with me. If everyone can protect the environment consciously,call on the people around to do the Low-carbon Life ,our living environment will be nicer and nicer.
Come on! Let us do Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 530cb55b-ce57-3128-afbf-cb0e9afb0acc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon life,is a new lifestyle spreading every corner of our country.The concepts of low carbon are low energy and no waste.With the social development,our human being need more and more energy and face many environmental pollution.So,more and more people concentrate on low-carbon life.
It is a signficant project which good for human being's develop.Now the problem of global warming which is because ofexcess emissions of green house gases.Low-carbon Life can solve this problem.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 86d8a3d9-52ef-316d-b89b-cc8753a682f2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Currently,more  and more people lay great emphasis on the low-carbon life ,which is essential to the ecology environment and the sustainable development of society.
Many citizens and factories are used to overlook the importance of the low-carbon life ,as a result ,there is a vicious cycle in the ecology environment.From my personal angle alone,a lot of imporyance of the low-carbon life ought to be remembered.In the  first place ,the great custom is beneficial to prevent the frequent and harmful changes of the climate,which will lead to the rise of the sea levels and devastate our beautiful world.Moreover, with the low-carbon life ,we can always
develop a healthy habit of living.Such as prefer riding bikes to driving a car .Last but not least,the environmentally friendly life may help the poor get rid of poverty and gain an overall prosperity.
We should try our best to support the low-carbon life.A brighting future is awating us if everyone lives the great life .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9e39fde9-94ed-3978-9aad-415352831eb1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As a survey shows that more and more people play attition to low-carbon life, besides it shows that people are likely to protect environment and the earies way we could do is living a low-carbon life.
It is important and necessity for us to live a low-carbon life so that we can be humority with nation. As we konw, global warnning which not only makes the water leavl grows but also brings mang disters is become more and more serise.Not only the goverment,but also we must take somes effected way to stop it, otherwise,sonner or later we would loss our realm,and kill by the nation.
what should we do with low-carbon life? It's not a sign. We should do it right now,and do any try to it.There are many imformations about it you can fine it in mang way.I would show some simple example abou low-carbon life,like cycle waste paper,take bus or underground instead of personal car,turn off light on time.ALL of it's easy for us but it really help.
All in all,please living a low-carbon life,for you,me and our furture.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e1b61ed4-da21-3a78-9a71-e077f68b6705> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today it is not denying the fact that people becomes more and more interested in the low-carbon life. The phenomenon reflects the development of society and the improve of people's mind.
With time's going, nature's resources would be dried out. So, the low-carbon life is more important to the development of society.
Sometimes wo directly think that the low-carbon life is far away form us, but it's not. The low-carbon not only is around our daily life, but also we can do it well by ourselves like turnning down the lights without people in rooms. Don't waste water and to do more sports instead of playing computer game.
Life needs our thanking-giving heart, we can do it better by ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6278c5c3-5631-3e82-ae16-3df98317fa72> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As a 21th centuar's person,we know the Green House Effect has become the most serious problem of the earth environment.How to solve this problem may catch our most attention.
Rencent years,some excerts put up a new style life:Low-carbon Life.This
due to control the daily carbon dioside quantily.Nowadays more and more people pay more attention to it.
Low-carbon Life is important to not only our life but also our earth Mom.When someone live in Low-carbon Life,he will do many different things.For example,go to company by bus but not by car;refuse to use one-used bowls and chockstics.
Everyone may know the carbon dioside is a warm gas and it can crease many perblem such as the sea level reasing.So to control the carbon dioside quantily is vital.No one can leave earth to live,if we want to have a good live environment,we must begin to do now.
Low-carbon Life,from we on,from now on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a8211643-6693-37b8-a1b1-618655bff194> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of the society,more and more people put their eyes on the high-quality lives.Low-carbon Life,which means reduse the pollution of environment is such an example.
Not only because we need a better environment to live in,but also because the Earth,the only one please ,which provides us to live.SO,we should do something to keep our life please clean by the little things what we do.First, we should not to throw our rubish anywhere.Besides, planting trees ,the more the better,and protect the area where is full of plants.The last but not the least, the government or the organization must organise some acitvities to protect the environment.
In a word,Low-carbon Life is the life which people like to and only by the lifestyle like these, we can live healthier and happier

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6b14dcdf-893d-3278-b1c0-50dd2fb4d05e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the weather become more and more terrible,people gradually think highly of the importance of taking a Low-carbon Life.
In our life,every day we produce many rabbish,not just paper and waste water,but some chemistry we have used.
In recent yesrs,the weather become strange and terrible.Many kinds of animals have died out.The sea level is rising.The summer becomes hoter and hoter and the winter becomes colder and colder.Many big disaster haved happened frequently recently.Many people have already suffered from these.
We now is impossible to stop the step of the earth to become warmer.What we can do only is to do take a  Low-carbon Life.
What is Low-carbon Life? it is to reduce the emissions of carbon.We can walk instead of driving a car.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6fb55a4e-5a04-3b93-b929-03a3f0b45961> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today ,more and more people pay attention to reducing  carbon dioxide .  Why?
On the one hand,progressive science and technology bring us a lot of convenience and happiness,on the other hand,it make some wrong at the same time.For example global warming.
The main reason for causing global warming is too much carbon dioxide.
To solve this problem,make you a "Low-carbon life" is a good way.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 343c10c0-eeb4-3dde-9e9a-ef0f2e42071c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the time going by,people more and more care about the low-crabon life which effort
earth a lot.And it also make people think a lot that what should we do in the next time to protect our earth.
As we all know,it's very important to reduce the carbon-using in our life.If air going with a high percents of carbon,the forest-system will be broken,the oxygen will be thiner and thiner.So if we live a low-carbon life,our living environment will be fine and we can get a snug life.
Finally,you can't think the low-carbon life is far away with you.everyone should give our lives a hand."A thousand words will not leave so deep an impression as one deed",let's start to do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c7a58d6a-4393-3018-bd9e-4924449d8c76> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that more and more peaple hava pay close attention to the Low-carbon Life now.It is a good thing  for
peaple to have a good konwlage of our whold.
It is importment for peaple have a Low-cabon life,because the
Low-carbon life can make us hava a good life.For exemple we can
have more and more green tree. and now the problem of global warming because of excess emissions of greenhouse gases. Excessive amount
of carbon dioxide emissions, creating a diversified economy and La Nina phenomena lag disorder. Two levels of glaciers melting, polar animals lose their chance of survival at the same time,so we must have a Low-carbon life for our whold.
As a student ,In my opinion, we should firstly save energy. Turn off the electric appliances in our house whenever they are not needed. Don’t leave them in standby mode.
If we do this day and day,I believe our whold will become more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2ef63fa5-38cc-3de1-9304-8f8d1d1f2814> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people care about green life.The low-carbon life is a important role around the
green life.In recent year,the earth polution is big problem into the daily life of people.
Now,let's think about why are us need to live a low-carbon life.First,it will make a help of
decreasing the polution of CO2 which makes earth more and more warm.Scondly,low-carbon life can
promote our healthy.Thirdly,if you live a low-carbo life,you will get a happy day and good envolution because you will live near nature.
All of that,low-carbon life need everybody to active it.Live a low-carbon life,starting from me.Rufusing to use and buy which will destroy the environment.Less using car or bus,replacing it by bike or on foot.Let's build a more green and more beautiful life environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 85378255-2231-33ae-b12d-b14a7d894b27> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more cars,more and more clectrical Equipments are coming to our daily life,people who will use something which may creat carbon-dixocy because of convenience.howeve,what we should know is that the tenperature of our wold is increasing day by day now.a lagre number of plants couldn't live because they couldn't adapt to the Green House.so as some amnimals.
In this morern society,Low-carbon Life has become an important phrase .maybe we should ask ourselves,why we devastate our eviromment in or -der to increase our ecomony?but at last, we have no such live a comfortable an happy life.Different kind of diseases has already happene on our humanbeing.should we have a self-reflection?
To bulid a Low-carbon Life,we can plant more trees in or near our neighourhood,walking the step instead of taking the elevator.refure to use the one-off thing,like the hrowaway chopsticks and so on.
As time roleby,more ad more people have payed attention to the Low-carbon Life,when we meet a choice of wealth and health.we naturely choose the last one.as the sying goes,life is everything.To cherish our life,please protect our  eviromment,protect our home.Creating a Low-carbon society.Tt's the Erath,our mother's battle cry .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d6e51959-3e42-3431-8d0c-8c1c67f022f4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people are more concerned about the low-carbon life.They try every useful way to reduce the discharge of the carbon.Many country has started to develop the low-carbon economic.
A low-carbon life can make a deep effect on the reduce of the globle warming and the ice melting that has a deep influence on the weather.Low-carbon life also helps to save the fewer energy.
Thought many people are aware of starting a low-carbon life,it still have a less influence.In my opinion,you will feel easy if you try your best to reduce the discharge of the carbon from everything around you ,or you will feel hard if you just think others would do this and you don't need to do so.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 89ade188-475d-3fd5-ada4-feb23da3f4ef> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
"We have only one earth",it must be the point that people of all over the world pay most attention to in the 21th centrey. It's no doubt that many countries's leaders had to stay together to make a discussion about "low carbon".Meanwhile,to solve the cabon problem is also the hope of all human.
Exactly,if we still ignore the importance of low carbon life,we will have to pay more for it.And the phenomenons have happened in our eyes.The height of the sea is higher and higner,
The air in the city is more and more smelly,the temperary on the earth is warmer and warmer.
Without the enough sights of human,we will lose our beautiful life one day.So, it's the time to solve this important problem.
As a 21th centrey's university student,we all should do what we can do.We can do it from the small things in our life.Like remembering to knock off the lights before leaving or using less warter to clean our clothes.if all of us can do ourselves to save theenerge,our life will be more wonderful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b4895682-518e-3098-aeaf-04a2feb17a3e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people care about our circumstance,for the resource is decreasing and the disasters are increasing. It's known that there are over 60 million people in the world,and the propulation is still increasing.In one setting,what we need is beyong the earth's provide.On another,our Earth is getting sick.So a large number of people put more concentration on low-carben life.
It's quiet significant for us to do something good to the earth.As the atmosphere is getting bad, the water is polluted,the resourse is wasting,we need to show our love to Earth.Without the protection ,our earth may die one day. Putting more concentration on low-carben life is a fancinating way to apple more people to join this line.A lot of resource can be used in a scientific way,which provide us more opportunities to do something more meaningful.
Opinions vary from person to person. In my opinion,I'd like to do something low-carben in daily life.For example,I would like to go out side by taking a bus instead of taking a car.This is a way to use less carben. Another example is I usually borrow books from library  instead of buying it. I think every small efforts will make a great difference. Low-carben life is surrounding us , we just need to do easy change in our daily life. With the small action we make, the earth will get better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b4895682-518e-3098-aeaf-04a2feb17a3e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people care about our circumstance,for the resource is decreasing and the disasters are increasing. It's known that there are over 60 million people in the world,and the propulation is still increasing.In one setting,what we need is beyong the earth's provide.On another,our Earth is getting sick.So a large number of people put more concentration on low-carben life.
It's quiet significant for us to do something good to the earth.As the atmosphere is getting bad, the water is polluted,the resourse is wasting,we need to show our love to Earth.Without the protection ,our earth may die one day. Putting more concentration on low-carben life is a fancinating way to apple more people to join this line.A lot of resource can be used in a scientific way,which provide us more opportunities to do something more meaningful.
Opinions vary from person to person. In my opinion,I'd like to do something low-carben in daily life.For example,I would like to go out side by taking a bus instead of taking a car.This is a way to use less carben. Another example is I usually borrow books from library  instead of buying it. I think every small efforts will make a great difference. Low-carben life is surrounding us , we just need to do easy change in our daily life. With the small action we make, the earth will get better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 35e812ff-8b6c-3dc6-8923-7b6d39c48a8a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, a new lifestyle called low carbon life is spreading every corner of our country. More and more citizens focus on the new lifestyle. They not only want to be healthier, but also make efforts to get back the blue sky ,clean water a charming world.
The concepts of low carbon are low energy and no waste. Why is the project so significant. There are following reasons.
On one hand,our living planet has been seriously polluted. Because the percentage of carbon dioxide is growing up year by year, the whole world is suffering  global warming. longer summer and winter is waiting for us. What a pity that we can hardly feel the beautiful spring and interesting fall.
On the other hand,thanks to the global warming, the sea level also rising up step by step for lots of icebergs have melted. At the moment, varies of kinds of animals and plants are disappearing on the earth.
It is such a significant project that I can’t wait to present my ideas on how to promote it.On the first place, a no-car day is supposed to set up every week in our school.Because cars not only cause serious air pollution but also waste energy.On no-car day, neither students nor teachers are allowed to drive to school.
Meanwhile, just walk, jump, cycle or run. Use our legs and enjoy the fun.
On the second place, we had better not use plastic bags any more. No one can stand the “white pollution”. So, it is wise to use bags which can be reused again and again.
Finally, one thing that we should keep in mind: every big thing comes from the subtle. Therefore, as students, we ought to turn out the lights the moment we leave, turn off the tap in time, and reuse our textbook and so on.
All in all, it weighs greatly for all of us to put the low-carbon lifestyle into practice. Just make up our mind to these: no-car day, no plastic bags, and no waste. Let’s do it now!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6546b433-4edc-3d91-aac5-214a6cab82a0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as we all know,in our daily life, there are more and more people who
concentrate on low-carbon life.Low-carbon life,it is a new lifestyle that make
people cherrish the limited resourses on the earth.It has made great effect in people's
mind and won great attention now.
Some may ask that why many people love it so much and they even promote the idea to thier
friends,relatives as they can.Why it is so popular?As far as I am conerned,firstly,it push me
to live in a healthy way,we use the green production,we eat the green food without pollution,all
of them will do less harm to our health.Scondly,low-carbon life teach us to save water,electicsity,
paper,and so on,the less resourse we waste,the fresher air we can breath.Finally,only we live in
a low-carbon life,can we provide a safer and more peaceful home to our children.
We only have the one homeland--the Mother Earth,let's take more care for her from our-
selvese.Turn off the lights when we leave,reuse the paper instead of throwing it away,cherrish
every drop of water...We can do it well,let's move to live a low-carbon life,let's start to
protect our homeland,just from this moment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a9b44913-b4b3-316a-a9b7-45bbc67521d6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon life become a quiet word which can be seen and heard frequently from everywhere because people have gradually realize the importance of the green house effect..The Low-carbon Life not only is a effective way to save energy and cut down the pollution but can reduce the amount of carbon dioxide that is the main cause of green house effect.
Therefore,we should live a Low-carbon Life.Firstliy,when we go out,we should take a bus or ride a bike inside of drive a car which ler out carbon dioxide and waste energy.Secondly,the health life style enables us to take more phsical exercise,enjoying the fresh air and thus relieve the strees.Beside,using electricity saving lamps is also another good measure I take to save the limited energy,which may benefit my future generation.What’s more,eachtime I doing shopping,I will never to take a reusable bag instead of plastic bag.
Such is some of my Low-carbon Life.What’s about yours?Have you already starred a Low-carbon Life?If not,please take action,my dear friends!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6fd1f31e-1f02-3f14-89bf-7a2ac8629e0d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with more and more problems such as the global warming,the melting ice and the rising sea-level,people have attached great importance in environment protection.People now are developing the
low-carbon economic.As we all know, the high-carbon life will not only break the balance of nature,but also do harm to people's health.If we not change such a serious situation,our earth will become worse and
worse.Therefore,it's time for us to make change.In my opinion,there are many ways we can do to reach the low-carbon economic.
Firstly,we should build up the save-energy conscious and do something which we can do.For example,we can take bus rather than driving car.
Secondly,we could plant more trees or other greenplants,in which way we can not only improve the environment,but also can make our home more beautiful.Last but not least,discovering the clean energy to replace the old is a good way to make a change.Most importantly,Low-carbon life start from ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e6694b7c-12d9-3a8b-8e12-67eb031885f1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the encomony developes,people have a great need of pags.That produces lots of co2.Now,many people and organizations realize that we have duty of protect the earth.
As low-carbon becomes a hot topic now,people would like to do something for it .They would go to work by bike or by bus instead of by car.So others are also promoting the notion of low-carbon life in their  daily life.And of course ,every effort will pay off in the furture.While we're trying to lead a low-carbon life,we are to remind others of the nececcity of protect the fragile enviroment .And common people can do some little things,which can be added to make a great difference to our environment.Every small step will count,every small step will make a big move.That's to say a new low-carbon ego needs everybody work together.
Low-canbon life,is a healthy lifeshyle.When we own such a good lifestyle,we do feel that life could be simple and happy with an attiltude of low-carbon.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 509275a7-7f97-340c-b8c1-a8dd05d7e6d5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more people are concerned about low-carbon life. And it is perfashional for people to persuit low-carbon life which make they live more comfortable in the daily life.
As we all know, there are a great deal of pollutions around us. Such as the air maked by bus, industrial wastewater and so on. Because those pollutions are harmful to our health, it  is important for us to live in low-carbon. Living in low-carbon life, on the one hand, we can make good use of the source and save lots of source. On the other hand, it makes our envinloment more comfortable. What's more, the low-carbon life enables people to take more physical exercise, enjoy the fresh air and thus relieve the stress.
As a student, we must promote low-carbon life. First of all, when we go out, we should take a bus or ride a bike instead of driving a car. Cars not only let out carbon dioxide but also waste energy. Second,we had best not use plastic bags which can bring about the white pollution. We should use the environment-friendly bags. Third, it's of great use to plant trees. Trees can absorb carbon dioxide and release oxygen. Only in this way, can make our life more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fd354487-0eea-3d2e-9652-a1d6a5bbf450> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the increasing development of the economy and technology nowadays,people's life quality are becoming betterand better.Meanwhile,we humans begin to pay more attention to our life envionment,such as the airand water. Therefore,whether we are living in the low-carbon life is being focused on by us.
As far as I am concerned, low-carbon life is playing a significant role in our morden life.First and the foremost, In economy,with the lack of the energe,especially the oil and coal.how to use the energe efficently is a good way for us to lead a harmious and lasting life. In addition,the industy and factory are expected not to waste any energe so as to decrease the amount of carbon dioxied. In nature, low-carbon life may also help to balance the carbon dioxied in the air.IF ther are to much dioxied,it thread the life of the plant and animals.what's more ,it may lead to the incease  the tempreture and thus increase the level of the sea ,which eventually thread our saftey.On the other aspect,low-carbon life is regarded as a green and healthy way for us to live on earth.
As for me ,what should i do to live a low-carbon life? From my point of view,  any small acts can help to make a big differnce. ON one hand, we can try our best to save energe.remerber to turn off the light when we leave the room. don't waste any water if possibe. ON the other hand ,try to adk you friends to lead a low-carbon lift togetherfor the simple reason that it will be better.
from what has been discussed above,we may reasoably arrive at the conclusion that the low=carbon life is really important ane we shoule ont nelect it's importance.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 679163be-0c49-3e7c-a990-b0dd93c4abb2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the devolopment of the social economic,people pay more and more attention to the environment.We realize that we should  protect our environment when we go for economics benifits.Now,more and more people prefer the low carbon life.
Actually,it's quite important for us to have low carbon life.First,nowadays,our environment is destroyde seriously by ourselves.So,we have the responsibility to make it better.Second,as the population increases quickly,the sources is not enough for us to live long.Third,low carbon live is good for our health.Why not we go about it?
It's not difficult to live low carbon.Everyone can begin it in our daily life.Here are some suggestions.
We should turn off the lights and fans when it was not necessary.When we go to school or company,we could go by bus instead of driving cars.We can plant more trees,ues less plastis bags,ect.Now,more and more worldly activities about low carbon life are hold every year.We believe it will slowly make our live better and better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 8ff69bb8-dc95-3d41-8002-f4eaafe35ee9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the modern city.There are many car,factory,air conditioner and so on,which to discharge
much dity air that to pollute our environment and make the air temperature of the world add.
There are more and more people care about the Low-carbon life.Because the air pollution is more and more ceriously.So,people have awaved of the importence of Low-carbon Life.If all of us can care about the Low-carbon Life and remmber protect the environment all the time,we can improve the air pollution.In a word,Low-carbon Life is more and more nesscry and must to take action by ourselves.In our life we can do something to try our best to imprve the environment.Such as take bus instand of car,or by bike.
If evryone can try your best to do it,I belive  our earth will be more beatiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ed726233-014d-3873-8fa5-abb973cd9057> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As developing as our life,the temperature go up quicky.So more and more people fous on the low-carbon life.Because only though the low-carbon life,we can reduce the carbon dioxide and make the temperature drop.In this way,we also can pertect our environment.what's more the low-carbon life will make us more healthy.
So from now on let we to live in the low-carbon life.But how to live in the low-carbon life,what should we do in the low-carbon life?In my opinion,first we should our bike or on foot when we not go far away.second we should choose to use public trafic at first. Third we should save water,save foods and so on.
In the end,what I want to say is let we do it in action.To make our world be more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ea82d62d-424a-38b3-8ec9-0df1ef1c14f7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As time goes by,and the ecomony's development,human has used a lot of nature energy especially the carbon energy,which have caused some serious trouble,like the pollution.As we all komw,the energy in the earth is very limited.To take good use of the energy seems vivid esential.
Nowdays have more and more people relized the importance of it and payed more attention to Low-carton life.To live in Low-carton life have became a populer live style.
However ,how can we live in Low-carton Life? Low-carton life means make enough use of the carton energy and try our best to increase it effort.
As poor student,we can do it in our daily life,like when we go out,we must remember to close the light and we can go out by bike instead of taking car or taxe.
If eneryone can make a small contribution to it,our life will be more beautiful and we can live in a more cleaned environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 49d3d5b1-28b0-3356-9b5d-c5ec3aff2874> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon has become a quite fashionable word which can be seen and heard frequently
from everywhere because people come to realize the seriousness of the green house effect.
As is known to us all,our environment is getting worse and worse,and a low carbon
life is becoming more and more important among people.Low carbon becomes one of the most popular which gets the greatest concern.A low carbon life can be of great
use for us.It can help save energy and cut down the pollution. It can reduce the amount
of carbon dioxide that is the main cause of greenhouse effect.and can help keep our env-
ironment beautiful and clean.
Low carbon becomes one of the most popular which gets the greatest concern.
Not only china but all countrues
We shoud live a low carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1f15224f-665a-316b-a97e-cba2ac6634cc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
After global warming was known for us, there is a new life --- Low-carbon Life. Today low-carbon life have become an irreplaceable section of our life. And people take more and more attention to it.
Low-carbon life is very importent for us in all over the world. This life is the most importent method for seloving global warming. If we don't begin to have a low-carbon life, many people and cities would down into water in couple of years. So low-carbon life is nection to our human being live or die.
Our life is handing in our own hand. To live or to die is also in our everyone's hand. Maybe one will think that one is small that did't to infect the world. But everyone have this think is a every serous prouble. So low-carbon life must be done for our own.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 010b67b0-bf68-37e9-9d5e-b1e820a789c2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Resently, a new lifestyle called low-carbon life is spreading every corner of our country. The concepts of low carbon are low energy and no waste. It is such a significant project that I can’t wait to present my ideas on how to promote it.And many people are more and more interesting in low-carbon life.
When we know low-carbon life,we should know the importance of low-carbon life.Firstly,the concepts of low carbon are low energy and no waste.Secondly,low-carbon life can save energy.Thirdly,it less pollute environment and protect environment.Last but not least,low-carbon life can make people live in peace with nature and live longer.
In my opinion,we should do from ourselves in the low-carbon life.First of all,we should use bikes to work or school instand of cars.Besides,don't waste energy.In addion,we should protect our environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 39cf6b23-cba9-3b8a-87b7-c64309181019> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people pay attantion to the Low-carbon Life.Because they think every one should do something for the environment protecting.
As we all know that Global Warming is a important environment problom.Global Warming will bring a lot of bad environment porblem for us.It will make us much lost.So how to live a Low-carbon Life to reduce the carbon dioxide's let out that is a important thing we should do. Therefore live in a Low-carbon life is a important way to porvent the Globai Warming.It is a way that every one can do in daily life.Reducing the carbon dioxide in every way we can do.In our daily life what we must do that we should do it in a way to reduce the carbon dioxide.
At a word,all of us should live in a Low-carbon life to reduce the carbon dioxide's let oot that in order to prevent the Global Warming.This is our duty.So live in a Low-carbon life from us.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f862438-cae6-3f61-8abe-85cd1fb25863> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadayes more and more people relized that the importen of The low carbon life .They start to focu on the situation of low carbon life .Accoding to it,we can know that the problem of carbon and find the solvation to quit the problem of high carbon.I think every should get spirit of "the low carbon life start form me" .If every can do that,we can come ture the dream of live in the low carbon world and we can have good body ,the environment will be more and more beautiful.
So if you want to have a good environment in the future , please became the low carbon life group member of , with ours dream to offer.To love plant and animal start form me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e51ce2ac-d04d-3458-9efb-8fbc5e8a5f16> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,people custom a lot of energy every day,the temperture become more and more warm,so more and more people start to focus on low-carbon life.
I think this is a goood new.Low-carbon Life is very important for our live.It can help us to save the resource and decread the carbon in the air.It also can stop the world becoming more and more warm.If wo do not care about low-carbon life,mang animals and plant will disappearn.
In my opinion,every one shoul have a low-carbon life.We can start it in our daily live.The most simple and easy is that we can save the paper,water and eletricity .We can have low-carbon life by many thing in our live.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 26c75093-a5ef-3782-a83b-f87b0b8d042a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowady,more and more people pay more attention to the low-carbon life.As we know,the carbon oxgen is very important and dengrous.If it incleas too more,the worle will become not let people to live.And the human will go dead.So now many contry
say they hope all the people shoule have a low=carbon life to protect our big house=the Earth.
Worle had become a big for this une hunder years.The air is not fresh,the water is not clean,the forest do not have tree
,and the bird do not have home.If we want the air become fresh,the water become clean,the sky become bligh and the bird have
a home that they can to live.As a human ,we shoul do something to save it.
So,we shoul do it for ourself evertime.Have a low-carbon life,every one.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 686f637e-a3ef-3b5e-8c67-48fb6b0eb803> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the environmental pollution getting worse,people pay closer attention to the low-carbon life.First low-carbon life can help us to decreas the cost of the daily outlay,Second,it can make the air in our city more and more fresh which is good for the citizens' health.Third,low-carbon life can prevent the green-house effection getting worse that the earth can maitain a longer time for people to live safely.Eating less meat is also a part of low-carbon life.It can make people healthier and live longer which can keep people slim and away from cancer.
It is obvious that low-carbon life has many advantages,as whitch we should start from oursleves,start from little.We should use less electricity and water as we are enough.We should use the circle-used paper so the trees can be saved.we should walk or bike more to instead of driving to fresh the air and save the oil.We should study hard and put more heart into life to find new ways to make our earth healthier.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 21348f62-968b-3938-b17d-3794c8e8ddcb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
we live a life with advanced science and technology now,which means with the energy consumption of the emissions of carbon dioxide.The carbon dioxide has let out as the Industrial Revolution was finished,so a long-time emissions makes the balance brokon out.The problame promptes people to take more and more concerntion on Low carbon life.
Low carbon life is important.firstly,It urge the Industrial producter to have a good use of the energy tant can improve energy efficiency,which can save resources.Secondly,human's health is connet to the Low carbon life tighly,when there is Low carbon life we have,there is a good life we live.
Generally,a thing listening is easy to finish,but in fact,It is not.Like the Low carbon life is a hard job and It need all of our efforts.Low carbon life, starts from me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 158668a8-4f20-36b1-9dc7-eb3c1df38d61> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the growing carbon in our earth, people are paying more attention about the low-carbon life.
As we all know, he carbon lead to the greenhouse effect. Because of the greenhouse effect ,the weather is becoming hotter and hotter. And the ice of north pole becoming water sooner than before. If we don't stop making so much carbon, water will cover the iland like Japan and Holland. What worse, the carbon make the sunlight stronger, and lead to people's skin cancer.
We must pay more attention on the low-carbon life. Instead of talking, we should do
something about he low-carbon life. For example, we can ride bike more often, make the most use of the paper and so on. Through this thing, our life will become better and better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 77827240-fc3a-3cfa-85bb-5c95fbf04a72> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the social and economic development,the environment has been polluted seriously.More and more people begin to focus the Low-carbon Life.As we know,many people live a high-carbon life in nowadays,which is high consumption and high energyconsumtion.
When people's quality of life improved,they realize the importance of Low-carbon Life.Thus,they begin to lead a Low-carbon Life in many little things in daily life,such as swtiching off the lights,water reuse and so on.As a matter of fact,Low-carbon Life can make our earth more alive and our life's health.If everybody in the earth konws the importance of Low-carbon Life,and we make efforts for Low-carbon Life,we will have a happy life.
We should promote low carbon living, from our start.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 67065a28-c29b-3878-acb5-b8ddba59aa09> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now the environment is changed more and more serious. People want to make out it.
The carbon dioxide can make temperature hight. It make life more and more difficult. So now more and more people attention about the low-carbon life. Low-carbon life means that we will release less carbon dioxide, and we also use less energy. It can help person save natural resources, and it also can make the environment more better. So low-carbon life is more and more important for developing.
Low-carbon life is easy for everyone. We can take off the light when everyone left the room to save energy. We can close the air-conditioned and open the window. We can make outdoor exercises by bus... We can do all things for the low-carbon life. It's easy for us to make life better by the low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ba2d9d83-69ef-3eef-845d-17843c102fda> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the earth are geting warmer and warmer,peole now are concerning the Low-carbon Life more and more.
As we see at newpaper and all the other medium,the earth warming has a great negative impact to our climate and life,which causing many problems for the biology and human-beings.so,the Low-carbon Life must to be a way of our life.Only by this way,the animals could continue to live,and the disasters also are declesed to a small aspect.First and foremost,the it is a positve effective way to make the continuing developing.
But as the saying"Doing speaks louder than saying"shows,all is nothing without actions,which requies us to make actual behaves from ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 711b612b-86f1-3f08-be04-d8520b1214f5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,people are concern about the Low-carbon Life increasingly as the warming gas increase. There are some examples.People are willing to join in the "earth an hour".People go to work by bike in some country.All the cases means that people are concern about the circumstances.
Low-carbon Life is very importance,because the temperature are increasing with time going by.So what you do for the earth is ont only good for you but also good for the next generations.Low-carbon Life also can help you save money.there are so many young people use the same car when they go to work.It can save half oil and decrease the carbon dioxide emission and get closs with your friends.There are so many benifits why not?
Low-carbon Life is not a words.It is a behaves.At the first,we should

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0603a721-2faf-3b73-851c-1e9a6132e2cc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,with the developement of science and technique,nowdays people pay more and more attention to the low carbon life.
Why we do that?Maybe we all know it.Yes,there are many reasones to let us have to do it.AS for counturies,they should cut a lot of the trees to build the houses,and they have to use all kinds of resource,such ac carbon.As for us,we have to use paper,fornitures and so on.In addition,we must use the mood or other resource to cook,to make electrice.Therefore,the resource we can use become more and more lest.And people also want to live in a low carbon life.
Frome what have be mentioned above,we can make a conclusion that low carbon life is very inportent to us and we must live in carbon life.
So,from now on,we should live in carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ed69b76e-a279-3d0d-9345-d8d834236ab0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more peoples pay attention to a low-carbon life nowaday.They are aware of
we just have the only earth and the environment is influent our hearthy.So they take
care it.
Low-carbon life is important to us.The more people pay attention it,the more hearth
we get.In the earth,the resources are limited and it will run out of in future.So,
it is ture that we carry out some measure to protent the resource.
Face to the severe condition, we should make some measure in daily life by yourself.
We should turn off the light when we see the room without people.We should use less electric.
In a word,we neet low-carbon life to exchangeout life style to make our hearth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 17e87a2f-9618-3401-a22f-dec434176248> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,our environment problem is more and more seriou.Such as the increasing global temperture,the rising sea levering,the decreasing of the forest and serious air pollution. For these reason,more and more people get to know it's important to protect our environment and have a low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life is a new life stytle.In this life stytle,we not only can save money and have a healthy life,but also can protect our environment.
But why it can save money,and what should we do?As a student,is our duty to do something for the earth.We can use fewer plastic bags to reduce white pollution.In our dailife,we shouldn't weast water and even we can reuse water.And we can use second-hand books to decreasing cut down the trees.
In short,low-carbon life is a new life stytle that we all can do it well.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b926aae9-c7f7-3788-bfe8-76fe81a897b2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the rapid development of technology and science,more and more people have realized the importance of the relationship between nature and human beings.So it is no doubt that great concern has risen over the low-carbon life style on various aspects of our daily life.
From where I stand,as a college student,I consider that it is widely known that low-carbon is a great subjuct to the process of our low-carbon society.Everyone is aware of its importance and great influences towards us.For example,low-carbon life is a great step to promote us into a society of recycling mode,and it is also beneficial to keep the correlations on the earth in a balance.On a deeper level,low-carbon life makes great contributions to our expectancy of harmony on various aspects.
Of cource,nobody can deny that a life style of low-canbon,a low-carbon society needs everyone of us to join in.Additionly,starting from ourselves,beginning with little things around us,keeping going together,our life-carbon life will not be so far.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6d69b249-b22c-3a49-8a16-a5ac97ea28db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, as the development of the socialty, more and more people are paying more attention to the low-carbon life.
In the last one hundred years, people didn't realize the importance of low-carbon life,  they cut the trees, only for the increasing economy. But in the recent several years, more and more people are seeking for the low-carbon life, because our home which we live all together are polluted more and more serious. Maybe it would be one hundred years or two ,the world it would not be appropriate for human to live in. So many a people has become relized the importance of the low-carbon life, and they has already carride out in their dairy lives, such as don't use disposable bag, swtich off the light when you leave the room and so on.
In order to future generations, we should start it the low-carbon life from us.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 128cfd55-2f87-3414-b740-e155424e09c0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the past,people used the recource what they wangt,but now, more and more people care about the Low-carbon Life.Because they know the importantce of the Low-carbon Life.When
everyone lives in the Low-carbon Life, the Earth will be fine.Instead of let it get hotter
and hotter.What is more,if we advocate actively the Low-carbon Life,our children and grandchildren can't live in the Earth which had been polluted.
Suming up,everyone has a responsibility to join the Low-carbon Life's activities,uesing fewer plastic bags and second-hand books, and reusing water.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2da32c2d-329c-3158-89d4-80f2646adf66> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people care about their own physical and mental health.So they
begin to pay more attention a Low-carbon Life.
In my opinion,it is very important for Low-carbon Life,because it is good for us and there are so many environment promblems in the world today.Besides,Low-carbon Life can reduse the air pollution and  protect the environment.
In a word,everyone should protect the environment,because the Earth is our home,if we destroy the environment,human will die.So we should start the Low-carbon Life and do somrthing to stop people from doing bad things to the environment,in order to our home or our children ,we must protect the environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d7e2591a-d0a4-3b86-84dd-ca79eb6b3e0a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In contemporary society,as increasing concerning of low-carbon life,people take a great variety actions,including the limite use of plactic bag and exratrisity .The low-carbon life means the life styte that use the grean resourses and reject wasting and polution.
It is meaningful for us to live in low-carbon life,because it is benificial to protect our environment. Moreover, it is important and necesssry for us to use the greem resources ,which is good for our health.
In my opinion, we should live in low carbon life from ourself to effect others. First, we should use plastic bag as less as possiple, instead by the cycle bag. Second, we should go to school or go to work by bike or bus,instead of car. third, we should make use of water in our life. The more people live in the low-carbon life, the more beautiful environment we have.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f961a725-951c-313a-a55e-f107da32199c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,air polution is more and more infect our life.Most peoplebelieve they can do something to save the earth.Thus，they begin to be concerned with low-carbon life.
As everybody knows that too much carbon dioxide can cause Greenhouse effect.Greenhouse effect will lead the melting of glaciers.And the melting of glaciers，will lead the sea level rising.At that time，Janpan will disappear，Shanghai can't also have a narrow escape.Moreover，so many cities nearby the sea will disappear.So the situations allow of no excuse us to live in low-carbon life.
Low carbon life should begin from ourselves.Firstly，we should reject to use the throwaway chopsticks and the disposable lunch box.After that,we should walk or take the bus to work instead of driving.The last one，which is the easiest to do,do waste the resources.Take our life for example，turn off your light，computer，television and other electric equipment when you are no need to use them.At the summer，adjust your air-conditional's temperature to
26C.Believe you can do anything if you want.Where there is a will,there is a way.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c6c65ee2-6cec-3b79-b5fa-a3f3ea45895e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
These years,more and more people are concerned low- carcon life.
As we can see,Global Warming is known by per person who lives on the earth.Global Warming,in the other words,the average temperture of our earth get to higher year by year.And expertors show that it causes by over carbon which is made of the air.So,people living on the earth are called on to pay more attention on this issue.One of the measures of dealing with the problem is calling on people living a low-carbon life.Living a low-carbon is important for earth.We can not only live a gleen life,but also make a big different on our kids.
In the end,let us live a low-carbon life from mow on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9a469a1a-5f47-3154-82cf-b37f4a859f5f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the fast developing ecnomic,more and more people have taken in low-carbon life.As for our teenages,we should learn to know the importance of it.For one thing, Low-carbon can save limited source,as the price of petroleum swiftly grow up.For another,in a sense,wo raise the awareness of "green life".what's more important, Low-carbon Life rescult in being a harmony society.As Chinese proverb puts it "It's really good when everybody is good."Maybe this is the core of " Low-carbon Life"
As far as i am concerned,only people who live a life with Low-carbon can fully enjoy their life,so do i.why not do it from now on?Just take it easy and stick it out.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c54238f3-f383-3f6e-b487-8e3d8c3db6b6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, as the economic development, people life become better,so more and more people begin to focus on Low-carbon Life,in order to aspir the highly quality life, because of the global  warming,the temperature ascend,so the  Low-carbon Life is so very important.We should protect our earth.
The Low-carbon Life asked us must do everything in diary life what we can do,such as not to use the plastic bag, go to work or the journey rides the public transportation, trash classification, not to waste,If everyone can do like that,How the world beautiful it is.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID de610055-904d-320a-aee8-3c10bb849883> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society, more and more peolple pay their attention to the Low-carbon Life. There is no denying that the environment gets wrose because a lot of people become wealthier and the wasting goes unlimited. Many people get ill cause the terrible air. So Low-carbon Life pays a significant role in our all walks of life.Not only should we use less one-off chopsticks but also we can take part in some activities about planting trees or flowers willly and actively. More over, we can do something Low-carbon in our daily life such as riding bike or walking instead of driving. Last but not least, we should try our best to do something about Low-carbon Life and doing this for ourselves just for much as for our children.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4eb677b2-7f3a-339d-9244-5a3fd0595ca8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the development of technology , low-carbon Life become one  of the most populur topics to people all over the world.
Now ,after the impact of technology revolution ,more and more people realize that it is very important to live a low-carbon life to ourselves and want to have high life expectancy.Living low-carbon life is an important foundation of healthy life ,and more and more people pay attention to phishical health. Human life is always more valuable than money.
At the same time ,low-carbon life is significant to nature environment.At the time of technology revolution ,in order for much benifits ,many people always break the blance of nature.It is unfortuntely ,and as result both human and nature get hurt from this disaster. Such as sour rain 、water pollution and much more illness is annoy us.
So ,in my opinion ,we should do from ourselves and live  Low-carbon Life .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 01fe2158-2d4e-3ab7-a58d-b8b6a4a3694d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the pollution of the earth is more and more serious,so that more and more people pay attention to the Low-carbon life.
What is Low-carbon life?Low-carbon life is that not make too much pollution in our life.It seem what we do in daily life is no usr to improve the environment.But actually,when there are more and more peoplo do it,it will improve the environment obviously.So that is very important for us to live a low-carbon life.
How to live a low-carbon life is very simple.We can use less throwaway lunchbox and recycling old batteries.These ways are very useful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0d275846-93d0-3616-b606-ea3bf732c228> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowadays,more and more people make Low-carbon Life a important point with the invironment be destoryed seriously by human beings.As the number of the machines are increating fast,they produce great number of harmful air,it result in the air being dirty,what's more, rivers can be drink in the past now are hard to be use for washing and drinking by us,in another side,trees' being cutted down also do harm in invironment,because of all of above, people pay great attention to Low-carbon Life.
why Low-carbon Life is so importent to us?
First,wo have a beautiful world all the time,we can see butterfly dancing on the flower,or fish playing in the river. It is so beautiful that peopel can enjoy it, but if it was destoryed,it will be gone, so we sould pay  attention to  Low-carbon Life.
second, Low-carbon Life is good for people's health,due to the pullution, oxyean is become more and more lacking,so  Low-carbon Life is useful for us.
finally,we are lacking in energy nowadays,so Low-carbon Life can help us save energy.
As a student, I take a bike or on foot when I go to some place, and turn off light when I sleep or go out.Doing every thing in my life to earn a Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 11656442-8d77-3471-bcd4-9293e8867350> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In today' society ,with more and more pollution ,people make a point of low-carbon live now.
Living in a low-caebon live becomes more and more people' live styles and becomes more and more important and popullar around the world.A lot of people have been awared of it's importance.Living in a low-caebon live can save the energy,decrease the pollution,save water and so on, which is beneficial to our earth,our humanbeings.
Thus, how should we do in order to live in a low-carbon live? As far as i am concerned,we must do something small around us.  Firstly, we can walk or take a bike or take a bus to school or to work instand of taking a car, which reduce pollution.Secondly, we have to save the resoures,such as the energy, water, electricity and more. What's more ,we have better not use someting one-off, which is helpful to our low-carbon live.In addition, we can use someting environment-friendly and recircled.Lastly, it is necessary for us to reduce the wastings. Everyting could be useful if you make good use of it.
Living in a low-carbon live is good for us, so everyone should take it as their responsebilities and do it everyday and everywhere. If we can do so constant, our home-the earth will be more beautiful as well as our live will be more wonderful.Let's live in a low-carbon live.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 259479de-b1c5-3da1-ab1a-414fc7351b61> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With so many progress to make,the country is becoming more powerful,so more and more people pay more time on the Low-carbon Life.
As we all know,Low-carbon Life is of great importance for our life.Well,what should we do?on one hand,we should pay more attention on everything in our daily life.especially something about environment.For instance,we,students,should use the paper for two sides,instead of one side.Using the paper two sides can save so many energy,so the worker will cut less trees,which does helpful for our environment.
On the other hand,of course,our cxountry may play a more important role in Low-carbon Life.the contry should carry out more policy to protect the environment,take planting more trees as example,becouse of so many trees to play,the environment will become fresher,helping us to live a Low-carbon Life.
On the contrary,we don't use the paper two sides and plant more trees,our environment will become bad,what's worse,we can't live on the earth forever.of course,we have more things to do for our life.
As a word,only paying more important to our environment can we live a Low-carbon Life,and the word will more harmonlous.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bf427c5d-f509-3873-8460-a7bf6c24d75f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,with the deveiopment of economy,the people live better and better,but the environment become worse and worse by this,so the people  pay more attention to a new word "low-carbon lift".
It is very important for us to protect the environment,so the low-carbon lift is become a new liftstyle to protect the environment.it can reduce a lot of harmful gases,so we must take the necessary measures to reduce the environmental impact of carbon dioxide.we should study the low-caibon liftstyle.
therefore,we shouid do somethings form now on,For example: tree-planting activities, reduce fossil fuel use, we can from our own, to promote low-carbon living.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d7515d07-2b54-39c9-a124-036d98c3125a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now more and more people concern about the Low-carbon Life.As time went by,the polution that our human being have made is worse and worse.However,many countries have realise that polution will kill all of us unless we take some usefui mathods to reduce this polution immediatly.
It is all but important to learn what is Low-carbon Life for our human being.After we try our best to make the impoirtance of the Low-carbon Life known to our people.
first of all,taking Low-carbon Life can reduce the polution that usually make  the environment worse and worse.further more,the global warming is worse and worse,the most important mathod is to take this life for this life can reduce the CO2 gas.
Last but not least,we should do it from every small matter to every important decision.Such as put off the light when you leave the room to save the eletricty.And you can save the water that you wash clothes to wash other things.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID db9ef8e8-0f9b-36b6-bbc5-5a4ca3873805> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, more and more people begin to concern adout the  Low-carbon Life.As the development of our country, it also time to us to care it.Why it is important to have the  Low-carbon Life? As we knowed, the air pollution, water pollution and other pollution is serios.What's more,the sources of energy on the earth is in short supply.More and more cars appear in the road, more and more population increase, more and more factory appear.Since that problem, the earth have over it's load, the earth is sighing.So, it is important to have the  Low-carbon Life.Now, we have konw the important of the Low-carbon Life,let's us have  Low-carbon Life,begin now on ,form me and you!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 547a6a07-c9f9-3723-a91b-b3623fd6bc3c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As time go by,more and more people are concern about the Low-carbon Life.
Low-carbon Life is a new lifestyle.It means person can't waste much energy
and release much flue gas.Presently,lots of people realize our living environment
is polluted,so they should live a Low-carbon Life.
Living a Low-carbon Life is a very effective way to protect our environment.Firse
of all,as the corbon dioxide increase,now the problem of global warming become
increasingly obvious.Secondly,the warm weather cause the sea levels rising,many people
must leave their living place.Last but not least,the weather change more ,the animal
must lose their living place and they will be killed.
As a member of the world ,we should contribute our strength.For example,we can ride
a bike to school because the cars cause serious air pollution and waste energy.We also
plant the tree which can reduce fossil fuel.In a word,we have to protect our world.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 94c2b189-c781-32f5-b972-7e755e23689e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know carbon using would make our condition dirty ,more and more people begin concern abort number of carbon using .
Becouse of the using of carbon ,more and more carbon daiosy will get into the air ,what make the earth warmer and warmer .To return ,neither our human being nor other lives can live as usually .It's a diffical problem for all person .Now I'll give some example .Ten years ago ,only a few families had air-consentration ,but no one felt it's too hot .Therefor ,nowaday we always say that we can't live if we only have cool water ,in fact ten years ago we just had that yet .
Believe or not ,the carbon using is changing our life .Lots of these are bad for us .Although some experts have give a lot of theorise about to use carbon less ,in many ways we have to use it ,we can not live without carbon conducts .
In my opinions ,we shouldn't waste anything .We should remember ones we waste a little ,it will make the world warmer .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a73bbc69-2667-3904-a565-c737238efc66> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,our enviromment become worse and worse.The gobal warming is very terrible.
The temperature increase a lot during the past 50 year.The cause of these is greenhouse gas.
And the most of greenhouse gas is carbon dioxide. SO, people concernt about the Carbon dioxide emissions very much.
Then most people start low-carbon life to protect our world.This is a very important and
useful behavior.For one reason ,low-carbon life means protections to trees that can give us
more fresh air and beautiful world , for another reason, of course, there will be less carbon so that the temperature will become lower,the climate anomaly can be sloved.what's
more ,we can save energy and our  will live in a green ,healthy life.
Low-carbon life can't only be a slogan,we must take it in action by ouselves! For our world ,for our life,we should take effort.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 97c6ef98-0948-3a47-945f-c6d0b29ba164> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the curtual development of sociaty,there is more and more people concerned with the low-carbon life.Actually,low-carbon life are not just good for us but also sociaty and universal and it will bring us a lots.
As we all know ,the temperture of our biosphere is going up as the result of carbon dioxide rising,and the sea level is rising with the temperture .some countrys which nearby seaboard  have been covered by water .From this ,you know how important the low-carbon life is.Somehow,the low-carbon life is affecting our life every minute,and we must do something to improve this situation.
Easily for all of us to do something to improve this situation,Autually ,we can do it in our daily life .for example,we can use less disposable chopsticks and platic bag,it is easy for us to do this thing.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2411d5d5-1925-3dde-afb7-cec5065217e2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
While our world was more and more hot, many environmental problems have appeared. Glaciers melting, species decline and many other environmental problems. With the appear of various environmental problems,humans began to fine the methods to protect the environment.
Nowadays,people are developing the low-carbon life. With the low-carbon life,we can reduce emissions of the carbon dioxide,slow the greenhouse effect and save the energy.
In my opinion, low-carbon life is a necessary and effective way to improve the environment.So we shuold live with low-carbon life from the side small.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6d2555db-c104-347e-887e-4b6320d444a1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,with the developed of industry,our environment is getting worse and worse,and a low carbon life is becoming more and more popular among people.
A low carbon life can help save energy and cut down the pollution.It also reduce the carbon dioxide which is the main cause of greenhouse effcet. If we live a low carbon life,our envirnment will become more beautiful and clean.
It is easy for us to live a low carbon live.first of all,when we go out,we should take a bus,ride abike,even have a walk instead of driving private car.Sencond,the plastic is hard for us to obliterate,and it is bad for the environment.So when we go to the supermarker our shuold bring a basket instead of using plastic bag.Last but not least,we must protect the tree and try our best to plant tree.
So live low carbon life is no far wary wite me,we can do it with small in our daliy life.As a university studend,we should live a low carbon life in order to protect our environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d23e9faa-c89e-3eda-9279-413e871264c8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
At that time,more and more people recognizing the important of the low-carbon life.We know more and more serious problems such as increasing global temperture,the melting ice will cause us big trouble,even do harm to our survival.So developing the low-carbon life is very indispensable.But what can we do to live a low-carbon life?We should do it in many ways,like using the bus rather than car when you go out,re-use the thing that can be recycle used and reducing the use of plastic bags and so on .At last,let's do it now,and I hope we will live in a low-carbon life in the future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 42c65059-659b-301c-978a-e72322255ab0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we have been known that,people pay more attention to envirement.To protect our earth,moro  people try to live a low-carbon life.we believe that if we live a low-carbon life,life will become more beautiful.It is important for us to know the means of low-carbon life .on one hand, it help us to live a better life.on the other hand,it make us stay with nature friendly.
In order to live a low-carbon life ,we should trt to do this.first,we should cherish water and make good use of it.second,we need to plant more trees.Without trees,the world will be dead.And it can beautify our home.Of course ,flower is OK.Last but not least,we can use green product and buy green food.I think it is a good way because everyone can do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cb883d65-63db-3e45-8903-11ca229cf220> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the economic development,the environment suffered serious damage.So,more and more people begin to focus the Low-carbon Life.
Today,lots of people understand that Low-carbon Life is very important.As we konw,all the people face a great environmental probiem-greenhouse effect.Low-carbon Life can reduce carbon-dioxide emissions,save energy and improve the environment.
Becaus of this,we should begin to learn how to live a Low-carbon Life and try our best to protect the environment.Such ae driving the bicycle or bying the bus instead of private car when you go outing.If people can keep doing this,our environment will become more and more better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2b810e05-fe46-3064-9fa5-41a783764638> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
On nowadays,our environment are becoming worse and worse,which let we feel uncomfortable and causing us becoming ill usually.so people are more and more caring about the low-carbon life.
In my opining,the low-carbom life has its important effection. Firstly,it can make our air become fresher.Secondly,it can let our environment become more beautiful.Last but not least,it would low temperment of the world and solve the problem that our world are becoming the green house.
In order to realize the low-carbon life,everybody of us should try our best to do it in our life.we should the litter reduce but not born it.we should save the electry but not overuse it.There are a lot of sush of this thing we can do,if we can do it all by you heart and try to become perfect,I think our world will become mome and mome beautiful and the people who live in sush a low-carbon earth will live more happy and healthy.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a7eb5688-8b1c-3754-8020-f749dc88b771> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today more and more people focu on low-carbon life. many activities about it are held
in school, streets and exe.
low-carbon life is very important in today because our invironment has become worse and
worse.And one of reasons of the bad invironment is that there is more carbon come from
and the cars ,the eletristy using. The bad inviroment for high carbon has caused many
disasters which maked huge distory for humans .Therefore,low-carbon life is very important
for every one .
Low-carbon life is not a difficult way to live .We can do this whenever and wherever.
As we are students, we should turn off the computer, the lights and the fans when we leave off our domitories.And then, we can using bysicles to take the place buses or taxs.we can also plan more trees ahd flowers which make our invironment more beautiful and comforteble.
Low-carbon life is not difficult but it needs all of us to concernt about together.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c3e1b371-3fe7-3a54-a836-9d480ec15165> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,as all we know,low-carbon life is became more and more important in our life,more and more people are aware the importance of it.
Low-carbon life is not only a way to save the resource,but also a way to reduce the pollution of life.If we doesn't call on it from now on,our earth will become more and more dirty,and become more and more hard fore people to live.Finally,we might live in a world with black water and cloud,where there have not green tree ang blue sky,which seem as the end of the world.
So we should try our best to appeal low-carbon life,to encourage more and more people to  take part in us.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 50addc87-8ddd-3d40-b1c2-ef96e3c9a7a4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developement of our society,nowadays,more and more people pay less attention to low-carbon life.
What is low-carbon life?As far as I am concerned,low-carbon life is a lifestyle of the time to minimize energy consumption,thereby reducing carbon dioxide emissions. Low-carbon life,for those of usordinary people is an attitude to life.
What shall we do to encourage low-carbon life?Firstly,tomishui can be used towash their handseveryday,clean furniture,water the flower and so on.Secondly,scarp paper will pave the lowest in the closet can not only absorb moisture,can absorb the smell in the closet.Thirdly,drink tea residue ,dry it,make a tea pillow comfortable,and help to improve sleep.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 18d6cff9-9cb8-39a5-992c-d55e5459f7f4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,the topic of " protect environment" is the most important thing we should now. As the improve of the economic,more and more living rubbish pollute our environment ,so more and more people care about the importance of Low-carbon Life.
A good environment can make our life better.The  Low-carbon Life is not only good for our health but also good for our environment.
In order to make a  Low-carbon Life ,we should do every thing to protect our environment from the little things.For example,we should turn off the light when we leave the home,using our environment protection bag instead of the disposable bag,using the bike instead of the car when we go out and so on.
In all, we all have the responsibility to make a Low-carbon Life .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7e0852ed-7b17-36cd-8d35-d4110b9e46db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that nowadays more and more people paying attention to low carbon life, what is more,many affective measures have been taken to strenghen the structive ideal.
As far as I concerned,the low carbon life ideal resulting from the fact that the greater development of technology and lots of factories,which have produced much carbondioxide and wasted much power. In order to made our life more healthy and comfortable , many people have taken pains to reduce carbondioxide whice has a bad influence on our life.
As college students, we have not choices but to save power and water and so on ,what is more important is that we should persuade our friedns and classmates into the meaningful action.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 55663585-ba5c-34e9-adde-a73efd29010e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are a largh nomber people pay attantion to the low-carbon life,which is
regard as a fashion.Take the earth one hour as a example,these years,more and more people
take part in this activity and contribute their power.
With the increasing of the carbon dioxid,our earth become warther warther.some scientists
predict that the Earth's temperature would rise by as much as 5℃ over the next 20 years if we didn't take effective measures.
In a word,it is our duty to take measures to save our earth mother,save our living surouding word.Therefor,we must try our best to support low-carbon life.Turn off the light
when you leave,turn up the temperature of air condition as possible as you can .When you go to work,take bus or subway if posssible.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ece8bfb2-e287-3c0a-9b24-908b6992f5c9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, Low-carbon Life is a hot topic in our nomal life.Why?Because as our life became more comefortable and enjoyable,we have made too many polution and waste the energy which is limited.But people have paid more attention to The  Low-carbon Life to save our life from now.
The  Low-carbon Life is so important that we should try our best to do it well.For expamle  to save water and electicity ,to save the things we used,to reclyce,etc.We live with the limited things we have in the earth,so to have well use of what we have.We can't live whithout them.But we had waste too many in the past.We poluted the water and waste the electricity we have and the treasure that the nature give.If we can live a  Low-carbon Life,we will be good with nature. As the tenolegy developed rapidly,we awayls feel that the life become more enjoyable,but it is the nature supply us.So we should be appreciate and look after it carefully.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a1a2e4c0-db12-35e7-a95c-5e969dc0fa02> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
`With the economic development,the environment was destroyed more and more badly,which result in the scare of people.Therefore,more and more people begin to forcu on the Low-carbon Life and want to improve the environment by it.
The Low-carbon Life is very important for the society.Now,people’s life are better and better.But,as people enjoying the beautiful life,they couldn’t value the resource which is limited in the world.That is result in the resource was wasted badly.However, the Low-carbon Life is that teach us to save resource and can give us a healthy life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ca4f2f6f-769a-3dd5-a9ad-6763b8ced89b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Each and every one of us is responsible for the greenhouse gases we edit in our daily action and choices.therefore,combating climate change is going to take the combined efforts of everyone on the planet.
Today's society is a highly developed technological society.However, the shortcomings in the development process are obvious. therefore, people are more and more care about low-carbon life.
To creat low-carbon life,we should have the save-energy consicious and do something which we can make,for example ,we can using the bus rather than car when we go out,reducing the use of plastic bags and plant more trees or greenplants,we can not only improve the envorinment,but also can make our earth becomr more beauty.
in my opinion ,the most improtant thing to reach the low-carbon enconomic is everyone most try their best do what they can do for it.it will earier to reach the low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f8f9997-e053-3e26-b828-25da5abf3ef7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Currently, an increasing number of people are showing there concern in the relationship between our human beings and the nature, which leads to a positive eco-friendly attitude "To lead a low-carbon life and do high-profile work". This tendence indicates that people are gradually realise the importance of protecting our environment from being polluded and we begin to practice it from now by our own.
It is well known to us that with a violent growing of population, the fuels and power resources are becoming out of needed and can not support us well as years before. And worse still, the overuse of carboned energy such as fuels and oil has produced to many carbon-dioxide, which, sharply press pressure on our atmosphere and polluted our homeland. What we have not been able to avoided for several centries is the dilemma between growing and environment. Now as we are highly modernize with the help of our nature mother, we should learn to feedback and become more eco-friendly. And low-carbon life, such brilliant idea, which means living with the least energy and the highest efficience of work, does serve our willing well. Actually, Not only stoping chimmeys of factory producing poisonal air bur also protecting forests form axes is far more out of our ablity. However, we can still try to lead a low-carbon life, a effectient way to save energy and avoid polluting environment more, to express our gratefulness to our earth.
Admittly, Low-carbon Life does brings us some inconvinence, such using driving our cars less often. However, if viewing from another perspect, as a low-carbon person, we can still choose the public traffic mobiles to work this out. moreover,as the advantages and meaning of leading such life is far more obvious and important than these little shortages, we should make up our solid conviction to pratice it even troubles with. Low-carbon Life is a fabulous idea but it really calls for our supports. To save earth by our own, please do it from now and ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 03eebdfc-0027-3b85-9925-df462b5a0837> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now more and more people are concerned about the low-carbon life. As we know ,  carbon dioxide is the major cause of global warming, We emit carbon dioxides through the burning of fossil fuels, like coal, wood, and so on. To live a low-carbon life is to protect our planet and protect the future of the next generations. It is not a hard work. But we should work hard to make it. We can us less air conditioner in hot summer, and we can using more public transports  to go to work instead of using  private cars. And if everyone plant a tree, we can make it. So I strongly appeal to you to live a low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b2cfee98-0a86-381e-9f83-535a12734037> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of society and the improvement of life ,people are willing to be concerned about low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life is the latest green life ,which is not only do good for ourselves ,but also improve our environment.People love low-carbon life ,that is ,people are awared of the important of environment.Low-carbon life save our resources.
In my opinion ,we should live a low-carbon life from now .For example ,we can take a bus instead of take a car .Low-carbon Life changes our life style greatly .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID af2fd625-b7b1-3cbf-9a07-8ff14aa80ff4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy and society,the earth has polluted heavier and heavier.
Fortunately,human beings are incrasingly aware of that how important the low-carbon is.
As we all know, with the temoerture increasing,caused a lot of problems.Low-carbon life become more and more important and we are busy to take it in our life.Because low-carborn life may be good of creasing the tends of the increasing temperture.Besides,it may protect the ice from being melting.In a word,it do good to our envirnment.
So.in my eyes.We should do it in ourselves and from now on.For example,take bus instead of driving,plant more tree...In a word,do your best to do it and only for our own home.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f2e1cb6c-75d0-3f9e-8b6c-162cfe681699> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the developing of social,as the improve of the live level,more and more people are begining to take care of the low_carbon life.
In fact , it's very important for us to  start low_carbon life. The weather become more and more warm in recent years because of the increaming of the carbon dioxide.If we still live donot protect the enviornment, the enviornment will revege us someday.
For prevent such situation come about, we all should live in low_carton and protect our erath. For example,we can walk or by bus instead of drive when we   go out, take off light ,water when we leave home and so on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cf3a11c9-2287-3e1d-9b2d-5ca434ac36a2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the develop of our tecknowlege,people are living longer than before,so we are aiming a
happier as well as healthier life.Words "Low-carbon Life" are come up with this increating group.
As we known,environment polution has becoming worth and worth,which should be changed imediotly.We should become aware of the protecktion of our living situation.Low-carbon means less polution and freshier sky.Low-carbon not only brings us a better environment ,but also to our children or grandchildren and so on.
How can wo make a Low-carbon life?in my opinion,firstly,less using of electricity-working machine.Secondly,protect trees and grass around you and plant trees if you are able to do it.Last but not least,"turn off"when you 're leaving.
Action for the Low-carbon life,from now on!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3589981b-2d48-3deb-a06e-5abe06460b01> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,more and more people pay attention to the environment protection and argue to establish a low-carbon life.This is a kind of development of people.As we know,although our economic is developing,we get all kinds of pullution,like gas pullution,industrial pullution and liquid publlution,which are bad for our health.The environment is so important that we must protect it and it would provide us with health.If we establish a low-carbon life,we would get not only economic development but also environment protection.
How can we do it?......

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ad3f2363-6d62-37ad-95d7-61996fee7f6d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As a new life actitude,low-carbon life acdually become more and more important in the word.Peoples all become more and more concentrate onlow-carbon life.Low-carbon life means a life that use little product which will lead to carbon polution.A low-carbon life is important for a beter life envilement.Low-carbon life cut down de use of some resourse,so it will sail much for us.And,low-carbor life will cut down some polution.It heip us to make a more butiful and healthy life.
To live low-carbon life,we should do something in our daily life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID dc571897-6624-3716-b7cb-9b40dc664d5c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now people are pay more attendtion to Low-carbon Life.Because they think that they have a happy family and live well with the people around them,they don't want to die early an take more care of their health.Low-carbon Life not only can give the people health, but also can protect our earth from polluting. So we must do something for our life. we can do one-hour sports to take place of play computer every day. And we can ride a bike to replace by bus.
Even we can read the book in the open air, we don't need read under the light.In the words, we should do something as many as possible for our life, because we must live in the earth.
Let us go together.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 50b477d2-1e95-3b31-921e-45fb3a50a021> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people become to pay attention to low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life is a healthy,save and clean life style.In recent years,the earth's temperature is becoming higher and higher and the sea level keeps rising.That's all because more and more carbon dioxide was let out to the air.So make a low-carbon life become the most effective way to protect our lovely earth.
To make a low-carbon life needs everyone's effort in his daily life.For example,we can take a bus instead of driving a car to go to work.In summer,wo can use a fan or cold water to make us feel cool or not to use a air-condition.
As one word,trying to make every small effort to reduce the carbaon dioxide so that we can make a low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID dfe090b4-2f65-31b2-ba16-48402551a82f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,Low-carbon Life is popular in our social.There are more and more people care about the Low-carbon Life,and begin to live Low-carbon Life.
The Low-carbon Life is important with our world.Enter the 20st century,there are more carbon dioxide into the atmosphere with the development of industry.Now,we are locked in greenhouse effect,the weathet becomes fickle,and the temperature becomes higher.If we can not lessen the discharge of carbon dioxide,our world will destroy in the near future.
As a university man, especially we are environment specialized student,we must protect our world from the greenhouse effect.We can do manything for our world,for example,we can use less production of wood,save electrical energy.Only we care our environment,our social will be more beauty.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 91c27920-44bc-3c6c-be31-c11e6dc20945> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays, more and more people are carefui about the Low-carbon Life.
In the turth, the modern social life is destoried by husman being. Because of more enterprises in order to their benefits to waste more resources and pollute the nature. In the daily life, people also waste the water and eletricity. These are having caused the environment be polluted more seriously. Liking this life quality is not good for peolpe's living. So we want a healthy life is that- Low-carbon Life. More and more people are supported this oppinion. The low-carbon life argues that people use the resources of no polluting stubances. If we lived in the low-carbon life, we would make little pollution that reach the goal of portect the nature. So the low-carbon life is more important for us.We should do it actively.
From now on, we should do it by ourselves on more and more small thing. For example, we could take a little bag to the store for carry the things to back home. We also could use the replaceable resources in the daily life. We could take the bus to replace by the car.More and more we could by our best to do. Leading the low-carbon life is a brilliant idea but it needs our supports and pratice. So let us just do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cf28b202-6cda-3e90-b2a5-8930a3c06dc0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As peoples's life becom more and more better,we becom more and more pay attention to the low carbon life.Low-carbon life is very import to us.First of all,the polution of enviroment will be better,this may make pepie live more longer life and more happiely.Second,when we live wite carbon-life life,we will use more little energy than before,than,people can have more energy to live.finally,if we everybody live wite low-carbon life,we can save many amials which go to die,because the tenpeture of earth is higher and hihger now and many amial could not live in so higher tempeture,also,because of higher tempeture,the ice becom water and the sea is more and more higher,the land is more more low.
And what we shuld do now is to live in low-carbon life from ourselives.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 20debdc2-f8be-33a8-9c04-e784d1f46f3f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all ,more and more people pay attention to low-carbon life.
Leadind a low-carbon life is a fashion trending and benefit to our world.
In my opinion ,having a low-carbon life is necessary for us to have a better future and we all should think highly of it.There are many reasons ask us to do it .Above all,its a healthy life style which can slow down the speech of globe-warming since globe-warming phenominon is more and more serious.Nowadays,we can easily to hear the sea level is raising the tempereture is higher and higher.What is worse, the north pole bear is in danger and some ialands are destoryed as the sea level raising. Having a low-carbon life remind people not to waste energy because most carbon is from the use of energy.The energy we can use is very limit so we should enrich it and do not waste it.
To protect the world is the responsbility of everyone and leading a low-carbon life is the a basic action which we can do in easy!
In the end ,to protect our mother and our health ,let us live in low-carbon!作文题一：

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f7b93524-f557-3151-b2da-644f3146fc17> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
now,in our daily life ,peopel more and more care about the Low-carbon life .
as we all know , today's society is a highly developed technologlical society.
however,the shortcomings in the development process are obvious,such as :carbon
dioxide,and environmental pollution.But the most serious should be the carbon
dioxide problem .
now the problem of global warming becoming the more importain problem.
and this problem much be slove by all the peopel but not the person .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b15fda4f-f780-36f0-8c70-cccc41b4e317> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years, pepple pay more and moer about the Low-carbon Life as they know  more about the importance of it.
As we know, too much carbon dioxide will cause the greenhouse affect.it disaste
for the earth.So living a low-carbon life is becomming more and more important.we can reduse  the use of energy and carbon dioxide emisions .
But how can we live a low-carbon life?We can try to walk or ride a bycicle instead
of driving cars. Maybe we can take the bars or share a car with others. Dont waest electricity at home or school and eat some vegetibles on season. That is easy if yuo really want to do it.You can encourage your families and friend to join it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0bdafec2-210d-3329-b73f-6dea98cc3199> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In recently,as the development of the people's life quality,people pay more attention to the
low-carbon life.As we know,the low-carbon life is more and more important for us.On one hand,low-carbon life can produce the air polution and prevent global warming brought about by air pollution .On the other hand,low-carbon life can save lots of energy.And it's very important for the development of the earth and our future generations.So protecting the health of the earth is everyone's responsibility.We should try our best to protect our earth.Low-carbon life starts from me!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1e365600-2e13-3994-a6cb-3dfe16714c69> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the problems of the environment are being more and more serious,and people pay more
and more attention about the Low-carbon life.As we know,first,the low-carbon life is good for our protection to the resources,and also for the development of country's economy. Then,it can improve the quality of our life ,not just for
ourselves,but our descendant.The most improtant is that the high qudlity of carbon will cause the global warming and make
disasters which harm for the human beings.So,the low-carbon life is start from us,we must put our heart on reducing the
qudlity of making carbon ,and make the world more and more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a59e0f11-44d1-343e-8d99-73a1b72a58c3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowadays,people become increasingly concerned about a new lifestyle which advocate people to live a low carbon life.people's requirements of living a comfortable and convenient life can  be fulfilled by the low-carbon lifestyle.
in fact,we cannot emphasize the importance of living a low-carbon life too much.the large quantity of carbon dioxide emissions contribute to the global warming,which leads to the rising of the sea-level.in order to solve the climate crisis and let the next generation enjoy the same resources,we must take actions.that's why the low-carbon life is promoted.
actually,living a low-carbon life is easier than we think. in our daily life,we can do something like buying unnecessary clothes less,reducing food waste,riding a bicycle rather than a car and turning off the lights after leaving a room.all these things seem easy but really works.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 70fd0604-2e09-3b93-b862-51f366809a4b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,the environment around us is getting more and more serious.With the evelopment of society,the people pay close attention to the low-carbon life.Low-carbon life has many advance in our life.So it's can not emphasize the importance of this life too much.We should have the save-energy conscious and do something which we can make,for instance,using the bike rather bus when you go out,re-use the thing that can be recycle used,reducing the use of plastic bags.From now on,we star living a low-carbon life.Do more and more thing which is green,our world will more and more beautiful and comfortable.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID eb82fd0f-6435-3f0f-aaf9-e8b178fadb41> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon LIfe can reduce the carbon, especially carbon dioxide emissions, reducing the pollution of the atmosphere, slowing the ecological deterioration. Absolutely there is a diversity of measures we can take so as to lead such an environmental-friendly life, mainly from aspects of energy saving and recycling solar term to change the details of life!
As we all know the low-carbon life is good for ourselves,so we should start it form

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c1858157-31fa-31ac-92ea-5ec82f0d623c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As zhe global warming become worse and worse,people begin pay more attention to low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life means a lifestyle that people try their best to reduce the production of carbon dioxide.A little of water maybe very small, but a plenty of little water can turn into a large sea. It shows that if all of us live a low-carbon life,the carbon dioxide in the world can be reduced to a much low level than it now.The importance of low-carbon life just like the importance of reducing carbon dioxide.
Many people may don't konw how to live a low carbon and don't know what this lifestyle is about.Actually there isn't many difficulty to live a low carbon life.In another words,it's quite easy to do so.For example you can go to work by bus or underground instead of your car.This is a low carbon life.What is more,any way you use to save energy is a low-carbon life ,too.
As far as I'm concern,the most difficult to do this is the begining.So let's step out the first step.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fa848e51-ee26-3e4b-9af2-ed1dd5e21a47> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Presently, a new lifestyle called low carbon life is spreading every corner around the world. with more and more serious problems such as the increasing global temperture,the melting ice and the rising sea-levering,people are recognizing the important of living in a low-carbon life.
Low-carbon meant low energy and no waste. It is such a significant project that i can't
wait to present my ideas on how to promote it.There are many ways we can do to reach the loe-carbon life.Fristly,discovering others fuels which is more clean and more green to instead of the using of carbon.Secondly, we should have the save-energy conscious and do something which we can make,for instance,using the bus ranther than car when you go out,re-use the thing that can be recycle used,reducing the use of plastic bags.Last but not least,we should plant more trees or other greenplants,in which way we can not only improve the environment,but also can make our home more beauty.
In my opnion, the most important thing to reach the low-carbon life is everyone must try their best do what they can do for it.Once everyone have the sence of low-carbon life and have the action by themselves ,it will be earlier to reach it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6ff6e6a7-a072-327c-a533-e37b8a49e301> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
We are concerned on the Low-carbon Life when our condition are more and more trouble.Why we do it?Because we know the importance of  it.Only we live in Low-carbon Life can we protect our nature.
We should make friend with nature.But we kill many animals and trees for money what make our weather more trouble.If we want to change we should do it by ourselves.We should reject to use the one-off thing.Discreasing the discharge of the carbon oxygen.we should being willing to walk or by bike go to work.In this way not only discrease the carbon oxygen,but also are good of our health.
Let us just do it.Manking a good nature with Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 146ad8e2-8d0f-3888-a19e-dacd1e3a1ceb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,many a person more and more pay close attain to Low-carbon life.Why?because people realize the inportant of Low-carbon life.With the development of the society,more and more environmenttal problems happen,such as carbon dioxide 's effect as a green house ,piercing the ozone layer.Our living environment more and more bad.Maybe in a few decades,the human can not live in the reath.So we must to low-carbon life in order to our living environment. Low-carbon life,stares from me.From now on, I'll use fewer plastic bags to reduce white pollution. I'll take less lift and reuse water.In order to save energy I'll plant more trees so that the air will be fresher. At last l will use second-hand books,so we don't need to cut down more trees.
aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ec250da2-737d-340a-a787-f4a7fb117b59> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The more people born in the world,the worse environment we live.
Today,the low carbon life is a good way to human to live for the
earth.More and more people are to think highly of the qulity of the
environment they live.So the low carbon life is the best choice to
them.
The most important reason why we need to choose the low carbon
life is that it can reduce the emission of the CO2.The CO2 will
cause the world's season to became change,and the season changing
will make the human harder and harder live in the world.
Low carbon life is good for the earth,we can do it by ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 170e14fd-0d83-3f9b-8b1b-25e71093b6cd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With highly focuing on the low-carbon life,everyone do take some measures into effect about reducing the release of carbondioxide,which cause the global warming seriously.
Low-carbon life become more and more significant and do you know the important role it plays in protecting enviroment?Having a low-carbon life means the earth will become healthy by the reducing release of carbondioxide.In addition,it also make the earth's temperature come down and we don't need to suffer from the extreme weather which is too cold or too hot.
And what is low-carbon life?Trying to use the public traffic tools or ride a bike instead of driving cars while going out,and trying to recycle plastic products,that is so-called low-carbon life.
A healthy earth of regular weather may be a luxury for us in this era,but if we make some effective measures and take it into effect,this luxury will be put on our hands!So having a low-carbon life should be started by ourseleves!Let's do it!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 37ecd6dd-bbbd-31e9-a8ee-b72778737ed2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,Low-carbon life become more and more popular in the daily life.Not only China,but also most citiese around the world make ssacrifices to the low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life means that the greenhouse gas will be cut down.In other word,the carbon dioxide may reduce in this lifestyle. People make contrubition to reduce engry consumption.As the development of industy,more and more green house gas is to be put into the sky.If the producers relize the importance of loe-carbon life,the future will become well.But the increasing of world population is also one of the difficults dealing with environment.
We should relize that loe-carbon life is a life attitude.All of us have responsibility to limit the carbon gases.SO,we shouid develop good habits in daily life.The more you do best to environment,the better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1456dd0d-0e09-31e5-ad1d-8f348be8c833> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,"Low-carbon Life" become a hot topic in our life,not only our goverments are concerned about this topic but also almost all people who living in the world pay more attention to this topic.And more and more people are aware of the importance of living in harmony with nature.
Low-carbon Life is a very good lifestyle which we can live more and more health.As industry develops more and more quickly,our environment become more and more terrible.So our body become more and more terrible,healthy is far away from us.
Low-carbon life is not some words who are say in our mouths,it need everyoe who living in the world takes actions for it.
For us just as much as for others,we should be concerne

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bc770b76-6ca9-3aff-8bb1-79af5c99ae68> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In reasent years ,people haue payed more and more attention to low carbon life.low carbon life is becoming a goal in enviorentment,which will haue a big influence to our health.
low carbon life means that we live in a healthy way like reducing pulution ,protesting invorentment everywhere and everytime .low carbon life is a kind of "green style" and low carbon is good for teampliture . As wo kown ,the most enviorenment probles are produed by it !
For the importance of it ,the govenment all ower the word have joyed into building low carbon life .To us ,we should do it ourselves .In our daiy life ,we should pay moree attention to envionment like no using one--off ,turing off the light on time and so on !
low carbon life ,live better !!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3400f17d-9c33-3d2e-ba68-c4fda86de884> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As everyone konws,the enviroment of our earth is becoming more and more bad.Not the goverment must make some meansure, but all the people should try our best to protect the earth.So,low-carbon life is very important and more and more people focus on it.
First,the temperature will drop,if everyone live a low-carbon life.Because the carbon dioxide is the initiator of evil of the greenhouse effect.Second,we can protect the ozone layer through enjoying the low-carbon life.Last,live low-carbon life can make us become more healthy.
All in all,we should live a low-carbon life in order to protect our earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 612076eb-7510-3429-bcb0-a6d348b0fe51> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,more and more pollution appearing in our life.So people pay more attention  to considering the Low-carbon Life.They have been conscious of the importance  of the Low-carbon Life every day.
To realize the idea,we should do everything which looks seem small and keep every day.Here I have some measures to face the day-life.Firstly,I we can go to school by bike or on foot instread of by car or by bus.secondly,we could let every drop of warter cyclic utillzation.Because the warter is the live of our life,we should protect it well and it will beautify our environment and help us live in more low-carbon life quitely.
Low-carbon life,begin form me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bd0ee654-2823-3f7a-8133-4d16bc54c0be> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people become more and more concentrate about low-carbon life for science and technology developing.low-carbon life is very importan to us for it is an enviromental life.AS the science and techlogy developing,our enviroment become terribal too.The earth-warming makes people awaring of that we should lower the Carbon footprinting.By living the  life,not noly can the people become more healthy,but also we can safe the resource of earth.
How to live a low-carbon life?In my opinion,we should do it in life.we can lower the Carbon footprinting by riding

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f30dfc56-9015-3a99-bcbe-cbf674b2799a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,with the more and more carbon going into the amosphere,the world have to face a lot of problems such as the rising sea level,strange climate and so on.As retun ,hunmun also get the problem such as the reduce of food harvest、the effect of people's healthy. So it have been a big problem which are serious by a lot of people.
To face the world problem,the concept of low-carbon life  win more and more people's hearts.We cannot develop without energy,on the opposite , we more and more relay on it.But the world cannot stand so many carbon gone into the amosphere.It have broken  the banlance of the nature.And as return,it also demage our life.So not only for ourselves but also for the future we must take action and face it together.
Let us to make a promose to get involte in it,we can do just like take a bus or don't use the plicit bags .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 032a2408-023b-31aa-b4da-209a14121a9e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,pollution of the environment becomes serious which cause people pay more and more attention to the Low-carbon Life.
In pace with mode of economic growth ,the number of car increases fastly which uses up natural resources quickly ,it make the environment becomes serious and it's one reason letting more and more people put in the Low-carbon Life,because they realize that just live in Low-carbon Life can our life become healthy ,cosy and vitality.
Low-carbon Life is not so far from us, we should put it in our daily life, for example , we should cherish our water and eletricity and use less and less car.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 060193c4-df66-3ce1-916e-01587d46877c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In rencent years,more and more people care about our earth andour enviorment.As the devoloped of our technology,the enviorment became week.So,we should do something to help our earth.
Low-carbon Life is hot topic in our life.people have realized the importance of  Low-carbon Life and they pay more attention on it. As you know,envoirment is very important for our life ,so lead a  Low-carbon Life can make our life better.If we don not care our earth even destory it,we and our sons cannot live well. Low-carbon Life not only can help the earth get well, but also can make us live more happy and our life better.our short of resource warning us must live a  Low-carbon Life.
Low-carbon Life could just speak ang write,we should do something to take part in the  Low-carbon Life.We should do what we can do for the  Low-carbon Life.We can turn off the lights when we leave our room,we can take the bus to school instead of our car.What we can do are not just these .If everyone can do something for the  Low-carbon Life, our earth and enviorment will be more beautiful.So,let us live a  Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 10da968d-07a9-3f11-9e23-dc2572ff8dd5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Most of people  pay more and more attention to the Low-Carbon Life in life.Because they became to know that it is important for us to live in a Low-carbon earth .As for us ,we should take up some masures to the Low-cabon Life ,First of all ,let us develop the emotion of" Low-carbon Life , me do it first" second it is a good idear to keep a good hobby to paint tree at weekend or some festivals ,which we can do some effect to our home .the last but no less, everyone should not wave the sourse like water ,electrity,because the Low-carbon life is built up  for the sourse.Noww,let us to make sure the dream of the Low-carbon Life ,we will have a fantistic future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 862590f7-18ff-3ba5-a536-73fa0ad81c60> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today the earth problem is more and more serious, such as greeanhouse effect, acid rain ,traffic emission more than ever time before, even than species extinction.That is attach to carbon burn. So people search of a life style live harmonious with nature, people pay close attention to Low-carbon Life,beacause it is key to solve the problem above.
People make many rule to make Low-carbon Life come popular. such as ban motocycle on the road,and take bus to go work or go to school  take the place of go by private car. The importance of  Low-carbon Life not only can solve the problem above ,but also can make the air fresh, the happen chance of illness will lower and lower.
Of course,it is better to do than to say. I will tell you how to live on a Low-carbon Life. Set up a suitable temperature for your air-condition.Take bus to go work or go to school.Close the TV or computer when you don't want to use.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 8b45d360-55c8-38b1-994b-d7273e08cfb3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Yesterday, our science was not as developed as it is now. And we lived with the nature in harmany. Today, our science and sociaty have a great development, but we no longer treat the environment as harmany as before.As men don't concern the nature and environment, the nature and environment have change a lot. Of course, have many bad impact on our lives.
Now, people have focused on it, think that low-carbon life is very necessary and important. If we don't do that, we, maybe, don't have the future.Because of high-carbon, the sea level up, goble warming, more and worse weather etc.So, we must take it seriously, do it from ourselves.
How to live a low-carbon life? It's easy! We can use more recyle resourses, instead of the fossial sourses. Take bikes and public bus. Turn off the power after you finish you usage of the mechine.
Make good use of all the things you have.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d7737b47-aa53-39a8-a577-9a21ab7ddbe8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the Gobal Warming,more and more people began to pay attention to the Low-carbon Life.
As we all know,source of the earth is limited,but we often waste source in our daliy life.So that a Low-carbon Life is very necessity ang important,which is not only helpful to protect environment , but also improve people's sense of environment.
As a common college student,what I can do is that actively taking part in all kinds of activities to make more people know about the Low-carbon Life.In addition,I can pursuade peolple around me to use Low-carbon product.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 542e6351-b7ca-3a17-be23-5a8897a9473d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society's quality,most people more and more concern Low-carbon Life.Now most countries's carbon gradually increase that results in improving tempreture,so we must decrease carbon.After all,let's know the importance of Low-carbon Life.Fist,decreasing population of air and protect enviroment.Second,saving electricity and water.Third,making the countries's economy constant develoment.Low-carbon Life,for people,it's a attitude.So we should know ture attitude.let me begin for Loe-carbion Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1a7bc6eb-fd82-399e-a10b-87aca6236e23> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon Life is becoming more and more popular in people's opinion. Many people are concerned about the protection environment.And low-carbon is very important to our life.
As we know,the earth is everyone's home.It has a lot of nature resources.However,nature resources are limit.They will disappear in one day.So we should live in low-carbon form.
If you want to have a low-carbon life,you must start doing something during your friend.When we go to the surpermarket to buy something,we can take a bag instead of the plastic bag.It looks a very simple thing but it is really the low-carbon form.
If all the people play a role on protecting our environment in low-carbon form,the earth will become more and more healthy.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9a32ae92-1169-3d14-aa0b-5a359396813a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,the worse and worse situation of environment is knowed by more and more people.The groble warming,the terrible air and the poluting water make the earth more and more difficult for animals and plants to live in. As we all know ,there is a new word called " low-carbon life ",which to appeal people to think highly of the protection of environment.
The imprtance of protecting environment and low-carbon life have konwed by almost pepople,even we can say it is self-evident. The excess carbon dioxide which produced by our human being make the air absorb to much hot of the sunshine.The hot make the average temperture top high which lead to higher and higher sea-level and unnormal climate.
As far as I'm concerned,"Low-carbon life"should be practised by every one live in our word.The word is not just a word we used in our article. Try our best to use our car less and walk more. Only in this way we can make our environment better and have a good life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d53c2a78-b618-3352-b1d0-ca63fadffd0c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It has becomes a heated disscion that living we should live in a low-carbon life.It can't be ignored that our earth has becoming more and more dangeous,which is influenced by all kinds of encironmental pollutions such as air pollution and water pollution and so on.
The great importances of living in a low-carbon life are mationed below.For the one thing,if we live in a low-carbon life,the living atmosphere around us will become better and the air will be more fresher.For the another thing,we can also save large numbers resource from our earth.Therefore,we call on all people to live a low-carbon life.
what we should do?As far as my knowledge is concerned,firstly,when we go out for work or school,we should walk instead of taking cars or buses.Walking is concerned as a green means,which is widely accepted by our people.secondly,in our life,we should not waste water and on the contrary we should save our water.As the saying goes'Not let our tears become the last drop of our earth.'Last but not least,it is of great importance for us to be models to teach our children to live a low-carton life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID dd677e4a-5103-324e-8bff-59135c0d924e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
"Low carbon" becomes one of the most popular buzzwords which gets the greatest concern,and people become more an more care about the Low-carbon life and environment potection.
It is important to us to lead a low carbon life .Becusse of the development of the world industrial economy,the fast increase of populatian,the unlimited increse of the human desire and lifestyle,our living environment,health and safety are becoming more and morer worse.For example,air and watetr pollution becomes worse.Therefore,low carbon life ie needed by man's own health,harmony between human being and nature and yhe development of mankind.
So,everyone should have a low carbon way in our dalylife.we must reduce or even not to use of the disposable tableware and plastic bags.Avoid ordering to much when eating out.More vegetable and less meat and so on .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 735c4da7-8b18-3ebd-aa21-bd2faea40457> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,people were increaseingly pay their attention to the low-carbon life,because in the modern secioty, transports were very popular in our life, but they produced  lots of poor gas which do harm to our body,people wanted to eat enough in the past, but we people were more and more cared about our health now,they learned to how to keep theyselfes fresh everyday,to live longer,to live healther.
It was very importance to recognize the nencessary of low-carbon life,we always  inflow the dirty gas which produced from the cars and factories, as time went by, we will became too weaker to protected ourselfs from the virus,we will got differences illness that day.more importantly,the gobal warming,which the most serious problems in the world,it made the levels of sea increase every year,which made danger to our humen being.
As a stdudent,we should do it from ourself,we can walk to school instead of by bus,we can go to the publics to declare the importance of low- carbon life,for our good future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 402e8d2e-f0b9-3aba-8d68-59b498f9e875> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the fast development of the sociaty,our commoon home-earth is being destroied,and the environment is becoming wrose,which doing much harm to  our health,so more and more people star to realise the inportance to protect the environment,just like a theme-Low-carbon Life.
Leading a Low-carbon life,we can have a good daily life ,include healthy food,peaceful environment around us and so on.What is more ,Low-carbon life can help protect the earth and  the environment,maybe it can save the clean water,green trees,blue sky and so on.
As a college student,we must be full to realise the inportance to protect our surroundings and try to be a role model from leading a Low-carbon life.We should understand that a clean,healthy environment can be very inportant for our life,so it is our duty to keep in mind to help our environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f5b879b7-cd28-3e99-8cde-b9c3638de2bc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the increasing carbon produce,the environment become worse and worse.As a result,people becoming to realize the importance of low-carbon life.
Why do people think highly in low-carbon life.Low-carbon is one of the most important point in protect the environment.Why do I say so?As we know,the sea level is higher and higher.There are numbers of sea-land disappered every year.At the same time,many a kind of animals are died out in every second.How did this happen?Because of the higher temper.As we can not difficult to find it is finally resulted from the over-produce of carbon.
Heal the earth,everyone must devoted ourselves in it.
In our daily life,we will find we can do a lot of thing to live a low-carbon life.For example,we can say no to the one-off chopsticks.Or just turn of the light when we no longer need it.Lost of simple thing in our life can make our life more beautiful.so what are you waiting for.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID dbbe2174-a3d0-38ce-84dc-eed86f7e12b1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the worse and worse environment,now people are more and more care about Low-carbon Life.
According to experts,Too much carbon in the air will cause the earth's temperature increased and make the ice melt,and then lead to the sea level rise.By that time most of the coastal land will be drowned,including low-elevation area of the inland,and people will be homeless.Not only that,High-carbon life cause Greenhouse effect,it will kill the majority of animal of the world.Imagine that,our future generations not only lose their home,but also lose their pets.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a6cf45a7-a9ea-37fe-9b5a-f38f79a34647> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, more and more people pay attation to the low-cabon life, on the one hand, the government produces a lot of electrical bus, especially the devoloped contries. On the other hand, the factory produces the low polluted machines, such as the low-out cars.
Why we are going to live a low-carbon life? Firstly, the global warming makes us upset. Secondly, we worry about the extrem climate, recent years, the earthquake and some other extrem climate attacked us frequantly. So we need to stop these,we need to protect our erath, we need to  live a low-carbon life.
How to live a low-carbon life? On no account can we waste any things,such as food, cloths and so on. We may take bus instead of driving car, use envirenmental-protect products, use envirenmental-protect bag. Protecting our mather earth, do it from now on, let us live a low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6551f798-a6e8-3437-be59-3cc5ca79b6a0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today's society is a highly developed technological society. However, the shortcomings in the development process are obvious, such as: carbon dioxide, and environmental pollution. But the most serious should be the carbon dioxide problem. Now the problem of global warming because of excess emissions of greenhouse gases. Excessive amount of carbon dioxide emissions, creating a diversified economy and La Nina phenomena lag disorder. Two levels of glaciers melting, polar animals lose their chance of survival at the same time, will lead to rising sea levels, many coastal cities into the water did not result in a few years later. Therefore, we must take the necessary measures to reduce the environmental impact of carbon dioxide. For example: tree-planting activities, reduce fossil fuel use, we can from our own, to promote low-carbon living

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b768b931-791f-3f2e-883d-0b0aa0cff623> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we known,carbon dioxide is becoming more and more around the world,the result of it that is the earth become warmer and warmer,so the human being are becoming more and more focus on the Low-carbon Life.Obiously,the Low-carbon Life is very imporimt for us,because it  can reduce air pollution,secondly,it can save a lot of energy,thirly,it can avoid glacier melting away and cause the level of sea rising,in a word,the Low-carbon Life is good for us forever,what do you think of?
After you knowed the good of Low-carbon Life,are you want to do something for it,come on,let us do it right now.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2fb61e2a-1230-38d1-9e64-8b55fe883de0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowaday,less and more less relize that the inportantce of the low-caebon life.Imagine that,on one day,when we see the dirty river pass our home;when we feel the city becoming hower and hower;when we hear some noise louder and louder…Should we stop our step and think what the low-carbon life really is?
Lucky,there are many people still considing our real "Green" life.There make up their mind to improve our living level.They also make some effect to stop any actions that would break our peaceful life.And now,under their call,more and more people are joining this team.Most of them can make scrifice for the low-carbon life.This is just a good beginning.
The earth is our only home to live.It just like our mother who has already fed us thousand and hundred years.we cannot find another planet to live now,so we must protect our home and we should do something for her.If we keep destorying her,she will put us into the most terrible cituation.So we need low-carbon life and take actions from now on!
How can we do for low-carbon life?Now,there are so many cars on the road,noisy and smelly.
When we want to go out,ok,we can use bycicle.we can watch less TV,play less computer and so on.we can do a lot of for the low-carbon life and we are on the  way

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e583bf88-6eb7-327b-8882-fda10529732c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,enviormental situation is becoming worse and worse.The government takes more attention to dealing with the confilct between economic development and enviormental protection.So the public begin to focus on low-carbon life.
What's low-carbon life?It means to lead a green and less-wasted life.For example,we use energy saving light instead of normal light,we use new energy like solar energy instead of oil or electricity.In this way,we can make full use of everything rather than wasting casually,we can save the resource for next generation,and we can be more and more healthy.
Our only earth is crying for being attacked by enviormental problem.For protecting our earth,let's lead a low-carbon life together.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e3883e91-1597-30f8-80dc-ea7a5945f560> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,more and more people are concerned about their life.Such as the air,the water and the food are the hotest life subject all the time.But now,many people have begun to  talk about a new topic--Low-carbon Life.
Everyone has known that our environment is becoming worse and worse.We must do something to protect our earth we live.So the Low-carbon Life was advised by many people.If everyone can do well in the Low-carbon Life,I think our new generations will still live on a pure earth.Otherwise,they will live a bad life without blue sky,clean water and fresh air.Therefore,begining the Low-carbon Life is not only for us,but also for our next generation.What's more,the Low-carbon Life will also affect our health and it can do help to decline the increasing carbon dioxide.
But Low-carbon Life need to act but not only say.It's a very important problem in our worse and worse environment.Let's take action,encourage the others around you and try your best in the Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e240a1ac-9030-3778-8e87-4931e1c6e093> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now people pay more and more attention to the Low-carbon Life ,and want to live a Low-carbon Life.
Low-carbon Life is not only important to us ,but also important to our earth.For one thing, we were lost many resources.For another,the enviroment of earth si become more and more bad.If we are not cherish earth ,we will have no place to live.Live in Low-carbon Life is benefit for our heath.We are less become ill.
To live a Low-carbon Life should be do from me.We should go by bycle when we go out.We should chrish water,light,

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 62943887-97ca-33f5-88bb-8e7e7bc174a6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people are more and more concerned about the Low-carbon life.Both to the human being's life and the development of the earth,the idea of living a Low-carbon life makes great sense.
As it known to us all,recent years the temperature all over the world is growing up,and it's really not a good signal.People have taken many measures to try to solve this problem.Among these measures,the Low-carbon life is the most important one.
The idea focus on reducing the release of carbon dioxide in order to keep the world's temperature from growing up and to improve the earth environment.Besides,Low-carbon life is also good for our health.In a word,people will benefit a lot from living a Low-carbon life.
Living a Low-carbon life,everyone of us should show our action.Here are some simple thing that we can do to live a Low-carbon life,such as drive less car or smoking less.In fact,if everyone try their best to live a Low-carbon life,our earth will become more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2b6bb39c-1d81-384f-8d6c-67d776f1ba37> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,pepple pay more and more attention to Low-carbon Life.,and Low-carbon Life also become a important part of the our life.
With more and more serious problems such as the increasing global temperture,the melting ice and the rising sea-levering,Low-carbon Life become too important to ruduce carbon emissions.
There are many ways we can do to reach the Low-carbon economic.Fristly,discovering others fuels which is more clean and more green to instead of the using of carbon.Secondly, we should have the save-energy conscious and do something which we can make ,for instance ,using the bus or bike rathar than car when you go out ,reuse the thing that can be recycle used, reducing the use of plastic bags.Last but not least,we should plant mort trees pr pther greenplants, in which way we can not onlu improve the envronment, butalso can make our home more beauty.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 81c84c63-55bc-35f4-a597-b905bd67057d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,our enviroment is polluted by ourselves and it becomes more and more serious. So,the people begin to take care of this problem,finally,we know the enviroment is importem for our life.So,we should protect it.How should we do it? To have a low-carbon life.
In our life,we often waste many enery and resources,but them are not endless on earth.if we always do it,we will not live on earth in the future.So,it is importem for us to have a low-carbon life.
How can we have a low-carbon life? First,we can not use plastic bags when we bay anythings.Second,if we go out,we should turn off the light.Third,we should surplus water,don't pour off it.Finally,we should't using one-off chopsticks and so on.
The low-carbon life,we can do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 75123e90-159e-3933-b418-9578ab4a1f58> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the sociaty,People are now more concerned about the low-carbon Life and it has became the most important life in all people.
Why did the Low-carbon Life can stand the led status ? Here are some points. First of all, Low-carbon Life is the healthy lifestyle which we are seeking. Secondly,as the growth in population,leadind to resource constraints,Low-carbon Life can saves more resource for the next generation.The last but the most,living with low-carbon is sign of social progress.
As long as each of us in life saving energy, even if it is a trivial point, also can reduce the burden on the Earth and our enivronment will be better and better, Our world will be more beautiful

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID aea2f460-f18d-3929-9b84-a0662f106c03> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the fast development of the sociaty,our commoon home-earth is being destroied,and the environment is becoming wrose,which doing much harm to  our health,so more and more people star to realise the inportance to protect the environment,just like a theme-Low-carbon Life.
What's low-carbon life?It means to lead a green and less-wasted life.For example,we use energy saving light instead of normal light,we use new energy like solar energy instead of oil or electricity.In this way,we can make full use of everything rather than wasting casually,we can save the resource for next generation,and we can be more and more healthy.
Our only earth is crying for being attacked by enviormental problem.For protecting our earth,let's lead a low-carbon life together.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 57347c19-2055-36c9-8ba5-c37d4568380c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Stepping into the 21st century,the cvilization of human is heading for its boom.During this historic period,in every field,the technoloy and the production is developing rapidly when the great pollution is also going with them.Besides,in recent year,more and more people has raise their awareness of the environmental protection, including the Lower-carbon life.
As we all know,every year and every day,people will produce a lot of litter which contains the mixture of carbon.When a large amount of these litter flows to the environment,with a series of reaction,it will make a terrible waste and pollution.Therefore,it is neccesary for us to reduce the carbon we produce in daylife.So it's no hard to anticipate that the lower-carbon life will become a popular tendency of the century.
What can we do to appeal to the lower-carbon life?Here are some advice for that:
1.Go out without driving the private car as much as possible.Choose to ride a bicycle,it's good for your physical and mental health.
2.Make your shopping get rid of the plastic bags.
3.Refuse to use the one-off product.And if possible,use something like water for the second time.Briefly,make a recycle use in your life.
4.Fit in a good habit of thrift.
5.Make sure there's no electric waste before you leave home.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f5a3e86-0b9b-35c4-9500-a043f53b33a8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As is well konwn to us, a majority of people concern about the low carbon life very much.Every day we can see there are lots of people promote that we should make the low carbon life come ture by all means.
As a matter of fact, in the last few years, the larger and larger population,more and more factories or companies, busier and busier traffic, etc. which made the quality of carbon higher and higher. Gradually, the level of the water was higher and higher thus they even covered some countries, which made numberous people became homeless.Also, hish quality of carbon made the weather changable that humen being couldn'n adapt to it. Therefore, we do need low carbon life and wait for no time!
From now on, we have better join the low carbon life from ouselves as well as from the some patato things.
Firstly, we ought to turn off the family mechines when we really don't need to use  them.Secondly, we can ask our friends or relaties go out on foot on by underground or bus so  that we can cut down the carbon-realising.Thirdly, we shoud plant as much as possible trees  so as to absord the carbon and realise the Oxgen to make the city beautiful.
In my opinion, if we can devote ourselves to the low carbon activities, the low carbon life will soonly come ture and everyone can enjoin their life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 066b0d8f-0d24-364e-a087-2d4cd10886d2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The population of our world is larger and larger. However,we have only a world,
which means ,we have limited resource which is used by an uncountable number of
persons.
It remians more and more people of the concept--Low-carbon Life.Maybe they have
realised that human beings will finally suffer the bad results for our  waste if we dont't
wake up as soon as possible.Therefore,they begin their Low-carbon Lifes through various
ways.For examples,they choose public traffic tools to go out or if they have to drive themelves,
they use clean fuels so as to reduce the harm to the environment,they will turn on
the only light they need at home and so on.
In terms of the importance of the Low-carbom Life ,except the above one,there are
other items: 1.As soon as we are the members of the world we live in ,we gain the
responsiblity to protect it;2.If we live in a place with uncomfortable smell and
harmful gas ,what will happen to our health? 3.Shall we  give our accendents a beautiful
and purity world for their lifes ?
When it comes to me a university student ,I will always warn myself not to waste.
Using a lower lamb is a good method to my Low-carbon Life,what about telling my roommates to
sleeep ealier at night? Let' start our Low-carbon Lifes together from now on !

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 71f00056-db60-35eb-8a83-4f99c7942832> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,along with the development of the society and people's level,more and more people begin to pay attention to the quality of their daily life.Everyone want a better environment to suvive.So,low carbon life becomes the most popular and heat topic.
As we all know,on one hand,carbon is necerssary for our physical boby as well as all the animals.But on the orther hand,it bring us some huge trouble if our humanbeing can not get along well with it.It can destory the balance of nature.If the carbon is much more than the standard,it will have defference on the climate.The tempreture will climb up day by day so that the oxygen just like the hot water ,and makes everyone uncomfortable.
so ,to protect our dear earth mother,to protect our lovely homeland ,all of us should do something to solve the problem.for example ,the bicicle cna take place the car when we are going to have a short distant trip.All in all ,letting the earth better is our responsibility.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f79d438c-98aa-3a27-ba0e-315449388fdf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As human beings gradually developing their society,they desire to obtain more
and more.people love all the luxurious life,beautiful houses,tall buildings and many
fancinating things. As a result,they destroy the eco-friendly nature envorionment,by
greedily carrying away maore and more nature resources.And this has resulted in the
dangerous crisis of the resources.
Nowadays,more and more people are cocerned with this limited resources problem
and have managed th make a uified system to get into the low carbon life.if we do not call
on all men in the world to have a life in loe carbon emission,the oxygen phenomenon will be
destoryed badly by our industrial working and transportation situation.What's more,what we have
done will release more and more carbon dioxide,which can not be compeletely absorbed by the plants.
Then,the temperature will rise higher and higher.The ice in the north pole and south pole
will turn into water causing the sea level rises and it will destry many refions along the
seashore.What a terrible thing!
In case of that,we should carry out a detailed action guidence plan to make our life
ensured in low carbon emission.Above all,we should do everything at the beginning from
ourselves.When we have done well on our jobs,then we have enough accounts on why we call on
others to protect our globe and what advantages have broutht us.
Come on,my friends,just do what you can do!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1ba2121e-dab0-38d9-8a04-958cdcf914a8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays people pay more and more attention to Low-carbon Life because of the worse and worse environment.As a matter of fact fact,it is of great importance for us to live a low-carbon life.One of the reason is that low-carbon life helps save our energy.Usually if we use some green ways to produce,it won't cost so much energy as traditional ways do.We need to save energy,and it is a fact that now we lack of energy.Secondly,the earth needs low-carbon life.As more and more carbon  dioxide has been produced,the atmosphere on the polar circle has been harmed seriously,which leads to the higher temperature on the eath.We have only a earth,but the fact is that its condition has been worse and worse,we may even be a spac-trash if we lost the earth.Furthermore,it's our responsibililies to do something for our sons,grandsons,ets,isn't it?Even we may live well now,can you imagine one day your sons may be sufferring a life like living in the hell?
Therefore,we should try our best to live a low-carbon life.In fact we can do a lot by doing something little.We can turn off the lights when we don't need;we can take part in some activities on low-carbon life...Anyway,we should do everything for low carbon,whether huge all little.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f803606-28ee-33d5-b9ac-b3077341d8db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With  the  constrution  of  the  environmentally  friendly  live,  noways,people pay  more
and  more  attention  to  the  environment  protection. Running for  a   low  carbon live  seems
to  be a significant  hot   topic.As you  can see ,the goverment publish some laws to restrain
the  factories,keeping them away from pdoducing harmful   things or  products,forcing them to
reduce  the producing  of carbon dioxide.  Meantime,people tend to afford for  low carbon
products.
As LOW CARBON  became a  commom noun,ir  urges  us  to  consider why  low carbon
live  is so essential.AS  we all know ,CO2  is a kind of  chemistry  gas,which is good for plants
and brings benifits to huaman in one sense,but it will cause great harm if it is over producing.
It harms the atmosphere of the earth and it makes the tempreture of the earth have a tendency
for getting warmer and warmer.What would happen if the tempreture keeps climbing up?Human
beings may be in danger.
Thus ,there is no doubt that we should take measure to reduce carbon dioxide.Actually,it
is  an  easy thing for everyone to do that,just a little step.NEVER use  one-off  chopsticks or boxes
Use less  plastic bag,Do not forget to turn off the light before you leave the room.Planting  trees
and flowers is an interesting and meaningful things as well.Always keep in mind:Reduce,Reuse
and  Recycle.
Do it together.Make it our home.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f803606-28ee-33d5-b9ac-b3077341d8db> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With  the  constrution  of  the  environmentally  friendly  live,  noways,people pay  more
and  more  attention  to  the  environment  protection. Running for  a   low  carbon live  seems
to  be a significant  hot   topic.As you  can see ,the goverment publish some laws to restrain
the  factories,keeping them away from pdoducing harmful   things or  products,forcing them to
reduce  the producing  of carbon dioxide.  Meantime,people tend to afford for  low carbon
products.
As LOW CARBON  became a  commom noun,ir  urges  us  to  consider why  low carbon
live  is so essential.AS  we all know ,CO2  is a kind of  chemistry  gas,which is good for plants
and brings benifits to huaman in one sense,but it will cause great harm if it is over producing.
It harms the atmosphere of the earth and it makes the tempreture of the earth have a tendency
for getting warmer and warmer.What would happen if the tempreture keeps climbing up?Human
beings may be in danger.
Thus ,there is no doubt that we should take measure to reduce carbon dioxide.Actually,it
is  an  easy thing for everyone to do that,just a little step.NEVER use  one-off  chopsticks or boxes
Use less  plastic bag,Do not forget to turn off the light before you leave the room.Planting  trees
and flowers is an interesting and meaningful things as well.Always keep in mind:Reduce,Reuse
and  Recycle.
Do it together.Make it our home.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 86a73861-3319-3291-8102-69af0a5d8411> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
At present,every country and people care about the low carbon life because our earth have polluted.And mang country go about dealing with the pollution of the earth.They encouge people to have the low carbon life.Low carbon life is very important of us.For one thing,our earth have polluted and our quality of life became bad.For another thing,the pollution affect our health. We should have low carbon life.Because the low carbow life can get us healthy life.So we should tackle.Frist,we can go somewhere by bike.And we can do something at home.For example,we can lock the air condition in the summer,open little light all so.As far as I am concerned,we should accept the low carbow life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID be76d3d2-d94f-3355-9a8e-b0a5a507ff2a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,our environment is getting warmer and warmer and the sea level is higher than before because of our daily life.
So,it is important to live a low carbon life which can be of great use of us.A low carbon life can help save energy.It can also protect the air from being polluted and reduce the amount of carbon dioxide which cause the greenhouse effect.
Therefore,we should live a low carbon life to make the world beautiful and clean.As a student,we should go to school by bike or on foot instead of in a motorcycle or a car.Second,we had better not use plastic bags to reduce white pollution.Last but not least,we should reuse water and paper.If everyone can do these,our environment will become better and better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cc93f792-e71d-3e40-96e6-8d12a5ff65dd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people take more attention to the low-carbon life and advocate to live a environmental protectional life.Because release the fewer carbon dioxide can protect our environment and to some extant,protecting The earth is to save our life . so,it is very necessary and important for us to live the low-carbon life.
In order to let our Earth work for a longer time ,we should live a low-carbon life from now on.Living such a life,you will fell very  healthy and comfortable.	Releasing fewer carbon dioxide,you will  fell the air is more freash.If we are not addimated to release carborn  dioxide,The earth will not load so long,so,your descendants will live in a terrible environment.Tough you are not care the feture,but you know,it is related to your own health.Would you rather live in a muddy air than a freash one？	As i konw,more people wanted to live a comfortable life.Therefore,in order to let us live for a longer time,we  ourself should take some messures to live a low-carbon life .
From now on,we should do more small matters from details and try our best to live a low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a6cf45a7-a9ea-37fe-9b5a-f38f79a34647> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, more and more people pay attation to the low-cabon life, on the one hand, the government produces a lot of electrical bus, especially the devoloped contries. On the other hand, the factory produces the low polluted machines, such as the low-out cars.
Why we are going to live a low-carbon life? Firstly, the global warming makes us upset. Secondly, we worry about the extrem climate, recent years, the earthquake and some other extrem climate attacked us frequantly. So we need to stop these,we need to protect our erath, we need to  live a low-carbon life.
How to live a low-carbon life? On no account can we waste any things,such as food, cloths and so on. We may take bus instead of driving car, use envirenmental-protect products, use envirenmental-protect bag. Protecting our mather earth, do it from now on, let us live a low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6ec26131-7ed3-3b42-a062-df1568e74adf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,technology depends faster and faster.More and more mechine are invented.They change our life, but at same time, they made our environment bad.
For looking for a good environment,many people believe that live with  a low-carbon life is a good way. In this way,the green gas house will be slowed down even be stopped.Low-carbon life not only to protect our environment but also to help us to keep bodies health.
In my opinion, low-carbon life is an important thing but no a difficult thing.All of us can do from now on.I make up my mind that I will live a healthy life.Bicycle is the first choose is I want to go out.I will go to bed early and get up early, so I will bulit a good body and save electrisity at the same time. Just some daily actions, we will live a low-carbon life and protect our only Earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 5ea65303-660c-3088-8b77-37849161818f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,many people are paying more and more attention to low-carbon life.And what's the concept of "low-carbon life"? It means the life that reduces resource-waste and is environment-friendly.
As we know,the resouce of the earth is relatively  rare to a large population living on the earth. If we don't take some measures to save energy,the reasource will be run out and we will be confused of what to use.So it's important and essential for everybody to live a low-carbon life.For transportation,we may use bus or take bicycle instead of driving a car.For food-packing in the restaurant,we can bring our food-box while not using the disposable goods. And we may do more things to support a low-carbon life in our home: reduce the unessential using of electric machines,reduce the waste of paper and fully use the newspapers or magazines that you have read,eat the food on your own plate out at every meal ,plant some green plants in your balcony......and more details in life you can pay attention to.
Live a low-carbon life ,from your own steps.If everyone's power are gathered,it's amazing!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3717465d-e6b9-3d1d-b9a4-ed92f74409a3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people have been awared of the importance of living in low-carbon lifestyle.Many countries have made some agreements on low-carbon life,which encourage people to insist on it.
Although many people are trying living in low-carbon lifestyle,still some people do not intend to change their lifestyle.So it is our duty to let them know the significance.For one thing,material is limited.We can't waste material any more for we have wasted it for many years because of the poor technical condition.If we were going to live and produce like before,the younger generation would live a hard life for the lack of material.For another,the pollution is serious now.It has affected people's health.If we can live in low-carbon lifestyle,we can gain profit from it.
To build a low-carbon city even a low-carbon country,everyone should try their best.As a college student,I will do what I can do to make contribution on it.First,I will go to school by bus to reduce the exhaust.Second,I use environmental-friendly bag rather than paper bags or plastic bags.Last but not the least,I will ues paper both of two sides.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a571075e-c833-315d-96bb-73d98c28573c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,pepole care more about theri daily life and the surrounding they live.But because of the gobel warming,the earth suffers a lot of pain so that it turns worst and worst.However,after a series of research,pepole point out the solution of environmental pollution,Low-carbon life.For living a happier and more comfortable life,recently,pepole care more ande more about low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life is  a good way to solve the pollution problem in our life,it can help us produce less carbon in order to reduce the carbon percent of the air,so that the air of the earth can be cleaner ande cleaner.What's more,with the better air,water will be more beautiful and the surface of the earth will be more safe.Meanwhile,our life will be happier than before.
Let's start a low-carbon life right now.Everyone should have a responsibility to protect our earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 14de2efb-b55c-3554-bb29-b371940de2a4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,low-carbon life has been a hot issue in discussion.
As the society develop, more and more people are concerned about their life's qualities.
However, at the same time, we are stuck with many enviromental problems by using the synthetic products. For example, the golbal warming, the sea level rising, the green house ect. We will be faced with the diszaster unless we take the effected measure. Therefore, the low-carbon life become the hot topic in nowdays.
Actually, the low-carbon life is not far away from our life. Oppositly, we can live a low-carbon life in everything we do. For example, we can turn off the light when we leave the room. What's more , we can take the public transportation instead of driving private cars to decrease the carbon dioxide. It's not only improve our life's standard, but do more harm than good for our children.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f960a46b-0e7c-3059-964c-cff951d4570e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people are focusing on low-carbon life,especailly in big cites which are facing a serius problem of air pollutions like Beijing and Shanghai.
There is no doubt that low-carbon life is of significanty to people's lives.Firstly,leading low-carbon life means that we can live in a fresh enviroment without any air pollution.Secondly，it is helpful for people to preserve their healthy bodies.Thirdly,the most important thing is that it can not only strength people's thoughts to protect our world,but also permote them to decrease air pollution as well as increase green plants.
As a college student,I think that to lead low-carbon life,we can do smalls things in our details.We can plant more trees to protect our forests so that it can breath more carbon dioxide,making our world more beautiful.Moreover,we can try to ride bicycles to go to work and school,decreasing polluted air.Finally,it is a good idea that we use air conditionors less.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bd6254a5-ee17-3043-a451-562f4c34591a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays people talk more about protecting our environment because too much pollution
is damaging our world. As wo all konw, the energy in our world is limited but with the
development of economy,more and more energy is needed. So how to deal with this unbalance
relationship? Some scholars put forward the conception of Low-carbon Life.
As for as i am concerned, it is vital that peole change their life into low-carbon
life.My point is based on the following reasons.First,as i have mentioned in the fist paragraph,
our limited resource is unable to saticefied the fast development of economy.what's more,
people don't chrish the limited resource and use it without restrictions.Second,living a
low-carbon life is benefitcal to the healthy development of economy because it suggests
using low-carbon energy. Third, it will be more healthy for people as living a low-carbon
life may need people do more sports such an riding bike and walking on foots.
To protect our world better,we need to put our low-carbon concept into practise.
It is easy for us to live a low-carbon life.For example, when the destination isn't too far,
we can choose to walk or ride our bike instead of driving car.When we are plan to have a trip
with our friends,so why not we just drive a car if we have just 4-5 persons? It is our duty
to protect our world so don't  be hesitate.Just do it !

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bd6254a5-ee17-3043-a451-562f4c34591a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays people talk more about protecting our environment because too much pollution
is damaging our world. As wo all konw, the energy in our world is limited but with the
development of economy,more and more energy is needed. So how to deal with this unbalance
relationship? Some scholars put forward the conception of Low-carbon Life.
As for as i am concerned, it is vital that peole change their life into low-carbon
life.My point is based on the following reasons.First,as i have mentioned in the fist paragraph,
our limited resource is unable to saticefied the fast development of economy.what's more,
people don't chrish the limited resource and use it without restrictions.Second,living a
low-carbon life is benefitcal to the healthy development of economy because it suggests
using low-carbon energy. Third, it will be more healthy for people as living a low-carbon
life may need people do more sports such an riding bike and walking on foots.
To protect our world better,we need to put our low-carbon concept into practise.
It is easy for us to live a low-carbon life.For example, when the destination isn't too far,
we can choose to walk or ride our bike instead of driving car.When we are plan to have a trip
with our friends,so why not we just drive a car if we have just 4-5 persons? It is our duty
to protect our world so don't  be hesitate.Just do it !

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 94b480b1-75e5-3553-b275-99e324e5f4ba> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developing of our society and ecomic,the level of our lives seem to be more and
more high.But is it the reaclity? You know that we use more carbon than the other time in our
rencent lives .At the same time ,a lot of kinds of pollution appeared.All things sound very
poor.Hower,it is such appriciated that human start to concen about it more and more carefully.
It is very impourant to life with low carbon,it is also called low-carbon life.So,what is
its impourants.Frist,the biggest problem-environmental problem will been turning to the good
side,and the level of our life will really be improved to a higer one.Then,everything will make
its own use,and our society will have more resocous in this way.
Low-carbon life is a heality kind of life.What we could do for it is to do everything in
our life.Let's go！

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a506cf89-0ba9-3986-b76f-0b210f199ed5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of society and economy, human beings pay more and more
attentions to our environment and life, especially the improvment of our daily life. Because
of human's activities, gas emission has become a big environmental problem, which has affected
the earth we live. Such as the global warming and air polluted.
Therefore, it's a must for the whole world'people to put forward the low-carbon life. What
low-carbon means that live better but little pollution. Only in this way, can we reduce the damage
to our earth, to our environment but get along well with them. Otherwise, more and more pollution
or damage, finally the earth will not afford the hurt so that it does harm to our each person, which
not mention our dreams and life.
For me, in order to put the low-carbon life into our daily action, I will take bus rather than
personal car, recycle the water to wash the floor, adjust the temperture of the air-condition
above 26 degrees in summer and so on. The most important is that keeping these in everyone mind.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a506cf89-0ba9-3986-b76f-0b210f199ed5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the development of society and economy, human beings pay more and more
attentions to our environment and life, especially the improvment of our daily life. Because
of human's activities, gas emission has become a big environmental problem, which has affected
the earth we live. Such as the global warming and air polluted.
Therefore, it's a must for the whole world'people to put forward the low-carbon life. What
low-carbon means that live better but little pollution. Only in this way, can we reduce the damage
to our earth, to our environment but get along well with them. Otherwise, more and more pollution
or damage, finally the earth will not afford the hurt so that it does harm to our each person, which
not mention our dreams and life.
For me, in order to put the low-carbon life into our daily action, I will take bus rather than
personal car, recycle the water to wash the floor, adjust the temperture of the air-condition
above 26 degrees in summer and so on. The most important is that keeping these in everyone mind.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 757c8862-fca8-3f21-992d-a9dde13def0d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years, more and more people have awared of the importance of Low-Carbon Life,and it gradually becomes a
fashion lifestyle. Also, a number of people, both at home and abroad, have taken action in environmental friendly
activities,such as tree planting. It seems that Low-Carbon Life must be a trend in the following decades.
Report has it that nature disasters are becoming more and more frequently in recent decades. And according to some of
the scientists, too much carbon dioxide in this age may be one of the main factors. As everybody knows, green house gas which
caused by carbon dioxide have already led to the melty ice of our north pole, which means a wide range of coast areas will be
flooded in the following years. Besides, we are going to suffer from the shortage of food and water, the extream weather,and
so on.
Actually, it is very easy to reduce the carbon dioxide in our daily life. We should turn off the electric appliances
when they are not used. We can choose public transportation, car-pooling instead of driving our own car. Moreover, government
should take action to plant more trees and preserve forests. It is high time that we should do something to feed back our mother
nature. Why not try and lead a Low-Carbon Life right now?

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c23d7e5e-aab3-32dc-8837-4af9f06f52f5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,the low-carbon lifestyle is becoming more and more popular in the world.You may hear and see it in anywhere and anytime.
The concepts of low carbon life means low energy and no waste.For many natural disasters are happened during recent years,most of people are aware of the importance of taking active action to protect the environment.While low-carbon lifestyle is needed and useful to reduce the pollution and protect our home.Anyone who had ever seen the movie <<2012>> or <<the day after tomorrow>> will have the feeling,that what we are trying to do today is trying to save ourself.
Well,as the saying goes,every big thing comes from the subtle.Everyone,it doesn't matter you are rich or poor,you are adult or child,it is your duty to do your best to make the world clean and beautiful,for you live in this planet.It is not difficult to live in low-carbon lifestyle,you just turn off the light when you are not need,more foot on the way for work or school and less car,reuse your clothes,paper,textbook,use bags instead of plastic bags,less TV and computer and so on.
All in all,just keep it in your mind,and keep going,our beautiful home will come back.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 50b82c9f-474a-3456-a9f7-d88a0a98e15a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, people pay more and more attention to low-caron life. We can reach the information and news about low-carbon life here and there such as newspaper, internet,bus station,advertisment and so on. Low-carbon life has become a hot topic in the world.
Why people pay so much attention to this topic is that low-carbon is very important and necessary to our morden society. As the economy is developing quickly, the environment in the earth is becoming worse and worse.The carbon dioxide is so much that the earth is becoming hot. In order to have a nice future and leave hunman beings a health earth, to have a low-carbon life is necessary.
Now that have a low-carbon life is so important, i will do it down on the earth. To have a low-carbon life is not a difficult thing or a big deal. You can get it through little things in your Life.Such as , turn off the light when you leave the room, take buses or the subways when go out instead of drive your primiry car and so on. Don't be hesitate,just do it,these little things  comes together and will become a big things. The world will make a change because of these little things.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 273148ba-04b5-3c2d-af9b-a75e0ed73139> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the unexpected explosion of the population on the earth, the provision of the resource and environment
is reaching its limitation.As the result,we begin to focus on the protection of our resources and lead a low-carbon life.
With the boost of the economics,we unevitably run out of our precious resources formed billion years ago.And what's
worse,we are polluting our environment where more and more rare species are gradually going to distinction.If there is no
any measure taken to stop the trend,we human-beings will be the last specie disappear from the earth. Therefore,low-carbon
life will disaccelerate the step of the bad effect spread all over our life.We need to take the priority of such a new style
of life.
A big achievement is accumulated from a lot of tiny success everyday.So we need to take measures from ourselves.First,
we should not abuse our product and learn to use it in an appropriate way.Second,we need to keep an eye on our affect of the
production on our environment.If it do great damage to it ,we should consider lowering down the amount of emission.I hope the
low-carbon life can improve our quality of life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f1ea923d-0ea3-366e-9edc-77febe1625ce> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
When reading these two topics,I have been arrested by Low-carbon Life.Nothing could be more
well-talked than it.
As we all know ,our environment is tending to be worse and worse because of our human being's
detroyment.And there are courtless problems ouccuring to our daily life,following the environmental sickness.It forces people to pay more attention to the protection of environment and Low-carbon Life.
Just imagine that what our appearance would be and that where we can live without fear?If this
situathion keep going in this way ,the imagination above will be tore down without mercy.It's of great importance to suppot low-carbon life daily.It is required that all of us,all the fields of walks,to join this movement from right now.
What can we do in our daily life?That should be the first question to occur to our mind necessarily.Many big changes should take place.Our way to live must be changed.For example,we can using the Low-carbon furniture instead of the High-carbon one,like stone chairs and plastic chairs.And it must be forbidded to use those things,which will develop much carbon, purely for fun or for entertainment,such as racing car.
Now we need to change attitude towards the quality of life:the high-quality life should be a low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c11676b5-a8c6-3568-a7b9-38902a6db7f8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As time go by,as people's life quality go better and better,newaday,they more and more think about the Low-carbon Life.
From the goverment's new,the worth goes more and more warm because we protect over the carbon;it lead to the level of sea go over,it's no deal that the sea will over our home on the futher if we don't think about this problem.
Behinds,it also lead to some healthy problem and influence people's boby;the more inprotant is than it lead to the anamil's life,and have leat to many anamil dead out.Maybe many people thihk this no influence their life,it only influence anamil not our,so we should make too more on it.This thinks is wrong,do you think after anamils is not human being; don't remember we also anamil.
So Low-carbom Life is so improtant,no also for you ,also for your body.
We must use the Law-carbon thing,and protect anamil,the more improtant is that the all human are hand and hand.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d966712a-efcb-3e42-bc51-864c1182c857> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of environment protection, more and more people now are concerned about the Low-carbon Life which is very important to our environment. Nowdays, our environment has became so bad for us to word or study without clean air, clean water...All of this has done harm to our daily life. It seems that the environment has been so terrible, so we must do something to chang it. Low-carbon Life is good idea. High-carbon Life has done great damage to our environment.With Low-carbon Life, our environment will be better. Everyone hopes to live in a place which has chean air ,clean water...To achieve this, everyone of us should devote us to the environment protection, and the Low-carbon Life could be a good beginning.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2ae2a1d0-a0b1-371b-a8b9-f9bac8cb4f47> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our environment is becoming more and more terrible，the air  is dirty，water is polluted，even more，the earth is becoming warmmer．With so much bad things ocuur，people realize the importtance of our environment.                                                               With the hot of low-carbon life,more and more people join in it,they  try their best to do it.Such as turn off light when they go out,and go out with a bike instead of by bus or taxi.Everyone realize the importance of low-carbon life,and they want to take part in this activety.                                                                  As we know,the raise of temperuture will bring a lot of teriffy things.In African,the high temperture will make the animals hard to live,because where the palace lack of water.What's more,the ice will dispeare,which will make the sea level rise,our land will dispeace.Only we can save ourself,we should pay more attention to it.Live a Low-carbon Life,we can do it,and we have to do it,everyone should join it!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 29df0a0e-0da1-3c18-8643-0e2c2d19357d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,environment is very important to us.Espesically today,as  the economy develops,the environment is more and more bad.Now,we call on Low-carbon Life to save the environment.
First,because we should take some mesauges to protect our living environment,so Low-carbon Life is need to do it.Little by little,person realize the importance and pay more attention on it.For exanple,many people go to work on foot instead of driving.Also,more and more people plant trees to decerse the carbon.In my own opinion,the most important is that people take concern on Low-carbon Life and begin to do it.
Secondly,why should we choose Low-carbon Life?Because it is important to the environment.While,what is the importance?First,we should realize the poblem faced to us now.The carbon is too much to us so it cause many terrible things to us such as the templige is higher than before.Many sea level is high so many country's area is become small.Also,summer is hotter so we feel uncomfortable.While,Low-carbon Life can save the problem.So,it is very important to us.
Thirdly,we must do it,we shouldn't be selflish.The world is not just mine.It is everyone's include our grandchildren.
Let us do it,live in a Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f8041c0-8ba3-3989-a0b0-7d8287f6722f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As low-carbon life is advocated by environment protecters, more and more people pay attention to low-carbon life.It is very obvious that  our high energy consume makes our earth weaker and weaker. And beacuse of it, we will use out off our energy on the earth soon. What's worse , our next generation will face the huge short of energy which may destory human's civilacation. Beside, high-carbon life is base on the high pollute ,such as gobal warming, warter pollution , which means that we are killing ourselives slowly. Also,high-carbon life may bring a lot of disaste. However ,low-carbon life can overcome these disadvantages. Low-carbon life dose good to our humen' devolope.
In my opinion,I am real agree with low-carbon life. In orther to carry out it, I will do it from myself. For exemple, I will turn off the lights if I don't need it, save warter.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 55a65f8a-fb5a-3ad1-ba56-04e5abeb74d1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the science and technology develop, more and more people are pay more attention to the Low-carbon Life now.    Every day, we always talk about that how to make our life better and how to live a low-carbon life.
It's very important for us to reduce the carbon dioxide, because less carbon dioxide, our common family-Earth, will more beautiful and our life will more health.
In my opinions, every one should protect our home every time .we can turn off the electric source in time if you won't use the electrical equipments, it only decrease carbon dioxide discharge, but also protect your equipments.  Are you want to go out, you can choose take a bus or ride a car with other.  Low-carbon life is make up of you action what you do every day.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID eb8da878-2167-3053-b63a-96dee263ff98> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
At pretent ,as the economic developed ,but the environment became worse,more and more people concern about the low-carbon life 。There's  no doubt that low-caibon life has become more popular ,because low-carbon life is so fit for 21st .Now the material is reducing gradually and the polution is becomeing worse,so we human have to do something to save our Earth .As we known,there is more and more carbon diocese being put in Earth，as a result ,The Earth become wormer .So we should try to have the low-carbon life right now ,maybe we can make full use of our paper and ride the bike as much as possibe not take the car mean-while,we can hold the activities to ask people to concern about low-carbon life that our environment will become better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a1550d9a-fd4f-3eb5-8878-fe2c00a5eb00> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today more and more carbon at the atmousfour.because we for the develop break the atmousfour, so that we must have a low-carbon life and protect the envermount .
we know the earth is the only plance can to live,because many people want find a plance but the can't.so we should protect the earth.I think
we have a low-carbon life is a very easy things,and a very useful way. every people can do it,and need't more .the envermount have a balance if wa broken it ,it's hard to back .low-carbon is a easy things for example as a student use less peaple ,protect the green and so on.but the most importent is the goverment.a country must have roul about the envermount only this the people of the conutry have a low-carbon life,but the people must know the earth is ours .have a low-carbon life  ,not only we can have a healthy life bnt also can protect the earth .
don't think is hard to become, only do some things above our life is okey.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 88b95cfa-0194-3045-a687-5808f861c55d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the social developed,our life becomed more and more rich,but at the same time,our developement have put more and more carbon into the air.
Why we said the low-carbon life was importanted,because the carbon would make our world become warm.As the world weather become warm,mang,searious damage will take place,such as typhoo,flood,and so on.Now more and more people knew we should increased the carbon and begin to life low-carbon,andkown the important of the low-carbon life.
What should we do in the daily life for the low-carbon.In our daily life we can do many things,such as electrical energy saving,go to school by bicycle,increased to use the personal car,go to word by bus or by foot,and use the clean energy.Now,our world have a action named Earth Hour,in thhe action people will stay off the lights for one hour for a event.Since then,Earth Hour has grown into an international event,more and more people kome the important of the low-carbon in the event.
Now low-carbon life is spreadomg every corner of our country

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 8f790681-61f0-3bf1-a0df-7941eba8b31d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon is a heat word now, people focus on it because the envirnomence problem is more and more serious, the ice in the Arctic begin to melt, and the atmosphere is weaker and weaker , so people want to protect the envirnomence.
So, what is meaning of Low-carbon life? It may be something to do with the carbon dioxide. The carbon dioxide is very important. Low-carbon life is a kind of a healthy life, it not only do well with the envirnomence, but also benefits our own life. We should do something meaningful to protect our common family--the Earth. Such as plant tress, go out by bus or by bike or on foot and so on.
Live a low-carbon life is not a hard work, but it needs everyone to form a sense about it and observe its rules. So from now on, please live a low-carbon life, to protect our family, and to enjoy your life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e45a7852-c2fc-3031-8f77-552ad37dd656> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, people are paying more attention to the low-carbon life, which is very important to our earth. We can’t left our earth so we must live in low-carbon life so that we can save our earth which is worse and worse.
There are some points tell us the necessary of low-carbon life. Frist of all, low-carbon life is more healthy. If we in low-carbon life  means that we should eat more vegetables instand of flesh.Vegetables are well for our body. Secondly, low-carbon life can take a more cleanly environment to us. If the carbon of air less and less, we can breathe more fresh air.Last but not least, low-carbon life can save more energy that means we can use the limited energy of our earth longer.
In a word, low-carbon life is very necessary for us so that we should keep in. We should do something for low-carbon life and keep doing those every day.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ddb5492c-1820-3173-97c5-ef76c31c98c7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the society's develoment,people pay more attention to the low-carbon life which is related to us.Also,as the report says that low carbon make a inportant role in our life.
First,low carbon can prevent the earth becoming warmer,which is a serious problem now.So it is the helf of the earth and the human.It can save our lives.Second,low-carbon life make us use less resource,then it can save  many things ,such as woods,rivers and so on.In this way,the earth can become more beautiful and cleaner.Finally,in other way,low-carbon life can imorove our environment awarement.Environment awarement is very inportant in nowdays.It can influence the earth's sustainable development.
All in all,low-carbon life is necessary for us.It is not for someone,everyone have duty to try our best to do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 92b01b86-5d5a-33e3-bf09-39746df2d7fb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,green-house effect has made severe influence little by little,ice-mountain changes into water,leading sea-level risen.if we don't take some meassure,sea water may luin the land one day.Of course,it will cause many living things die out because they could't stand with high temperature.
Low-carbon life is very important,and more and more people concern about it.But how can we do?Autually it is easily to accomplish.If possiblily,we take bus or cycly instead of driving car as we can, don't use oil too often,plant some trees and so on.And we should tell others to know the importance of low-carbon life and do it well now by ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 20debdc2-f8be-33a8-9c04-e784d1f46f3f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all ,more and more people pay attention to low-carbon life.
Leadind a low-carbon life is a fashion trending and benefit to our world.
In my opinion ,having a low-carbon life is necessary for us to have a better future and we all should think highly of it.There are many reasons ask us to do it .Above all,its a healthy life style which can slow down the speech of globe-warming since globe-warming phenominon is more and more serious.Nowadays,we can easily to hear the sea level is raising the tempereture is higher and higher.What is worse, the north pole bear is in danger and some ialands are destoryed as the sea level raising. Having a low-carbon life remind people not to waste energy because most carbon is from the use of energy.The energy we can use is very limit so we should enrich it and do not waste it.
To protect the world is the responsbility of everyone and leading a low-carbon life is the a basic action which we can do in easy!
In the end ,to protect our mother and our health ,let us live in low-carbon!作文题一：

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a6cf45a7-a9ea-37fe-9b5a-f38f79a34647> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now, more and more people pay attation to the low-cabon life, on the one hand, the government produces a lot of electrical bus, especially the devoloped contries. On the other hand, the factory produces the low polluted machines, such as the low-out cars.
Why we are going to live a low-carbon life? Firstly, the global warming makes us upset. Secondly, we worry about the extrem climate, recent years, the earthquake and some other extrem climate attacked us frequantly. So we need to stop these,we need to protect our erath, we need to  live a low-carbon life.
How to live a low-carbon life? On no account can we waste any things,such as food, cloths and so on. We may take bus instead of driving car, use envirenmental-protect products, use envirenmental-protect bag. Protecting our mather earth, do it from now on, let us live a low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6c3e7408-9dad-30be-af5c-1979e7c66e8c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
People take more and more attention to low-carbon life .
Low-carbon life have many advantages for ourselves.For example it can  help us save many kinds of resouce .It can also decrease the population of university.For ourselves,it help us save our
money.
Low-carbon is not a difficult for us .We can do many things in our life.For example we can take
off light when we leave the room .we also can go to school or go to word by bike,not by car.As a
number of student,I know most of students play computer games all the day in weekends.We can change the life.Such as play in outdoor with classmates .We used to write our words on sunday evening that take up our sleep time.It not only hurt our healthy , but also not good for us to live on low-carbon.
Low-carbon is important ,every one can do many things in our surrounding for it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f3d561ed-35a6-3f61-9b33-d2b8bd233330> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now some important things had been found on the newspapers,books,news on TV,which were not payed more attention.Such as:earquake,water disaster,typhoon...Until now ,there was no doubt that people all over world started caring about them.So the government asked people to live low-carbon life.
What would be the reason to cause them?and why should we live the low-carbon life? Because what we done could decrease carbon-oxyen that is an important reason why the nature disaster .And the resouce on the earth is limited.Only do we live a low-carbon life ,we can live on earth happily and give a good room to our children.What's more,this is a good way to improve us.
everyone can do something for low-carbon life .In my view,we can turn off the light,fans,fridge when we don't need them.Apart from this, what pay a role important is the factory.They released a lot of carbon-oxyen when their magines were in work. As a student like me,I would choose the first way and persude more people to join me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6ec26131-7ed3-3b42-a062-df1568e74adf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,technology depends faster and faster.More and more mechine are invented.They change our life, but at same time, they made our environment bad.
For looking for a good environment,many people believe that live with  a low-carbon life is a good way. In this way,the green gas house will be slowed down even be stopped.Low-carbon life not only to protect our environment but also to help us to keep bodies health.
In my opinion, low-carbon life is an important thing but no a difficult thing.All of us can do from now on.I make up my mind that I will live a healthy life.Bicycle is the first choose is I want to go out.I will go to bed early and get up early, so I will bulit a good body and save electrisity at the same time. Just some daily actions, we will live a low-carbon life and protect our only Earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 930efb18-8f99-3448-94e4-4258520c76d4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the people's life qualiy,nowadays,more and more people pay more attention to the low-carbon life.
As far as I am concerned,it's very important for us to live in the environment of low-caron life.In the present,our living' environment has becoming worse and worse which we all know.If we aren't able  to change it,we will not live on the earth well.What is worst,our child only live in a worse environment which we are unwilling to achive.If we have a low-carbon life,not only we,but our child will have a happy life .So,we should protect our environment and save our natural resourse which is good for human.
I believe,only we can do it by ourselves,will we have a happier life.So,we should take a potive attitude toward the low-carbon life in order that people can live better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID aefeefbe-011c-31f1-ba17-50148dc55439> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,more and more people care about the environment of our world.So,Low-carbon Life becomes the most fashional topic in our life.
Carbon what used very widely in our life，is necessary for us.Maybe，we can't do everything without carbon.For a example,if we cook,we should use carbon;if we driver,we should use carbon;if works want to produce,they should use carbon.....There are so many carbon dioxide in our life and our environment become bad!So Low-carbon Life is very important for us ——human beings.
Low-carbon Life not only can protect our environment,but also save our money.We should do it from little thing and we should use our phenomenon to affect others to take part in our activity.Then the earth will become more and more health.Let's do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7745c0b8-85e2-33de-b876-4bc0520e53bf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
At present,the problem about environment is becoming seriously more and more.More and more people have realized this，so people have take more care about environment,to live a low-carbon Life.
Living a low-carbon Life will put domt the carbon using,offer us the nice oxygen，give us more blue sky.So we can live a nice life.We can live long time more,can see our humen the future more.
Living a low-carbon Life,do it in our daily life.we can use environment-protection prodaction,we can use less water,electricity.It is not just for protecting environment,can save money too.And more,we can persuade people aroud us to do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a70430db-31ec-3476-a20b-66f1f50afb4f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people more and more care about the Low-carbon life.The reason why people feel anxious is that the weather become worse and worse such as earthquake,tsunaml and typhoon.Besides,people realize that bad have threaten their normal life.For example,the disaster bring serious lose even make people lose wealth even their life.So obviously,the importance of Low-carbon life has been aware of. Firstly,many people let go driving private car and choose bus or on foot.Secondly,people don't waste electricity any more.What't more,people never throw rubbish at will
Due to those,low-carbon life is obbligato.If it become worse,the ice  of south would melt puicker .And  the sea level would go up And many cities will be flooded so that many people will become homeless.At the time many coutries would sink into chaos.
So we mnst begin from ourselves in order to achieve low-carbon life.And our offspring could have better life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b983622b-9395-3684-aa8c-5a1a47b6c1a5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of the modern industry,the environment has been destoryed very serious,so we should take some measures to protect our environment.Wherever and whenever carbon-diaoxygen was produced and take different influence.The global greenhouse is the main expression.
As the time going,more and more people are care about their life,and the one of the healthy topic is Low-carbon Life.Somebody would ask why to living Low-carbon Life is so important.I think that we should not destory the balance in our environment and try our best to keep it,because it's our home.It also express sustainable development which can protect the circustens and is fair to our descendant.
Actually,to living Low-carbon Life is not need big contribution,but we can do anything to it.First,like turning off light when you are not need it and planting some plants in your house.Then if you have enough time,you can take the public bus instead of driving.Others,you can prevent others who need to destory the environment.
In the other world,you can do anything to help your home.Don't when our house have been destory,we only realize the important of it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f7a44042-36ef-3131-9ade-a12312f54ab1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
People take more and more contation to Low-carbon Life today,it's cause by many reson.First our lives are becoming better than past,so we star caring more our health lives.And because of many reson,such as we burn lots of wood,we face Goal-worm polblem nowadays.Than High-carbon Life will influnce our health lives and all animal's lives,if we don't get in Low-carbon Life,we couldn't live long,the earth couldn't live long,and we have no future.
So Low-carbon Life is importent to us,we must get in it.And Low-carbon Life must begin by yourself,by any thing.Nothing can be done,if no one to begin.We could plan trees,because trees can turn down carbon air.And we could write on computer instead of using paper.Also we should ride bike to cut down using car.
there are many things to do to get in Low-carbon Life,when we take this in heart ,we could do better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e5ac7f28-c386-380f-8ae8-5cf3a85b88a3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Energy is not enough for everyone so we have to save energy.Low-carbon Life is as important as that scientists create new energy.Everyone should have a Low-carbon Life.Low-carbon Life is not difficult.We just turn off the light on daylight.We just use water as less as we can.We just go to outside to do more sports and play less co mputer games.This is Low-carbon Life.Low-carbon Life's core is save enegy.We just save it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4587ea68-3cae-35ae-a36c-3a99ca529a86> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays more and more people pay attention to the low-carbon life because it helps us protect the environment and do good to us human.
Why can it do this?Firstly low-carbon life request people go to work by bus and shut down machines which they do not use as possible,which can cut down the porution of harmful air.Secondly it decreases the use of energy so that help protect the natural resource if we do like that.Last people also have a more beautiful environment to live.
Low-carbon life does not need people do many big things.What people need is do from small things.For example,turn off the light if you don't use.Catching a bus to work or taking a car with your workmate nearby.Go to an empty place for summer night not only can get cool but also can chat with neighbours. Planting some plants if possible.
Low-carbon life is necessary and importance.Do it from ourselves and from  small things.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7219c421-9ab0-3f87-8060-e8279f64a997> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,low-carbon life is a pop topic.More and more people pay attention to it.
Low-carbon life is that people use the enviroment-protected resource in a fit way and try their best not to eat the animals.Also,we should'nt kill the animals for their feather.
Low-carbon life is more and more important.The energy in the earth is limited.We should use it in a fit way.So we should advocate low-carbon life.What's more,there is so much carbon-dioxide,that it is warmer and warmer,which will make the sea level up.It is dangerous for the people living around the sea.
Low-carbon life appeal the human to economize the natural resource and use the Low-carbon things and protect the trees.
It is difficult to ask everyone to do it.But we should insist on it.In our daily life,we should save the electicity and not use the disposable chopsticks.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 70ac5c00-17e9-3d1a-9925-f97bb49de081> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowsday,with the deterioation of the environment,more and more people pay more attention to the low-carbon life little by little.
From my point of view,I support this action.Because I have strong belief that low-carbon life not only does good to our beautiful globe,but also is benefit to our health.
But having the low-carbon life should do from ourselves.There are several piont to have a low-carbon life.First,we should go to our school or go to work on foot or by bike instead of by private car.Second,wo should adjust the air-conditioning temperature over 26`C and turn off the light on time when there is no people.Third,wo should not waste paper or water,and we should retrieve something that can recycling.
In a word,there is only one Earth in this world at present,so we should do our best to protect our beautiful Earth.In addition, do it now from oueselnes.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 500cee65-7b73-350f-9d6c-571e6f73993e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people care more about Low-carbon Life.In people's  normal life,they will care more about their environment.Because people realize the life in earth become more difficult and the importance of Low-carbon Life.Now，people will carry their bag to buy vegetables instead using the bag which will implose the environment.On the way people go out,they will go by bus or by foot instead driving their own cars.More people care about their environment and do everything they can do for protecting the environment,more people can enjoy Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 01280b3d-3e09-3fb1-aa14-973331d120b7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,the life of ue is being better and better,and more and more people begin to seek the satisfaction of mind,they take a car when they go out ,in the same time,it make a polution to the environment we live in because it make a lot of carbon for the environment.And now Low-carbonLife is getting more and more attention.All the people know what the much carbon is making the average temperature of the world to be more and more high,and they begin to understand the importance of Low-carbon,not only for our environment but for the things which is getting less and less in the world.But what can we do for the Low-carbon Life?in my opinion,if each of us can make a effort to reduce the carbon made by ourself the world will have a new face.For example if you have a car maybe you can reduuce the time you take,I mean if you went  to supermarket to buy something you need not take your car.As a student,I think take a bicycle is the best way when we go out .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b9653801-7361-3693-8e55-2b520ccf5df9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
People pay more attention to low-carbon life now.In one hand,the influence of environment pollution result in this situation.In the other hand,the awareness of low-carbon has rooted in public's heart.
In the past years,people cut lots of trees and used more cars.So many things added the  carbon which had been released.So we should realize the importance of low-carbon life and take some actions to reach it.
In my opinion,as students,we should do everything which is beneficial to reach the low-carbon life to influent other people nearby.We can refuse to use one-use things,go school by bike,plant some trees and so on.
In a word,if everyone can try his best,the world will be low-carbon and more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 260ebead-158c-3d68-85d1-6d0d90f2f7e2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now,in our daily life,people pay more attention  in  the Low-carbon Life.They do many thing to prove that the Low-carbon Life is the best way to save the earth.
What is  the importance of the Low-carbon Life?On the one hand,this styfe of life can low down the green house.So we needn't afraid the wrong weather.On the other hand,it makes simple life.We needn't spent much time and money to stisfied us.It means that we can save our enerage to do some usefulthings.It also a way to protect the environment.
So,why not to  try to have a Low-carbon Life?This styfe of life not only good for health,but also good for environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 8015e972-9698-332c-869e-328b78ad4e7a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people pay more and more attentions to the low-carbon life.The lov-carbon life not only can save the energy,but also can protect our enveriment.The 21st century is a energy age;when we are explosing new energy,it's very important for us to save the energy we have now.
To live a low-carbon life is not very different.For example,first,we can go to school or work by bus or subway instead of car.Second,We shouldn't use the things which can only be used one time.Third,we should turn off the light if there's no one in the room.We always can do every possible little things to protect our earth.
Only by all of us coming to protect our enveriment,will the earth be more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9d2967b0-917e-3ff1-b4c2-1b14808cfa47> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In this year,people live heathier and heathier.They pay their opinion to the Low-carbon life,more and more people believe that Low-carbon does brings heath.                                                   When I was a chair,I always swam in the river and played on the
big three,but I think I can never find the heapy time agian.We did saw our life became beter and beter,However,we have not thougth that our so waderful life war charged from the nature-our big home wheir we live in since the first human beings .now,the balance of environment have been hurt.Human beings realie that we must give back the dood nature our grandchair,or heman beings could die all in few years. So more and more people began their Low-carbon life.                                         I think it is very important to live a Low-carbon life for us.In my opinion,fallows are more beaitiful than big and high house.So,let us begin our Low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fbc04da2-3747-3858-a233-a4e1d91c0a82> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, the energy are have begin to reduce quickly.People are
Realizing that the important of the environment. Many people are make their best to save the energy. More people care for the low-carbon life
to reduce the product of the carbondioxy to stop the raise of the temperature .
In fact, the low-carbon life is very important for our life. It can not only save the energy but also can make the environment more beautiful and make people body more health. To do the low-carbon life,
people have many ways to do it. Such as go to work by bus or bike. In our daily life, we should reduce the use of the computer and so on. we also should save the paper because it is made of the tree. Most important, we can get along well with the nature and other lives.
In my opinion, people have low-carbon life is worthy. we should realized the important of the low-carbon life. As a college student, we should do it behind others. We should learn more knowledge to protect our home. We should also care for people to have a low-carbon life. I believe we will have a good life with the low-carbon life

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a8211643-6693-37b8-a1b1-618655bff194> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of the society,more and more people put their eyes on the high-quality lives.Low-carbon Life,which means reduse the pollution of environment is such an example.
Not only because we need a better environment to live in,but also because the Earth,the only one please ,which provides us to live.SO,we should do something to keep our life please clean by the little things what we do.First, we should not to throw our rubish anywhere.Besides, planting trees ,the more the better,and protect the area where is full of plants.The last but not the least, the government or the organization must organise some acitvities to protect the environment.
In a word,Low-carbon Life is the life which people like to and only by the lifestyle like these, we can live healthier and happier

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 621b0c76-9f3c-32ef-a03c-74325175b8b8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,more and morn people are realize the important of the
environmental protection,which is contact with the low-carbon life.What more,it is playing more important role in our life and society.
It  is not only playing an important role in our life and society,but also having an important influence in our environmental protection,
which may protect our furture life becomeing more and more beautiful or
more and more worse.
Therefore,we should protect our environment in low-carbon life that we can reduce some no-use thing to live in a healthy environment.Lastely,I want to said the low-carbon life,do in yourself.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0fc8fea3-8999-343c-afd1-5b5157f1727f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the environment becoming worse and worse,more and more people take more concence to the low-carbon life.
The reason of the increasing carbon has lots of aspects.For example a number of cars and buses produt the carbon. With the more and more carbon were product,the worst problem is that the earth's temperature raise fasterly,which cause many problem all over the world like some teassure animorls suffer appearance.So we can see the low-carbon life is very importemt.
The low-carbon life is very easy and importemt.We just should do some small things and set up a good habit in our daily life.We can take
a bus insteat of our car.We should eat more vegetable insteat of meat and beaf which can reduce the carbon increasing in our life.Besides, we have to save each paper and electril.If all the people can do these small things,a more beautiful futhure will come soon.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7b39668c-45f4-372e-a2a5-11fa56b36327> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Presently, a new lifestyle called low-carbon life is spreading every corner of our world.  Low-carbon life,means less greenhouse gas and less pollution.It leads us to make good use of energy.
Today's society is a highly developed technological society. However, the shortcomings in the development process are obvious, such as carbon dioxide, environmental pollution,and the shortage of energy. But the most serious should be the carbon dioxide problem. So,it is significant that we should keep a Low-carbon life.
Therefore, we must take the necessary measures to reduce the environmental impact of carbon dioxide. For example,tree-planting activities, reduce fossil fuel use, we can from our own, to promote low-carbon living.
In daily life,firtly we can do is to use cloth bags instead of plastic bags when we go shopping. Secongly,we can do is to reuse the old textbooks as possible as we can. We should also never forget to turn off the lights when we leave the rooms in order to save energy. What's more, it would be better if we walk or ride a bike to somewhere. We should try our best to reduce pollution and waste.
In fact, even the simplest everyday activities can make a real difference to the environment. I believe we can make the world a better place to live in. Living in a Low-carbon life, makes our earth more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cab42e96-dda5-3bed-b65c-c96cf71de58e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,there is a widespread concern that more and more people emphasize the significance of low-carbon life.
In the times of knowledge, people have the conciousness of protecting our earth. So it goes  the promotion of
low-carbon life.
There is no doubt that low-carbon does make a great difference in our life.On the one hand,not only does low-carbon
life  agree with the nowadays' policy of continous developing ,but also low carbon life make our present circustances
much more comfortable to live on.On the other hand, it solve the problem of the gradually limited sources so that it
guaranteesour future generation can live with stable product supply.
As the saying goes:"action speaks louder that words."It's universally acknowledged that low-carbon life need everybody's
efforts.Let's start from the trivals in our life.Please prefer taking bus,or even walking than driving cars.What's more？
Reusing resources ia also a suggested way.It's easy to reuse the water after washing clothes and fruit into cleaning floors.
The last but not the least,what you can not forget is that to ask more more people to join in the group of low-carbon life.
Only when the methods stated by are put into practise,can the low-carbon life  be promoted effectively.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e965c24e-ff0a-39d8-8c9e-897f8ccef6dd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today with the development of industry,pollution is more and more severe,our enviornment is becoming more and more worse.One of the most severe pollutions is air pollution.
In recent years,the carbon dioxide concentration in the atmosphere continued to rise.It makes the Earth become warmer and warmer ,which is called the Greenhouse effect.As the climate changes quickly in the last  few years,a lot of people advocate protecting our enviornment and having a Low-carbon life.Get started by calculating your own carbon footprint. This will give you a starting point from which to begin monitoring your progress. You enter details such as what sort of apartment you live in, your personal energy use and travel habits.
All in all,it is important to develop the low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 8005b1fe-9fa4-3760-ab63-750df81e143a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
with the development of our sociaty,our life become more and more colorful.Moreover,in our daily life,people begin to persure low-carbon life ,because we prefer nature and human being stay peaceful.
In my opinian, it is important for us to reduce environment pollutian and live a low-carbon life .After all ,nature is our most imqortant friend.last but not least ,with the development of tecnology,lots of trees were being cut,lots of building were being destroyed......we are hurting our friend-—Nature!so in order that we can live a better life continiously,we should treat nature warmly and we should live a low-carbon life.
so what should we do to live a carbon life and protect our nature? as far as i am concerned,there is no need to do some big things,we should do it from some small things. such as do not smoking,plating some trees as much as possible,do not leave the water running  ,going to school by bus or by car and so on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 34f665a4-a02b-332f-a578-c3cac894230b> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people are paying more attention to low-carbon lifestyle.Many actions are taken to reduce carbon releasing.People are encouraged to
take a bus rather than drive their own cars to work.The energy-saving
technology is applied to every aspects in society.The "Earth Hour"
activity is held every year to waken people's environmental-protecting
awareness. The conferrence of climate-changed is held once a year or two.
There's no doubt that leading a low-carbon life is of importance.First,our mother Earth is in the state of emergency.Resources in the earth is limited but the amount of people is growing intensively fast.In the present day,many people die of dirty drinking-water,lack of food and pollution.However,at the same time,the wasting of resources happens on the other side od earth.To ensure every human being can share the resources mother earth gives them,we must lead the low-carbon life.Second,our earth,all human beings are suffering from the disasters originates from climate-change.The flood,the storm,the rising sea level and so on,push us in danger.For our living rights,for our development,for  our eager to lead our better lives,we must lead low-carbon life.
Everyone can make a contribution to protect our earth,it starts from our daily life.For example,we had better walk or ride a bike in short-distance travel.Switch off your computer when you leave home.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 04fc3118-ba4d-3870-bb16-f81c645c98d1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the pass years,human beings constantly polluted the environment.Nowadays, people are aware that we should do something to ease the situation and become more and more concerned about the Low-carbon Life.
Low-carbon Life have many good points.On the one hand,it can save energy,easing the tight situation of energy supporting.On the other hand,it can reduce the pollution,making our environment more beautiful.
Living Low-carbon Life should do from everyone.We can do it in our daily life.For example,we should turn off the light when we leave a room.
If everyone do a little ,our world would become more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3da7c552-65b5-3c2a-a5c1-417970ed7c9a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the standards of life is developing,more and more people start to care for Low-carbon Life.It is necessary to live a  Low-carbon Life to reduce greenhouse gas emissions,which is one of effective methods to slow global warming. Low-carbon Life not only can mank people live more better but also can make human in harmony with environment.
As the global warming is constant strong,we have no choice but to live a  Low-carbon Life.We shoule do it from ourselves.For example,walking to school,planting some trees,save energy and so on.In order to live more happier,let we live a  Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 014a9e03-d34f-3410-b4ca-8e62be597456> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people concern about the low-carbon life .Because the pollution of the environment does great harm to our daily life,some people are afraid that the predictable word,saying the ending of the world is coming nearly,will come to reality. So now people are care more about the low-carbob life.
As far as I am concerned,I think leading a low-carbon life is very significant to us now.Thanks to the temperature in the earth has risen up recent years,the water lever is higher by the time,which may lead to the damages of the people who live around the sea.And the atmosphere becomes rare and it will make the aquare of ice mountain  decrease.And then more aninmal will on the dangerous line.So we need to appeal the important to the human all over the world.
Lead the low-carbon life ,Do it by ourselves from now.In order to reduce the quality of the carbon ,on the one hand ,I suggest we plant the trees in our school .The trees not only can absort the carbon ,but also can make our shool 's environment more beautiful.And on the other hand,I appeal to everybody not to use the once-used chopstics ,paper glasses and paper plates.Last but not least ,we can save the energy as possible as we can ,for example ,we should remember to close the light after we leave the room,which can save the electricity. In conclusion,everybody can give a hand to lead the low-carbon life and then our environment will be safe and beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bb34040f-e07a-38f8-9275-8073607de8fb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,a great many people pay more and more attention on low carbon life.It is known to us that with the development of economy, a great deal pollution is produced by the gas emitted from the cars, the wasted water from factries and so many trash made by our family.To make our environment better and air cleaner,measures should be taken by us from now on.AS to us,we can take a bus or ride to school instead of taking private cars.Besides, we can use clean energy like solar energy.What's more, recycle the useless things and try to change it into something useful. Finally, in my opinion, the most importantly is to arouse people the awareness of environment protection and energy saving.Of course,actions should be quickly taken  by us so as to live a low carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 03955826-db99-38ae-852a-0508b22097d0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
in the modern life,low-carbon life gets more and more popular.many people realize that we should protect environment. the and save the energe.for example,many people choose to ride bicycle instead of cars,and they think it can help not only exerse their bodies but also help protect the environment.
To develop low-carbon life is a big advantage,and it is what kind of life wo strite for.On the one side ,wo only have one earth so wo should treat it friendly.As  we know,the energe in the world is limited,wo should save more resource for the distant.we should care the fake for a while.On the other side ,low-carbon life is a more healthy life ,it can help us shape a healthy lifestyle.We all know that we need a healthy life and body rather than a expensive life.
In my opinion,i support low-carbon life.As for myself,i am not the one who ask for money and sake.I like live a light life for i know what life i strike for .Also,i think everyone want to live in a beautiful earth and sourounding.I think every people has the resbonsibility to protect the earth and our same home.Hope all own a healthy life and body.hope our earth gets more and more beautiful.Thankyou.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 88d905a9-12d2-30f7-9d76-c646e4737039> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Along with the development of society and economy,we human being are now living a more and more comfortable and convenient life.However,there are many problems we are facing now.Only saving our earth can our human being survival.So,we should pay attention to our earth,to"low-carbom life".
Low-carbon life is really important to our human being.On the one hand,the nature resourse on our earth is limited,and as the exploitation and use,our earth seems more and more  poor.On the other hand,because of the destroy to the nature,there are many environmental problems to deal with.
The success of "low-carbon life"depends on everybody.In my opinion,we should add this concept to our daily life.And we should keep good habits everyday,everywhere,everybody.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 5a534054-5fbe-3ee2-b9fd-afb14d2b0150> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Knowadays,more and more people are concerning about the new life style of low carbon now
that too much carbon dioxide is produced into the earth.
It is of great necessity to lead a low carbon life for the reason that carbon dioxide contributes too the rising temperature
on the earth.The climate change is sure to cause damage to the living things,including human bings,of course.aS IS known to us all,
too much carbon dioxide will damage the earths protection.Without the protective layer,all light would go though our earth without
limits. As a result, health problems will soon rising.
It IS everyones duty to protect our only earth so as to protect ourselves.In order to lead a low carbon life,There is so many things for us
to do.first of all,more trees should be planted ,instoring a certern amount of carborn dioxide.Moreover, you are expected to limit
the use of public cars.Instead,you had better take a bus or walk to and from work,although it may be inconvenient for you.last but not least, if you must turn on the
airconditioner,  be sure to keep the temperature on a higher level.
With everyone taking a little effort, I am sure the world would be a better place to live in.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 84a0518c-87f1-35b0-b46c-96a8888a0c68> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the faster and faster development of our social economy,the matter of environment has become the topic we pay more attention,especial the low-carban life.
Building a harmonous world is essential responsible for us every member of the earth wherever and whenever.However,a few humans being realize the importance of the low-carban life nowaday.
For one thing,whether you can breath clearly and enjoy the fresh air or not depends on whether you possess a good environment condition in your daily life,but a good environment condition is denpending on the low-carban life.It is obvious low-carban life make a great difference.
For another thing,the length of our life grounds on the quality of our environment of life,what I want to explain is the quality of life isn't the wealth,power or interetst,but the healthy life,as the low-carban life.
To possess health life,there is no doubt that we should possess a low-carban life firstly.For this,grasping the little things of our daily life is neccesary.For example,go out by foot or bus instead of our own cars or public taxi;Plant more green trees to absord the carbon dioxide,so that to readuce the quanlity of carban in the air.
Above of all,the low-carban life is equal to the healthy life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 550d9f7d-20e4-3298-a93c-f03bab4f8d58> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people think highly of low-carbon life.For example, people encourage to take a bus or walk instead of driving and government pay more attention to the high-pollution factory and so on.People began to realise the importantance of protecting nature.They have known that human beings are part of nature and should be harmony with nature.
Why do people so focus on low-carbon life.As time goes by,people's conducts such as destory forest have make the earth getting warmer and warmer. The green-house effect have make the sea leval be higher and many other terrible consequences.if we don't action our environment willbe more awful. In order to promote the development of our country and ensure the earth to constantly develop,it's high time that we should do something to protect the environment.So the low-carbon life is necessary.
We still have a long way to go to improve our environment.So everybody should do his bit to protect the earth-human being's home in our dialy life.                                                 ----50 何林

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fcf9ae4c-78f9-3d17-b7a1-b0f0f4aa0d34> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people now are concerned about low-carbon life.Why is it so important?I think one important reason is that our earth is becoming warmer and warmer.Carbon Dioxide is the meterial which causes this effection.If we don't do something to control it,our earth will become worse and worse.In my opinion,measures should be taken to solve this serious problem.Instead of waiting for the goverment'help,we can do it ourselves to save our earth.In our daily life,we can ride a bycicle or take a bus go to work or school instead of driving a car.We can also persuade other people to do it as you do.All in all,to save the earth,start now.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 490a65a1-ada6-3d1f-928d-fb6ac459c27d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the increasingly economic growing and the serious pollution,people pay more attention on living a low-carbon life.At present,our environment is heavily destroyed when people try to make a confortable life.But there are exposing many other problems,like the air pollution,the white pollution,the lesser trees and so on.In this case,people begin to realize to make life in low-carbon.
So why is the low-carbon life important and why people focus on it? That remains of the preserving resources.Becouse of our wasted that the wealth ofour earth is not enough. Only we choose to liee a low-carbon life,can we keep the enxironment wonderful,decrease the resource waste and make the life more beautiful.
But the proble is how can we live a low-carbon life? The basic step is start it from me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 805a681c-778e-3b0b-9220-8927ed511dc3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In nearly 10 years, the low-cabon life is becoming a focused topic in our lives.As We all know,the envirnment in our world is getting worse than the past.
When we are watching the movie which described the envirmental disaster,such as the <2112> and <the day after tomorrow>,most of us would be shocked with the power
of our nature.In a way,we finally realize the important of the envirnmrntal-protectiom in daily life.To start the life style of 'low-carbon' is a great to make some
contribution to our envirnment,and it is a fashionable life style to all of us.
When it comes to the'low-carbon' life ,some thinks it is not nessary and it will waste our time,but as long as to me,to live the low-carbon life is a duty to all
of us.The city envirment is realted with everyone.Though we could not make a big change to the nature.Just imaging that all of us could make the best of ourselves,what
will happen in our world.That is to say,live a low-carbon life is depended on our mind.
So let's begin the low-carbon life from now on. I believe that most of us like to live in a beautiful place,a place full of flesh air,a place with beautiful flowers
and trees.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2fe084bf-02b8-3e8b-9c0c-9bb65e92e35d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,our living environment becomes worse and worse, so more and more people get to know that it is importment for us
to have a low-carbon life,which can protect our earth from being pollute.
In my opinion,we should pay attention to the low-carbon life.Human beings had a great success in econoomic and technological
development before,but they always ignored our living environment and destoried it arbitrarily.If they keep doing this in the
future,not only will the animals and plants but also our human being will lose our family.
So it is necessary for human beings to have a low-carbon life in the future.When we enjoy the low-carbon life,we can pollute
our enterments little and litter,and the air will be more fresh.There is no doubt that we will have a healthy and comfortable
life if we have the low-carbon life.
As a student,I believe that I should advertise the importment of low-carbon life to the people around us.Besides,I will close
the light before I get out from the room.What's more,I will take buses or ride bikes instead of drive a car.I think we will
enjoy our low-carbon life in the future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 87178c37-91bf-3d3b-86ed-1e997d74e5d6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In recent years,with the development of society,people don't just care the comfortable life,
but pay more attention to the low-carbon life.As is konwn to all,the worldwile peace makes
people wish for a more high-level life which is not only comfortable but also natural.
There is no doubt that the industry is developing with a high speed.However,more and more
pollution and illness are found at the same time.Only the low-carbon life can we reduce the
bad affort to the environment.What' more, the resouce is limited,low-carbon life is a great
way for us to save the resouce.
As  we all know,low-carbon life is not just a sentence,we ougut to do it from yourself.for
instance,when you can be able to walk,then don't take bus to go out.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID db33bdcc-f5e5-3803-b860-2e7613737ae7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
During these years,we can always hear about the news about the low-carbon life.
The temperature was hgher ang higher in the past years.It made people concerned.
For controling the temperature,we should make the carbon less and live a healthy,
green and meaningful life.Low-carbon life can help us discrease the carbon,protect
the Earth,or say,ourselves.If all of us don't change the way of life and produce,
the envieroment would be worse and worse.
In fact,it is easy to life a low-carbon life.Many little things in our life can be
a part of the low-carbon life.Take me for example,I ride my bike when I go out instead
take a bus or drive my car,I use my own bag when I shopping,I save water when I use it...
It's funny ang meaningful.If you take your heart to do it,you will enjoy it.
So,for our future,for our children's future,for the Earth future,we should make it!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 642f668c-0bf6-3a73-a989-3d615d0db618> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy ,the enviornment is going to be worse and worse .
But it is really happy to know that more and more people are paying their attention to the
Low-Carbon Life , which is good for both of our lives and the enviornment.
It is important for us to focus on the Low-Carbon Life.   Because The Low-Carbon Life
is not only a good lifestyle for everyone  but also do great help to the polluted environment .
If everybody has the sense of the Low-Carbon Life , the treasure measure like the oil would be
saved and no longer wasted anymore ,and we human being might live in a more and more
beautiful world and would be healthier and healthier .
In order to live in a Low-Carbon lifestyle ,we should do something in our daily life, such
as turning off the lights whenever we leave the classroom and the living room ,also we must
switch off the water tap if we do not need to use water . Everyone is able to live in a
Low-Carbon lifestyle if someone  is willing to do so .
To protect our mother --The Earth ,please live in a Low-Carbon lifestyle.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d1d84b6b-b2f5-3f2a-a2eb-b68edf4f2c66> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,more and more people concern about Low-carbon life.There are not only
the government maken a law to ban using the thin plastic bags,but also people choose to
use the low-carbon and saved-energy products.They care more about the green-way of
industry,agriculture and other sides in normal life.
It's very important for us to go for a Low-carbon life.Because too much carbon around
the earth would make our environment become hotter,and the glaciers melt slowly that
lead to the sea level getting higher.What's worse,the climate becomes changeable that the
grain grow badly.
Actually, in order to live a Low-carbon life,we must take an action from mow on.Firstly,
we should take a bus or bike rather than drive a car to a short trip.Secondly,we can use the
saved-energy lights in our houses.Thirdly,planting trees as much as we can,it can decrease
the quality of carbon around us.
Consequently,it's significant for us to do many things to build Low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 73d0637c-962d-32aa-9b39-d6255cca60c0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the growing awareness of the importance to protect our environment ,
people are paying more and more attention to low-carbon life.They believe
that it can help make the environment better.
As a matter of fact , I really appreciate  this kind of healthy lifestyle.
By leading it,people are more willing to adapt good living habits than ever
before. Also , they are proud of themselves by doing so. Actually , low-carbon
life is a win-win action, which is not difficult to put into practice. What
we need to do is just turning off the light when we get out of a room,spending
one day in public transport system once a week instead of our private car,or
maybe reusing  water as much as possible.There are also some interesting plans
,for instance,adopting a tree in another city.In this way, we can not only
release far less carbon into the atmosphere, but also help save a certain
amout of money. The things we do is small, but in the long run, it can make a
real difference.
Some people may figure that we can do nothing to change the fierce climate
change. But I wonder if they have heard a idiom : Together ,we can make a
difference. One person's effort may be of little use, but if everyone on earth
determined to do one same thing,things will definately be different! So,do not
hesitate any longer and just get started! Try to do something by leading
low-carbon life, for you also have the commitment to the earth!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7945dd16-3cd3-3c1b-adb7-b695967f5acf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know , nowadays we hunman being pay more attentions to the low-carbon lift.
Take an activity for example,the most famous Environmental Protection activity now is The Earth Hour,which appeal people to turn off the lights one hour for saving electricity and resourse.This activity prove that we hunman being are willing to protect environment and live a low-carbon life.
frankly speaking, i think the low-carbon life plays a very very role in our lives nowdays.The reasons are as follow . Firstly , the environment today turns worse and worse and we can not live anymore if we refuse to change it.Secondly,the low-carbon life can save more nature resourse and offer hunman a health life without the pollution.The last but not least,the low-carbon life can achieve the sustainable development and do good to our daily life.
In my opinion,personal power is huge and it is our duty to live low-carbon life.In fact ,little things can help to achieve the goal,such as turn off the lights when we leave home,turn off the tap after we washing, use more public transport ,plant more trees and so on . At last ,it is very necessary for us to raise the awareness of low-carbon life and spread this thought of environmental protection.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 5f156119-fb79-3ef5-8ec6-79a137fb6359> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays ,more and more people focus on the social problems,such as the high carben in the earth.So the low-
carben life become a popular life style all around the world.And it can benefit everyone including you and me.
Why should we to live a  low-carben life?In my opinion ,it can develop the level of our life.We can live our
life with the cleaner and more beautiful environment,we can use less energy to do more thing,and we can make the earth
to keep young and always be actively.
How to living a low-carben life?In fact ,it's a very easy thing to us.We don't need to pay anything ,however,
we can get a lot of benefits from it.In our daily life,we can save all kinds of energy,whatever it is,whether it is water
or the ectronics,it can be good for our earth.We save the things and we'll get more things and use it for a  longer time.
It's universally acknowledged that because of the humanbeings,because of the more and more factories in the world,the earth
really become illness.Humanbeings hurt it to make money for themselves ,but actully speaking ,if we can't protect the earth
well,then we'll lost our home,and at this time,where can we spend our money?
All of us should be concerned about the problem,and to live a low-carben life.It's really easy,you don't need to
pay some precious,you just need to do the little things in your daily life,to save the energy,to clean the environment.
All of all,you should know that,the things we do is not to help others ,it's to save ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3681f756-dd0c-3f6f-bac1-f93fe57aa522> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As is well kown that Low-carbon life become more and more popular in the world.The products are aking for low-carbon.Peole design their house reguiring low-carbon.
It's important that living in low-carbon in order to devolop continued society becauce of limited resorce.Planting more trees is one of the ways to live in low-carbon life.And we can reuse paper,reducing using disposable products.Low-carbon life should be done by everyone.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 5970091c-7d4e-3df5-9796-beec494f0dbe> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Currently,people begin to pay much more attention to Low-carbon life.They have a sudden understanding of the true meaning of Low-carbon life,and arouse their own awareness of protecting the environment from being pulluted.Great changes have taken in place in our living environment from that time on.
It is known to us that Low-carbon life have a great effect on our daily life and our health problems.Once the environment is polluted or destroyed by human beings,people will be easily become sick and have other kinds of health problems.Low-carbon life is a good way for us to improve our life level.It can be more healthy for us to live a low-carbon life.What's more,sciensists encourages us to live a Low-carbon life,which can make a difference to our earth.
To some extent,Low-carbon life can protect us away from diseases,illness and so on.In the long run, it is significant for our living envirnment as well.In a word,to live a Low-carbon life not only help us human beings but also do a great health to our motherland.
My dear fellows,please do your utmost to change your lifestyle and from now on,try your best to live a Low-carbon life,and then find your health back,make the illness all away from you.Low-carbon life,our holly ambition,our hope.Just do it from the littles arond you.As a proverb has it,A little counts a lot.
BY:Environmental Engineering Class One

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0c2ff1e1-8fdf-3b94-bbc0-3cf28e6d0faf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the great improving of people's life,we pay much more attention to the quality of our life,nowadays.So,low-carbon life becomes popular increasingly among people.
There is no doubt that the more carbon dioxide we producted into the world, the more pain we will get.for instance: "Summer and winter will last longer than ever before"scientist said it on TV .which meant that human beings will suffer longer time of hot and cold days.In order to protest our human beings,the first step is that we should protest our earth and the most efficient way is to decrease the carbon dioxide. That's why we stress the importance of the Low-carbon Life.
As the saying goes"It's easy to say but hard to do" .Firstly,we should do it by ourselves.here some ways we can follow:Planting more trees,take a bike or on foot when going out,reject to using the one-off things and so on.Secondly, we can ask our friends and relatives to do what as we do,and then they ask theirs to do the same.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3295d7c1-cc75-317b-8fff-1fe6864c8761> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Accompanied by rapid economic development,we have consume much energy sources. and it cause many environmental issues. now more and more people have realize the important of low-carbon life.
We know that there is one earth only we can live.so we should protect the earth.And low-carbon life is a good way to combat climate change. It can make our live environment more beautifully.Also good for building social sustainable development society.
And what can we do to  build it ?we should switch off the lights when we leave.and we go out first chooce public transportation if the distant not far away frow.we can plant more trees and so on .
For tomorrow happy life ,let us do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f52b252a-fcba-3494-b15d-3712568e0294> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As all we know ,with the development of economy and politics,our life environment is becoming more and more serious.People are paying attention to improve our life environment and we think low-carbon life is the best way to finish that.
How important is the low-carbon life? Fisrt,low-carbon life can reduce produce of carbon dioxide, slow greenhouse effect.Second,there is the beneficial method to help people keep healthy.
In my opinion, to protect environment, the government must take even more concrete measures. First, it should let people fully realize the importance of environmental protection through education. Second, much more efforts should be made to put the population planning policy into practice, because more people means more people means more pollution. Finally, those who destroy the environment intentionally should be severely punished. We should let them know that destroying environment means destroying mankind themselves.For exemple we should save water and electricity.
If everyone do our best to protect environment, we will live low-carbon life sooner.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9476bf00-bc55-3a36-9fe3-2eff7029ea4d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The topic of 2011 the world expo is Low-carbon,which make life more beatiful.Therefor,"Low-carbon"beacomes more and more popular,people are concentrated with it.
In the past years,in order to developed the economy,conturies did not care for the environment.The environment of life is worse and worse,which lead to more new disease.Also,worse environment make quality of life down.So,the new idea "Low-carbon",is important for us."Low-carbon Life",which will reduce the content of carbon dioxide in the air,make the air more fresh.Reducing carbon dioxide,is good for the world ,such as make the plants grow well, povide the clean environment for us to improve the life.All in all,"Low-carbon Life" is important for us.
"Low-carbon Life",is a theory,the most important is to practice.In daily life, we can go out by bike.We are supposed to take the bus to go to school or go to work instead of taking the car.In a word, Low-carbon Life is a diffcult thing,but a beatiful life.We should try our best to protect environment, to life in low-carbon.If we do that, I believe that the environment will be better,our life will more wonderful.Finally,I hope that everyone can remember the idea --Low-carbon Life,and do that by yourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c893d628-486c-3093-951f-0d1e4b57c9e4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the News reported,there are many pollutions appear in all over the world.The pullutions make our surroundings wrost. All the experts in he world try their best to find a way to confront it.Now a lots of people draw more and more attentions to the Low-carbon Life.In fact,our world become hottest owning to carbon-dioxide.If we want to advoid it ,we must know the importance of the Low-carborn Life.Reducing
carbon-dioxide,we needn`t change the place to grow plants and many places couldn`t disappear.Many people
consider it that those things are considered by the experts not us.I think that is wrong,we live in the same place so we must do our best to protect our environment.In my life, I willn`t waste any paper which produced by trees.I appeal others who go home or go to school can go on the bus not private cars.
If we can do many things to reduce the carbon-dioxide,
we will have a better life and perfrct surroundings.
Everythings will be better if everyone can contribute their helps.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a005329e-d4f3-3d7d-b0d4-1db1e8081096> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,morn and morn people pay attention to low-carbon life.Because people are aware of that it's a high time to take action to save our earth and health.
There is no doubt that living a low-carbon life is important.Firstly,low-carbon life is good to environment.The promble of nature such as globle-warming can be solved origintally.Secondly,the resource of the earth such as oil can be saved to used for longer time.The balance between human and nature would not be broken.Finally,people living a low-carbon life is saving themselves.
There are so many way for me,a student to live a low-carbon life.Go to school on walk instead of driving.Sale rubbishes those can be reused instead of just throwing them away.
Live a low-carbon life,save the earth,save youself.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9532c89c-591a-3521-8d5c-02d1114cbd93> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays , more and more people realize the importance of low-carbon life . As we all know , our environment gets worse .
It's our responsibility to protect our only world and we are supposed to enjoy the low=carbon life .
Human being's economic and culture make big excellence , but the environment doesn't . The people used lots of natural
materia which led to the environment gradually got worse . Luckily , people know that they are wrong later and decide to
change their behivour .
We appel to low-carbon life , because it's necessary and essential for us to protect our world . In the future , we
will run out of our natural materia , so we should save them and use them properly . Low=carbon life can make our city and
life more beautiful as well as comfortable .
As a teentage , we should do it by myself . First of all , we can take bue or walk instead of driving . Secondly , we
should turn off light and tie up the water when we out of home . Thirdly , we can learn more about environment knowledge to
improve our sence to protect and love our environment . At last ,we can also ask our friends and families to try their
best to enjoy it .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6d4f0d2a-b4c5-38e3-9b8e-99cf29552781> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the saying "everyone has the responsebility to protect the enviornment"
goes,a newlife calleg LOW-CARBON LIFE has been pointted out. It's a enviornmental
life with the theme that reduce and recye.
The low-carbon life is public in much people and many coutries.As we know,there
is only an earth in the world,people will disappear without the earth.To protect
the enviornment is to protect ourselves.
As for me,an university student,how to lead a low-carbon life? First,say no to
the platic bags,once chostics,etc.Then,protect trees out of destroy.What's more，
go out by bus and advise my parents not to use privaliy car so much.And the last
and the more important is to supose the enviornmental job,try our best to let more
people addited to it.
As the sayings all above,we can draw a conclusion that low-carbon life is the
best choice to the world,technology develops quikyly and the earth must keep
healthy at the same time!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fa6dc7f6-5439-3610-a838-dbe9ef592548> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As people in city are walking in the street where there are a pale of cars runing ,they may have to worry about their health.Why?It is because lots of waste gases are pouring out by the cars and that not only pllute air but also be harmful to people 's life.Such things which are largely wasting our sources are now getting more and more attention.please use your eyes to look our life and you can surprisingly find waht we have done to our only land --the earth. So it is seriously important for people to pay more attention to lead a low-0carbon life.
Without doudt,it is about time we protected our land.Here we should take some action and it is to make our life be low-carbon.According to some studies , the sourses in the earth is limited at this time since peple  don't save the sources in their daily life.people's survival depend on sources on earth Once they are used up ,people will be not  posssible to survive. Also, the envirnment is getting worse because we people pour out too much carbon.
When we look our life ,we should do something now.I belive we can do our best,just do something from ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 61efdb52-a461-3d2a-b56a-5abecbe8e97f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more people notice the inmortance of low-carborn life and pay higher attention to it.What is low-carborn life?It means live in a way with less energy wasting and envronment pollutting.
It is important to do so.For one thing,with the development of our society,environmental problem occurs and becomes more and more serious.A low carborn life can prevent them from becomeing worse and worse.For another,it is also benefit our health a lot.For example,we walk or ride to the place instead of taking a bus,in this way our boddise are strenghened.
Thus we shold life a low carborn life.But how?Here are some suggestions.We can choose to walk or ride a bike instead of a bus,refuse to use one-off thing and so on.Let's start our low carborn life with every little thing around us.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e101da11-ff58-30ea-8e6e-5eca5ad1807c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the environment protection,more and more people become to concern about the low-carbon life to portect our earth from being warmer.
As most of us known that our earth is becoming warmer than it used to be, which is called'global warming'. Accroding to the study of some scientists,the tourist destinations Maldives will disappear if the average temperature of earth keep  rising 2 degrees ,and if the average keep rising 5 degrees ,the earth wil no longer be appropriate for human-bings to live in.And all of these phenomenon are caused by  the excess carbon dioxide.
So it will be helpful and effective if we can do something which will reduce the emission of carbon dioxide.Actually we can not only live low-carbon life by ourselves but also advice others to join in us. It's our duty to portect our earth and make it become more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cc93f792-e71d-3e40-96e6-8d12a5ff65dd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people take more attention to the low-carbon life and advocate to live a environmental protectional life.Because release the fewer carbon dioxide can protect our environment and to some extant,protecting The earth is to save our life . so,it is very necessary and important for us to live the low-carbon life.
In order to let our Earth work for a longer time ,we should live a low-carbon life from now on.Living such a life,you will fell very  healthy and comfortable.	Releasing fewer carbon dioxide,you will  fell the air is more freash.If we are not addimated to release carborn  dioxide,The earth will not load so long,so,your descendants will live in a terrible environment.Tough you are not care the feture,but you know,it is related to your own health.Would you rather live in a muddy air than a freash one？	As i konw,more people wanted to live a comfortable life.Therefore,in order to let us live for a longer time,we  ourself should take some messures to live a low-carbon life .
From now on,we should do more small matters from details and try our best to live a low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4bdd04eb-a238-3fa2-8b06-db8f135a2661> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Since people have a socailly acknowledged that the temperature of our earth is going up,people pay more and more attention into the low-carbon life.As the numble of human being,private cars,factories and ect growing,the out put volume of carbon dioxide grow.It's high time that we should get the point of the important of low-carbon life. We must get in the low-cardon life to deal with the tense relationship with nature.
So living in low-carbon life just begins from myself.Then there comes the questions:what can we do for this situation?Are those work?
Absolute yes.Every little thing we do make big change.Cherish every single paper or take more bike or bus will help a lot.Just remember it 's what we do make differences.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fe973190-6daa-327c-ae6b-11334a4fd130> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now many people pay attention to a new thing which  is Low-crbon Life.Due to the environment become more and more awful.Such as the earth get hotter and  hotter,the naturl disaster come earlire than before  and become more and more.So our must chang this circomstang and make our life become more healthy.
It is very important for us to live the Low-crbon life.Because our life has became richer than before,our have many to buy car to take.So the road has been taken by the car,and the all cars will let out much more carbon dioxide which can make the earth become hotter and hotter.Otherwise we can see the garbage bag all the ways.The bag is extremily harful to be cleared up.So it will pollte our environment.So we must pay attention to it.
However what we can go about it.As a matter of fact we can chang our life from a few little thing.For example,when we go out or go to work we can ride our bicycle replaced our car.What is more when we go to bue something ,we can take a bag to replace the shop'S bags.So only we are care about our life we can go about our life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1ffe55ae-6049-3f68-930b-192d2ec68fc1> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon Life is a new topic in our daily life ,and more and more people are gradually concern about it . Why Low-carbon Life is more important? As a lot of carbon are realse to atmosphere , the temperature of the earth grow up which cause the sea lever grow up and cause some distaster in areas that around the sea. Also it will change climate ,so some extreme clime will take place in some areas that cause serious problem.
Now , What can I do to reduse carbon to live a Low-carbon Life . First , I can plant more trees which absorb carbon in the air. Second, I can change some life habit , for example , take a bus to go to work . lower th air-conditioner’s temperature ,. Third , reduce some factory to realse  carbon to air.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3b8656be-9779-3592-9479-61374cb89e15> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more peopel have the sence of low-carbon life and the low-carbon life become more and more important.Some individuals even think it is a popular to enjoy the low-carbon life.
As we know,global warming become more and more serious.Therefore,low-carbon life is necessary for us.Low-carbon life can reduce the product of carbon and many garbages.It is very useful in protecting environment. Also,Low-carbon life can reduce the waste of resources.
Living a low-carbon life shouldn't stop in words.As the future of our country,we should take action from now on.If everyone can do their best,the environment will be more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a35bedd6-24e7-37f6-bb32-036e3df919b2> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people pay attention to the low-carbon life in the 21th century.The society develops so fast now because people use too much resource to do it.Faster the society develops,the more resource we use and the environment become worse.
When we put our head to see the sky,we will see the black sky but blue.That is because we use too much carbon fuel in our world.When we live in the environment which full of the high-carbon we will feel unhappy.Take the blue sky to us,we love the blue sky and the clear air.
Low-carbon life is important to us.Live in the low-carbon environment that our life will longer than live in the high-carbon environment.The high-carbon life make the Globle Warming more and more serious.The land will be flood when the ice melt and the people will be dead.
We want the low-carbon life so we must do our best to make it.First,when you get out of the house,please get off the light.Second,the less car you use the better you do.You can do something to change the environment,try your best.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 5da087f0-4636-3c5d-92c1-a2c59cfa1091> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
The low-carbon life was more and more be mentioned by people.
Why?because its purpose is to appeal to us for protect our environment.A low carbon life can be of great use for us.It can help save energy and cut down the pullution.It can reduce the amount of carbon dioxide that is the main cause of greenhouse effect,and can help keep our environment beautiful and clean.
So,we should have an action for our low-carbon life.for example,Don't use handkerchiefs,recycle the wastepaper and protect trees and eat whole food in stead of processed food.
Please,do it form ourselves.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d76727cf-d680-3029-9736-125111e4f74e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,nowerdays,people pay more and more attention to Low-carbon life.DO you know the reason?
Yes,one of the most important reasons is that Low-carbon life is very important.As the develop of the economic,
the polutions are more and more series,expecialy the air polution.And most of it has the close relationship with carbon.
Besides,it also polute the water which we can not live without.As we live with the poluted air and water,many telebow deseases
make us uncomfortable or even take our life.Nothing is important than our life,so we must do something to protect us from it.
First of it,take a bus or bike to school.Second do not use the one-use goods.Besides,plant more trees to clean the air.What is more,
ask the people arround us to do that,too.
I do believe that if evry people lives Low-carbon life,our environnent will be better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d4909e1d-8372-3ab2-a3bf-ffcf1ca878de> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the development of the society and the grate progress of the sc
ientific program,the lifestyle called Low-Carbon Life has become more and more popular
between people.
Low flow shower head and using the clean resource to produce electricity like water,wind,
sunlight rather than the fire can be seem everywhere now.Besides,people are advocated to use more public transpotation
so that it can reduce the air pollution and avoid the traffic jam.
It is generally knoen that living a Low-Carbon Life plays an important role in our lives.
But why?What benifits can we get fron this lifestyle,or how much importance can it be?
First of all,living low-carbon life just like we are acting a movie role as a hero who were
saving our earth.This can reduce the enrironmental pollution which can help us stay away
from the disasters like the polluted rain and the harm from the sunlight.Moreover,it is
a task that every country are solving.We live this lifestyle mean we are making the contributiong
to our country to win the position in the world .
So let we live a Low-Carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID dd703143-0bc1-3e36-bf19-cc0cc2e408b4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the economy level is increasing,our life quality is getting better and better.But our living
environment and nature are being destroyed,they start to fight back.For example,the global warming
makes the ice in north and south pole melt so that the sea level starts to go up,some islands are
going to disappear.To solve this problem,to save our earth,people are seriously focus on the environment
and climate changes.We finally make a conclusion is that we should live a low-carbon life to protect
our living environment.
Low-carbon life is significant and important to protect nature and environment.It can reduce the
production of CO2,and recycle many rubbish. In this way we can not only protect the environment
but also save money.
We can do small things from the begining.Firstly,we can go out on foot or by bus instead of driving
private cars.Secondly,we go shopping and use recycled bags instead of plastics bags.Thirdly,we can
save some used water to wash our WC.We can protect our earth by doing such small things,do it from now on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 37a916a2-a3d8-3a02-9417-8b88f860e934> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,more and more people pay their attantion to the low-carbon life,which can save our limmit resours and protect our
earth.For example,many people take a bicycle to school or work instead of driving a car or takeing a bus.Also,goverment
make a decide to plant trees....All this are done for our low-carbon life.
In fact,it is quite importment for us to live a loe-carbon life.We all know that the resours all over the world is
so limmit and our enviroment is seriously polluted,so that it is necesarry for us to make a low-carbon life.Only in this
way can live a more healthy and comfortable life.
In my oppinion,low-carbon life is the best chose for us to live,and it is also good for our future.We also can get
more healthy body in this life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e4459425-8fbc-384c-b737-fa2f21bc4d0a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid improvement of life quality ,our human start to pay more and more
attention to the environment which they exist in,such as the problem of water shortage,
pollution, creature`s diversity.
For our bitter furure, some professors raised the notion"low-carbon life". It is a
way of life,encouraging people to protect the environment fron little things. First,
it can help people have a deeper knowing to the importance of their effor for protecting
.Second, it press citizens to form the right awareness and sensible living habits.
Morever, ereryong small efforts can change into amazeing power ,which help our earth a lot
and a lot.
Anyway, we have to do it fron ourselves first.sorting the rubbish into differengt kinds
befond throwing,never wasting water and electrecity, promoting piople around you to do the
same things will benefits our delicate earth greatly.
So are you still hesitating? Come on,join us in the low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e4459425-8fbc-384c-b737-fa2f21bc4d0a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid improvement of life quality ,our human start to pay more and more
attention to the environment which they exist in,such as the problem of water shortage,
pollution, creature`s diversity.
For our bitter furure, some professors raised the notion"low-carbon life". It is a
way of life,encouraging people to protect the environment fron little things. First,
it can help people have a deeper knowing to the importance of their effor for protecting
.Second, it press citizens to form the right awareness and sensible living habits.
Morever, ereryong small efforts can change into amazeing power ,which help our earth a lot
and a lot.
Anyway, we have to do it fron ourselves first.sorting the rubbish into differengt kinds
befond throwing,never wasting water and electrecity, promoting piople around you to do the
same things will benefits our delicate earth greatly.
So are you still hesitating? Come on,join us in the low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f54d2501-5730-3c45-9cac-d2f74a7cdfb5> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Presently,a large number of people have drawn considerable attention to low-carbon life.According to a recent data, 60% of people assume that we ought to lead a low-carbon life in the next decades.
Obviously, it's of great importance to lead a low-carbon life.Above all,as the sea level rises and wildlife go to extinct,it's urgent to improve our environments by having a low-carbon life.Additionally,resources and energy can be greatly saved.Instead of being extravagant wasted,the new and clean resources are able to pass on to the next generations.
As regards me, it's encouraged to use less plastic bags as well as disposable chopsticks.Moreover,I'd like to educate schoolmates on some issues such as turning off taps whenever you find,using fan rather than air-conditioner.Last but not least, rather than having my own car, I'll take the bus and subway.With joint efforts of all parts concerned, the global warming can be solved thoroughly.
I highly recommend low-carbon life, it's aimed at maintaining health both mentally and physically.I'm sure that this sort of life can have a great prospect in the future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d7773536-42c2-3555-906c-c34ddf639630> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the rapid development of society,people lives in a high standard life.They pay more attention in our living environment.They more
and more focus on the quality of life.They would rather to live more healthier.With the rapid increase of private car ,the problem of
air pollutation is becoming more and more serious.As for this ,people want to do something to change.
Refer to our life,there is no doubt that ,to live in a low-carbon life is very important.The rescourses in our world is becoming more
and more less with the ground for people's greed using.If we don't do something to stop this behavior,maybe some years later ,people
should worried about their life.As we know,that one-using things,are full of poison ,they may kill ourselves.
To live a  healthe life,we should do some small things by ourselves.For example,we should refuse to use that one-using things.when we
want to go outside,we can take bus to instead of driving our private cars.In another hand,we do not throw rubbish everywhere.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6204ae7f-a8a2-311a-ae3e-c7ae5c24b15f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now more and more people pay attention to the  Low-carbon Life.So why we encourage living a low-carbon life?We know the globe warmming which is caugth by carbon.It will take lots of environment problems to our earth. So living a  low-carbon life,should be started from us.
And how we live a Low-carbon Life?As we know that more and more carbon from the cars,and also we know that felling trees could lead to more carbon in the air.In order to lowing the carbon effectively,we suggest that when we go out we can take the pullice traffice like buses ,subways,and driving less.In the other,I think that the most important is proctecting the trees. Also we could use less the productions which are made in tress.For example ,we can use more recycle bags,when we have lunch or dinner outside,we can use the recycle boxes and not to use the unrecycle chopsitis.
So ,living a   Low-carbon Life ,we should realize the importance of it.let us do it and make a good environment aroud us.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4f351fe9-f2cd-3ea9-9781-c85297be283f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
There are more and more people paying more attention to the Low-carbon Life now.Can you tell me why people pay attention to these ?
We can know that the globe warmming caused by carbon dioxide leading to many environment problems.We alse fall ill from these negative influence.It is very important for us to have a low-carbon life.We need fresh atmosphere.However,there are more and moer cars in our cities.And there are more and more carbon dioxide in the atmosphere.In our life, science and technology is growing, but becanse of these , cansed more and more problems.We should protect invironment instead of destroying it.Because of destroying environment, the climate become swinging.
In my opinion,we should live in a low-carbon life.We should take more action to protect environment.Everything we should do it begin from ourselves.There nothing in the world is diffcult if we try to do it.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 37199584-1755-362e-949b-8aab3add97cf> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now more and more people get to know it's important to protect our living environment.Low-carbon Life is a new way of life, and it is good for environmental protection.As a student，it's my duty to do something for the earth. People do pay more attentions on this project, one of the reason is that people feel hotter than ever before.From now on, I'll go to school by bike or on foot instead of in a car. I'll use fewer plastic bags to reduce white pollution. In order to save energy I'll plant more trees so that the air will be fresher. I'll take less lift and reuse water. At last l will use second-hand books,so we don't need to cut down more trees.
If everyone takes action, our enivronment will be better and better. Our world will be more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ecbe342f-5770-34b6-97a9-08a8f8d98168> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It is said that the year 2012 is the end of the world on the net.Of course,it can't be true.But this joy is reminding us of protecting our world.Most people have realized its importance and start a low-carbon life,which is a way that try to change the world by changing personal life.
Nowadays,the average temperature of the year are getting higher annually.With the earth becoming hotter,some land may be gradually flooded. Living low-carbon life is a way could slow the change down.The waste of the resources could creat the problems such as hunger,
provery or even wars.If everyone lives a low-carbon life,the waste will be less and those problems won't take place too.
Live a low-carbon life and get the world better.Just stop wasting ,go to work by bus instead of on foot and remember to close the electricity  and all that can change the world. Live a low-carbon life,the 2012 will never come.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7d094cb1-cc46-372b-bfb0-92612c218b35> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As people recognize that nothing can't replace the earth,they pay more and more attention to the Low-carbon Life now.
We can feel that our climate has changed obviously,and the average of temperature becomes higer and higer.Those situations is made by the carbon.Thus,we have no choice but have the Low-carbon Life.If we don't do it,our earth will become dry.Not only more and more land will become desert,but also more and more ice of the North and South Pole will disappear.
Being a teenage,I think I must have the Low-carbon Life as a leader.As long as we want to do it,we can find that low-carbon is easy to achieve in our life.For example,we should take off the lights when we leave the rooms,and we can use bikes instand of cars when we are not hurry.I belive our earth will be better because of our action.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e39a5c2b-e92b-3bdd-a58f-d860e77cb6a3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In this moment,the Earth are facing to many serious environmental problem,such as global warming ,air-pollution,rising sea level and so on.Our lives also becoming bader and bader . luckily ,many people call on protecting our environment by changing our livestyle and more and more people are paying attention to low-carbon life now.
For us ,having  low-carbon life that is helpful to relieve to damage the Earth and good to imporve our life quality.Hving  low-carbon life means we can product less carbon ,cut less trees and not only make our lives more and more simple but beatiful ,but also  revert blue sky with fresh air .
So let us have low-carbow life and it is so easy to us.We can refuse to use disposable goods, saving water and that can  save natual resources .If everyone all having low-carbow life,our lives will become more and more happy.So let  have low-carbow life now.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fe848e50-2d29-3000-b12d-1931ca0d0d16> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, more and more people pay more attention to low carbon life.It is not only beneficial to improve the quality of our life, can also be for our life to provide more favorable security!
Low-carbon Life provides us with the following a few benefits. First, this is not just a good way of saving resources, or implement of sustainable development strategy for the important.Second,it also protect the enviroment that we live.The environment for our life's importance can not be ignored. No environment,no people beings.Last but not least,it will be useful for some major environmental problems, such as rising sea levels, the greenhouse effect and so on,to solve these problems has more help.
As we all know,life of low carbon is a worthwhile thing.As a saying goes, whatever is worth doing is worth doing well.So,carrying out low carbon life,start from me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7bc01530-5d2b-3b94-a7b9-e4da692a2b46> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid economical development and in-depth
industrialization process, large amounts of greenhouse gases, mainly carbon dioxide emissions，lead to global warming, climate change. So people are now more concerned about the low carbon living.
Why does low-carbon life can solve global warming problem, because it have two action. On one hand, it urge us walk or cycle to  work rather than take a car, it can reduce vehicle exhaust emissions. on the other hand, it make us reject disposable chopsticks, it can make more tree remain, and trees can absorb carbon dioxide and release oxygen. So low-carbon life is very important.
As a university student, I should take concrete actions to support the low -carbon life. For one thing, I will turn off the lights without extra trouble, and for another I will publicize to people around me.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID aa330106-cc86-359d-8f05-e393a5152382> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon life is becoming more and more popular around the world. Low-carbon life is good for everyone.
To help with the environment, we should go to school or go to work by bike instead of taking a car. Besides, we'd better take a bag with us instead of using the plastic with us when we go shopping. We should reuse books, bottles, every piece of papeer and never forget to turn off the lights when we leave the rooms. We'd better not spend much money on expensive clothes and so on. I think it's our duty to live a low-carbon life. I belive if everyone lives a low-carbon life, our world will become more and more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4450be0c-c970-33e5-a095-ea4ab30cbf49> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the fast development of technology and economy today, more and more pollutions have already influenced our life seriously. We must do something to improve our quality of our life and in the other hand we should try our best to protect the nature from being polluted.
In order to improve the quality of our life, more and more people start to pay close attention to the Low-carbon Life as they all believe that the Low-carbon life is good for themselves and the nature.
The low- carbon Life is important at this time. It help us not only in keeping the technology and economy steady increase, but also make the quality of life become better and better. This style of life is good and do no harm for us and our living environment.
And how can we live as the Low-Carbon Life? What should we do? It is a  easy job to do that. For example, when we go outside we take a public transportation rather than take our own car. When we open the air-condition we should set the temperature higher than 26 degree celsius. What we do seem the little things, but it will make difference in our life.
In my own words, i think we should live a Low-carbon Life and we can do it! Let's start our new life, start a new style of life which is fashion nowadays.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f7546c70-ae10-35b1-ad2b-db89e51e71b3> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Bonded together in the same earth,all of us long for heathly life and living place.However,with the industy developing,more and more carbon are pushed out from the factory,making our air and river polluted.So as a social member,we must contribute on the low-carbon life and fight for it.
Link to our health even life age,low-carbon life is of important for us.If much carbon dioxide is breathed in our lung and lack of orxigen,it must do harm to our body.everyone do not expect that one day we live with a breath-bottle filled with orxigen. We are punishing ourselves with our hands if it really happen.
So to have low-carbon life,great effort should be made by everyone.Plant a tree and do not waste paper is an effected way.What's more,we must have the mind of enviroment protection.Once we determine to do,the pollution will also break up.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 68ccf1a5-d67b-32d6-9ffc-6fa4ea8313be> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Many year ago,when I am a chlid,I could see more beautiful sight than now.Blue sky became gray.Clean river turned turbid.Because of the development of Human being,our earth is become more and more polluted and the carbon dioxide is an important point in it.In 2010,people proposed a "low-carbon life" idea so that cut down the pollution of carbon dioxide.More and more people take care of Low-carbon Life
Why people proposed the idea of Low-carbon Life?As far as I am concered,people aware of the earth is unique.And if we live a Low-carbon Life,notice every way of cut down the production of carbon dioxide,we can protect ourselves and our children.
As an university student, in my opinion,I can do more thing to live a Low-carbon Life.I should notice to electricity,for example,I should turn off the electrical equipment after no one used.And I can try my best to plant more trees in our surronding. Low-carbon Life,do it by ourslves.
For our beatituful earth,let us join in Low-carbon Life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 56fbf7a7-42fa-31f0-96fb-2e30a69d4531> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people are concerning about living a low-carben lives.Because the weather has greatly changed in recent years:it's becoming warmer and warmer and it's reported that the ice in north pole and south pole is melting with time goes by,so that the creasures in those place are losing their habitate and the food that they eat to support their lives.And other creatures that are not living in those place have also influenced by the weather-changing.As to our human being,although we have not been influenced so much,but some day in the future,we will certainly suffer a great deal of loss if we do not do something to decrease the speed of weather-changing.
The reason why the weather becomes warmer and warmer is in a great part that we are living in a high-carben life.So it's very essencial for us to live a low-carben life.Everone must take action to protect our earth,because it's not easy to lower the amount of carben that we have released before.
As for me,I would not waste every paper that I used,and collect those used paper to recycle.Secondly,I won't waste water and use the water I washed my clothes to wash the floor.There still are many ways that we can use to lower the carben,such as:takeing a bus as a transportation or riding a bike,and do not open air-conditioning if the weather's under 26 degree and so on.All in all,we should make our every effort to live a low-carben life.number:16 nicole

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID fcff780d-9acf-312c-8c93-14fb256b1db8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there is a increasing  number of people who like to lead a low-carbon lifestyle.we can find that more and more white-collar prefer to go to offices on bicycle ,on foot or event on rooler skates instead of driving a car.
As we all know there is only one Mother Earth for human beings and low lifestyle can protest our Mother Earth.For instant,  Firstly, it goes beyond doubt that low carbon lifestyle contributes a lot to the environmental protection and it is a favorable way to slow down the rate of climate change of our earth which means preserving the Earth is preserving humanity itself.
As college students, We are supposed to undertake the responsibility to lead a low-carbon lifestyle, which is of great significance.We can conserve water, turn off the light if not necessary,we also can take the public transportaions like bues subway instead of taxi and private car which can emit a large amount of gas.Furthurmore,We can plant more tree which can absord carbon-dioxide.
All in all,low-carbon lifestyle gives us the best choice to do some significant things for our earth. And only in this way can we form a harmonious relationship with the environment.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 52e29d8e-3cf3-3a20-a1f6-34bba8c9e439> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know, the digital age is coming but the environment pollution  became more and more serious, so people around the world may pay close  attention to the Low-carbon Life day by day.
What's the reason of people to do that?Well,when you walking outside, you may detect that the air is muddy and the water is dirty, the green become fewer and fewer. I belive,you may be know the important of the Low-carbon Life at that time.
While you are living a Low-carbon Life, you may know how honor you are. You may not only save the natural resources, but also save your money, at the same time, other people will do you as the leading role.
Low-carbon Life, from me! Come on! Just a simple work, but you may win many things, just go outside on foot or but bike replace by car, just recover the useless goods, just save the water...no one you can't do!
Come on!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 661e1e70-6295-3dc1-82ee-32be4494f70d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays more and more people pay more attention to
low-carbon  Life.As we all know,a good environment benefit
us a lot,and, low-carbon has played an significant role in
protecting our environment.Low-carbon  Life makes the air
fresher,each of us can breathe the cleaner oxygen;also,I think
it may make one have a good mood everyday.Low-carbon  Life can
reduce the pressure from many fields,such as oil,electricity
and so on.As a college student,environment-protecting is my
duty,I didn't lie in sight .Everytime I go out,the first way
I choose is walk or by bike. Because I believe,as long as everyone
walk two more steps,it will reduce more than two drops oil.So,
in order to build a more wonderful surroundings,you,I,he should
get about it

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4496e1e8-a49a-3bde-a8a5-9e4f900ea4dd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the technology and the industy develope swiftly as well as the population is growing fast,more and more carbon dioxide is produced which rises a series of big problems in our life.So peopel are now taking the Low-carbon Life impotant gradually and it may lead us to a brighter future.
As it is known to all of us,too much carbon dioxide would lead many big problem such as the tempurture of the world would rise ,many living things may die and the sea-leve would would rise which problely destorys our city.So Low-carbon Life is a necessary tendency for us and is the only one choice for us to live in the earth longer.
To live a better life,we must do something now and try our best for the Low-carbon Life.For one thing ,we can go to school by bike insteat of driveing car and put off all the electrical appliance before we leave home.For another thing ,we can appeal to the society the importance of the Low-carbon Life.
Only in this way can us live in a healthy earth and lead the human beings to a brilliant future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6277214a-bd24-3e1e-85e6-cdb1ad1208a6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the earth is becoming warmem which cause the level of the sea rise constantly and makes great effect to human life, people have realized the importance of reducing the production of carbon dioxide. This is why low-canbon life are much more encouraged to us now. Living such a life , we can produce less carbon dioxide so that we can slow down the Global warming to stop the land from being parts of the sea. It also have great effect to environmental protection and animals lives. Only cut down the level of carbon using can we live a comfortable life. So, as teenagers ,we should do from ourselves lead a low-carbon life. For example , we should persuade our parents to take the social traffic system as they can instead of driving their cars everyday. Also, planting trees as we can and not using the plastic bags. And if the conditions allow, studying hard and do our best to change the form of energy using and find new green energy.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 343c47a5-9fc1-32e7-bfbb-ccd5887cde95> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today's society is a highly developed technological society. However, the shortcomings in the development process are obvious, such as: carbon dioxide, and environmental pollution. But the most serious should be the carbon dioxide problem. Therefore,mankind begin to pay close attention to the global problem!
It is of vitalimportance for the whole world to practice the low-carbon lifestyle.For the long run,as abundant natural resources we have,which it will run out of one day.So it is significant that we should protect it for our later generations responsibly.For the short run,not only have we advantageous to our health,but also we contribute to the global low-carbon action.
On the one hand,it is important that i should be aware of the necessity of saving energy.On the other hand,i ougt to help my families and friends to develop the awareness and live a low-carbon life.Besides,as a student,i am willing to do somethings helping we living a carbon life.For example,i should turn out the lights the moment i leave, turn off the tap in time, and reuse my textbook and so on.
Last but not least,one thing that we should keep in mind: every big thing comes from the subtle.Currently,it is high time for we protect our commmen home!Just do it!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 3124ca6a-5b9b-3e8e-a889-ef3073d8c99e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the environment being polluted,our health face to great probiem.Now,people pay more and more attention to Low-carbon Life,which is a good way to reduce the pollution.
For people,Law -carbon Life can save our money spend on energy,help us own a civilized life and improve our health.
For countries,it concerns a country's sustainable development,which is one attribute of the powerful nation.
Life-carbon life isn't far always from us,we still can do many things to it.For example,we can go out on foot or by bike instead of by bus or personal car if the palce we want to is near;turn off the light when we leave;use the energy saving home appliances.
We cannot emphasize the importance of Low-carbon life too much.We should promote low carbon living, from our start!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 6f609138-8d3d-3cc5-84a0-25b97b71f480> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,there are increasing number of cars produced which make our environment much worse.And it also bring lots of carbon dioxide.The caron dioixide not only make the more water cover our land,but also poluted our evironment.So people pay more and more attention to the low-carbon life.
Let's talk about the importance of low-carbon life.The low caron life can let our society become less polution.And the less carbon dioxide in the environment,the more oxygence we can breath.The low-carbon life can make much benifit to our life.First,it can keep the enironment away from the polution.Besides,it make our daily life add more color without  the less carbon.Last but not least,it make our society become more beautiful.
All in all,We should do something for the low-carbon life.We should take a bike or underground instead of cars,when we go somewhere.We should do our best to protect our environment.And we shouldnot make more carbon dioxide to our life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 60dbd9a0-a79b-3fca-9a71-ee00cf313998> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the shortage of energy source,there are growing concern about the Low-carbon Life .The means of low carbon are low energy and no waste .More and more people get to know about the importance of the Low-carbon Life .Living a Low-carbon Life will protect our living environment .
In order to live a Low-carbon Life ,we should start with ourselves do everything we can do.As we all know ,the using of the car will spend many oil and product much carbon dioxide.So we can by bike or go on foot that not only save energy as well as lessen the air pollution.Plastic bags is the enemy of the Low-carbon Life,we have best not use plastic bags any more. No one can stand the white pollution. It is wise to use bags which can be reused again and again.And as a student ,we ought to turn out the lights the moment we leave,turn off the tap in time and reuse our textbook and so on.
All in all ,it weighs greatly for all of us to put the low carbon lifestyle into practice .Just set our mind to these:no-car day ,no plastic bags and no waste. Let us do it now.Let us living a Low-carbon Life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a4df8629-9e84-3893-aba1-82732ddccec0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,a large number of people are concentrating on the low-carbon life,expercially people who recived high education. For the reason why so many people attach great importance to low-carbon life is that more and more carbon dioxide were put into our earth.IT will lead to the temperature ger higher and higher.
There are various factors contribute the importance of low-carbon life which we can't deny. In one hand,if everyone of us lead a low-carbon life less carbon dioxide will be put into our earth greenhouse effect will be stoped. In the other if we ignore the low-carbon life the  greenhouse effect will kill all the huanbeings
Never can we forget that every individual counts! Everyone ought to take part in it, for example if we want to go to school we shall take the bus or subway instead of taxi or Private car.  if we want to buy some electric equipment wo shall buy the one that produce less  carbon dioxide

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 798d73ce-9c2d-3f71-82a8-ab4993caff4e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the society developing constantly,people's life get improved constantly.But in this process,our environment also get great destruction.For example,the air have more and more carbon and other toxic gas,the river's water is also polluted and become black and black.If our environment developed like this,all of our human will die.Thus,people begin paying attention to Low-carbon Life.
Low-carbon Life is a new way of life, and it is good for environmental protection.In this way,the air won't have so much carbon and other toxic gas,and our human's body will become healthier and healthier.
So for our health,we should do something good for our environment.We should plant more trees,and shouldn't throw rubbish everywhere.And when we go out,if the journey isn't distant,we should first choose to go by bike,not by car.Through this way,I believe our earth will become more and more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 29a64add-442d-3f33-a086-6278088bcf7d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today's society is a highly developed technological society. However, the shortcomings in the development process are obvious, such as: carbon dioxide, and environmental pollution. But the most serious should be the carbon dioxide problem.
Now the problem of global warming because of excess emissions of greenhouse gases. Two levels of glaciers melting, polar animals lose their chance of survival at the same time, will lead to rising sea levels, many coastal cities into the water did not result in a few years later. Therefore, we must take the necessary measures to reduce the environmental impact of carbon dioxide.
For example: tree-planting activities, reduce fossil fuel use, we can from our own, to promote low-carbon living.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 28493843-f220-3680-a037-1deb280118dd> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now people  pay more attention to the  low-carbon life.For exanple,more and more people see many book about how to have the low-carbon life.So the books such as how to save the electricity,wood and so on are sold well.
The renson is that at present,the pollution is very terrible.people can not stand that the great water turn to be dirty,the tree turn to be cut and  the street fill of the gubishs.According to these rensons,low-caibon life is important for us and The Earth.Because in the low-carbon life,we have more idea to save electricity,wood,and make less gubishs.Then,our life environment will be better,which can let us be more health.Second,we can save more resource,then we can protect the Earth.
In our life,we can do more things about the low-carbon life.for exanple,we can use the paper in two side.when we leave the bedroom ,we have to turn off the light.geverment have to make some idea to control  the number of the car which would pollute the air.when we go out to work,we can take the bus rather than drive the car.
When more and more people have action to think  more idea and do things about the low-carbon life,our life will be betterand we don not need to leave the Earth to other star.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID ab65e6b3-1455-3ce2-95f4-3809092d389a> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday,environment problem is more and more serious.And human pay more attention to it and try to involve some problems.Specially,low-carbon life is out of people's minds and draw attentions to the world.Now,it is so important for our lives.
The world gets warmer and warmer.Many glacier start to be melted.And the level of the sea is higher.Those thing prove that the green house problem is not to be involve effectively.As it develop,it will bring human being a disaster.Carbon dioxide is the source of the problem.The reduce of the carbon dioxide can be very helpful for  our environment.This is the goal people want to get.So,low-carbon life  is very important for our lives.
We know what we should do for our world.We should fight together and have a strong determination to do it well.The world is our home.We should protect it.So ,we should start our low-carbon life and try our best to do it well.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c754e81f-4943-3b7d-a5e2-8be5cbbcb9df> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadadys more and more people are concered abort the low-carbon life because we are realizing that we can't destroy the envirement any more.Though those developed countries have done many measure to emphsize the importance of low-carbon life,it is not enough now.
With the temperature are higher and higher year after year,we ought to develop the low-carbon life.Othewise,the sea level would get high because of the high temperature,then some seaside cities would sink finally.At the same time,more and more disasters would hurt people's life and wealth.
Thus,not only those countries and gnvernments but also we,banal people,should take some measures to support the low-caron life.We can turn off the lights when we get out,make good use of the water for many  times,open the fans instead of the air-conitional in summer,take bus rather than take private cars and so on.
Just do it from now on and from yourself!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 43f92f20-598e-33ac-b124-f450456ff05c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon has become a quite fashionable word which can be seen and heard frequently from everywhere because people come to realize the seriousness of green house effect.
With the development of economy and technology, the peace of the primitive nature was destroyed.It lead to carbon dioxide increase fastly.Animals disppeared and cars were running all over world.Blue sky became gray.Clean rivers turned turbid.But what is worse is that people seemed unaware of it yet.
As it known to us all,our environment is getting worse and worse,and a low carbon life is becoming more and more important among people.A low carbon life can be of great use for us.It can help save energy and cut down the pollution.It can reduse the amount of carbon dioxide that is the main cause of greenhouse effect,and can help keep our environment beautiful and clean.
Now it's time to convert our conceptions and lead a brand-new life style-low carbon life. Now it's time to take powful action to protect our everionment from contamination. Now it's time to abundon the endless greed for material interest and embrace the beauty of nature.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 05f3298d-0ec0-3e06-81f3-40360f0519cb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,human start to realize protect the enviroment become more and more important.Like there are many people in the earth,if one produce 1KG rubbish one day and how much litter will be.I think you know wouldn't I said.Even many factories which in every where you could see and it also produce many pollution which is harm to human and biology on earth.
So it is time to protect our home.Today low-carbon life become more and more popular.What is low-carbon life? It is easy to know what it mean.Using less energy to produce more energy in order to reduce CO2,and then to relief the pollution influence.And then our live will be longer and the disease less the animal will not disappear.We are the people who want to live in a beautiful world.
A wonderful dream will be come ture before we must to do something .For instant,when we leave out the room we should turn off the light,when we use the paper to count we should not waste .

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d98b7f34-ed4f-3042-bcab-85956c8662a8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the fasting develop,the polution also become serious.So now mang people care the environment much than before.Therefore low-carbon is offer.Reduce the output of the carbon is necessity.If we now remain the carefulless mind rather than adopt some ways or take some action,the day we should take the mask when we go out is coming sooner.The saying protect environment is protect ourselves and our home.Now the goverment is promoting the low-carbon action,for example take bike go out.Generally,low-carbon is becoming fashion.Ioder to support the low-carbon action,more and more people like to by bus or take a bike outdoor.Protect environment need to the power of everyone.So everyone has resbonsibility to join it.Believe it or not,I take a bike outdoor all the time.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 040acce4-ae3c-3b26-a014-2e79a9c7382c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday people pay more attention to the low-carbon life.And through a lot of ways ,they can achieve the truth of low-carbon life.
From our knowledge we know,the low-carbon life will protect our environment from pollution and make it better.The low-carbon life can produce less  carbon dioxide to the environment.It can make our environment more bluer and air more flesher.It can reduce the waste of resource.
As a college student,we should live low-carbon life to protect our
circumstance,which is our duty and responsibility. In our dailylife,
when we go out ,we should cut off the power. And when we go out,if it is not necessary to take a bus,we should walk. The most important thing is that we can not waste things which can recycle.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b38c7a02-51f8-3af3-bf83-4add50cf3f41> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In 21st century,poeple think hightly of low-carbon life more. Low-carbon become a task for our daily life and work.
Indeed,low-carbon life is very important for our environment.Since hunmanbeings developed industry,the environment has been polluted.Now, a lot of environmental problems show up.People have to face the problem and created low-carbon life style.Live in low-carbon can help us to save our energy and protect our environment.We need to support it and make it populer.
Low-carbon life start from us! If us save the energy,cut the pollution and recycling,our environment will become more and more beautiful!As a student,we can hang out by bike or metro,we can cycle use paper,we can save water and electricity when we use it.
Let's live in low-carbon from now!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9b4a096d-2d34-31f3-8e30-11e5e2ee154c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people pay more and more attentions on low-carbon life.As the economics develops so qiuckly,human have put too much carbon which leads to warmth.
As we consume so many products every day,many materias disappear at the same time.In a way,we consume much carbon and that lead global warming.The carbon dioxide mainly comes from burning.
So I support to have a low-carbon life.I will take public transportations or ride bike rather than private,and plant trees when I have enough time to do so.Reading eletrical(电子的) newspapers,however,the paper comes from trees.I wil reduce powerful electronics as much as possible for save electricity.
I will also urge my familys to do so.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a3697e91-d207-3350-a423-879023850810> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid economical development,our life does become better and now we pursue high quality of life ,like low-carbon life.But why the garvenment advocates low-carbon life?It not not only want to improve our life quality,but also protect and improve the environment which is more important.In recent years,owing to our excessive exploitation and destruction,the natural resource is fewer and fewer even our environmental problems become more and more serious.In order to get along well will nature and span our gross negligence,we must make our efforts to reduce carbon emissions.A low-carbon life can make environment better.So we shoult support the life and do it from ourselves but the litter things.For our future generations' life can be better and the enveronment ,our sincere friend,can be better too,we act active and right now.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9345d1cd-ff35-3baf-92a7-e144fd6842a7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we all know that people are more and more concerned about the low-carbon life by
TV,radio and so on.Because low-carbon life can make us better and more closed with nature in
our daily life,and what's more it can be heal the world which can make the speed of carbon-warmming  more slowly.Certainly,we all understand that we should live with nature rather that contorl the nature.Living in a Low-carbon Life is a best way to make freinds with our nature.
Because of it's importance as above, we should strength the sense of low-carbon on the one hand.On the other hand,  not only should we realize clearly that how to live in a low-carbon life in deeds,but also we should appeal to everyone aroud us to live in a low-carbon life.In my eyes,Only in this way, can we be leaded to a low-carbon life,even a wonderful and healthy life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0d747085-5a9a-34fa-8343-458ec9122216> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
It is now increasingly concerned about the low-carbon life.Low-carbon has become a catchword recently.We could find this idea everywhere.And it also become closely related with our life.
Low-carbon life means to reduce carbon dioxide emission.It is not just a concept and bubbling,a slogan and stylish,it needs long-term practice. Long-term reduction of carbon dioxide emission is a greater challenge, because energy use will continue to rise.And carbon dioxide is the main reason to cause global warming. Global warming is harmful for our existence immediatly. So,low-carbon life energysaving environmental protection and help slow down global warming is imperative.
All in all,low-carbon life can makes life better and we are the ultimate beneficiary.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cae5e84e-544f-3fa6-b503-f6a891bb99fb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
We must do something to improve our quality of our life and in the other hand we should try our best to protect the nature from being polluted.Nowadays,more and more greenhouse gases were emisted.And it lead to many serious problems for example the increasing global temperture. As college students, We are supposed to undertake the responsibility to lead a low-carbon lifestyle.For me,I decide to use the bus instead the car when I go our.we can take the broadcast of the Low-carbon Life and make more people can support it.
If everyone do a little ,our world would become more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 982ade23-4ef5-3062-95f8-85974c6d9c3d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Recently,people pay more and more attention to low-carbon life owing to the pollution the factories.
Personly speaking,the concent of low-carbon is playing an essential part in our life. If we ignore
this concent and make damage to our earth again and again, we are bound to be punished by the invorinment.
Not only should we be aware of the significance of low-carbon life, but also we have to put it into
practice in our daily life.
Firstly, we should make our efforts to reuse the resource of the purpose of saving the energy. Secondly，
we must remenber to turn off the light when we leave the room. Next, we can encourage others to do whatever
they can do to save the energy, such as taking bus instead of driving a car. Last but not least, we are
supposed to use the low-carbon air-conditional and fridge in order to make less pollution as much as possible.
Only in this way can we creat low carbon life for our kids.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 322a26a4-9c13-3ae3-abe6-8fb48c61e975> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the developing of the society,more and more people realized the importance of reducing the carbon dioxide.how to live better is become an important thing  in our daily life.
The inprovement of the carbon dioxide cause lots of the questions of the enviornment. firstly,it cause the rise of the tempertuer .secondly ,it can lead to the banlance of the carbon,Further influence various global cycle.thirdly,it cause the Levels rise.
so we should try our best to reduce the carbon dioxide,let the environment become better,let us live better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 971f89a8-e747-3ac7-ae78-2a17531d1878> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people pay more and more attention to the Low-carbon Life.
As we all know,we have only one earth.However,at the past years,people didn't care about the enviroment of the world.if we don't live the Low-carbon Life,globe warming will be worse,in addition,the ice in the pole may be transformed to water,at that time,the land will be drowned by the sea.
Taking this foctor into consideration,we must learn to live the Low-carbon Life.When weleave the house,we should turn off the light,taking bus instead of driving car.further more,we can join into the activity of"Turn off the light for 60 mimutes".

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 46a4beb9-c51b-36eb-bc31-4fe6a7754ef6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the Social developt,a new lifestyle called low carbon life is spreading every corner of our country.So,As we know that Low-carbon means low energy and no waste.
Nowaday,People pay more and more attention to Low-carbon life.With the industry development environment pollution is serious,and People's physical health is under threat.So the low-carbon life appear.It is good for our healthy.Beside,low-carbon also means low energy, also good for the effective utilization of resources. To achieve the sustainable development of all countries advocate.
So,we sould do something for it.On the first place, a no-car day is supposed to set up every week in our school. Because cars not only cause serious air pollution but also waste energy. On no-car day, neither students nor teachers are allowed to drive to school. Meanwhile, just walk, jump, cycle or run. Use our legs and enjoy the fun.On the second place, we had best not use plastic bags any more. No one can stand the “white pollution”. So, it is wise to use bags which can be reused again and again.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID e031875c-4e7a-3d72-8f4e-3ab0995b3258> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,when it comes to the whether,we can remind that the whether is getting warmer and warmer.As we know, many reasons can make the carbon to our lives. This is why people take more care abaot the Low-carbon Life.
Some people say that if the quality of carbon is going on, we can not live on the earth. This maybe ture.For example ,we use the paper bag everyday is a good thing which can reduce the plasice bag using .Because the plasice bag is hard to deal with. Athought more and more families can buy car ,fewer and fewer of them could offer the car.More cars not only make the traffic jams,but also create a bad environment .This is one of the keys to the globle-warmer.So the Low-carbon life is very important to our lives.
As far as I am concerned ,I should dedicate myself to protect Low-carbon Life.I will use less the one-off chosticks .At the as time ,I will plant more trees .Because I know good life comes from Low-carbom.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b19ee8a4-815c-3846-b539-7a19273bf74e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Today,more and more people pay close attention to Low-carbon life.
what is Low-carbon Life? In my opinion, Low-carbon Life means to cat down
the carbon  emission load.we may ask how to reduce? some people may choose
ride a bike when to work,some people may refuse to use one-off product.
above of this example just one of method. For our future perfect life we
shoule stick to live a Low-carbon Life. So Let us to create a Low-carbon Life
from today!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9c987fb4-0529-3592-b3d5-103de60f38f0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the industry and the science technology,people use more and more energy source to product the goods.And the carbon dioxide in the air affect our life.Such as the Greenhouse Effect and the Global warming.But with the effect,people awareness of the improvement of decrease the carbon dioxide.
Our earth's source is limit,and our life which fit human being to live is very difficult to find.So,provisional just our earth can fit us to life.With the sitution of the Greenhouse Effect and the Global warming,Low-carbon Life is necessary for us to practice.If carbon dioxide's discharge is not decrease,Global warming is more and more serious,our sea level rise,and many low level country will be flood.And the land will become dry and unsuited to grow food.Our environment is very friagile,so we should protect it.
We should do something to protect our environment,so Low-carbon Life is the best way.And we can

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7a178006-4420-3aa5-836a-e84853cc6ee6> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,people pay more and more attention to the problem of environment.And with the development of technology and society ,low-carbon life becomes a very hot and fashion way of life.It's not just a way of lif,it's more about attitude.
We all know that man lives in the realm of nature and we get many from it.Humanity converts nature's wealth into society,and now makes it sick. The enviroment becomes vorse,and various pollutions  become very importent.Many desasters come about in the world,and these more or less are connected with people's accitivities.People now find the way to solve the problem,and low-carbon life is a very

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 4eb6f632-f2ce-3f57-81e2-fa91c88658c0> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays "low-carbon life" has been a popular topic in our daily life.People more and more concern about it ,gradually realizing the importance of leading a low-carbon life  for  our human being.
As many scientists point out after their several-year researvhs,carbon dioxide ia the main factor which results in global warming.This global climatic change could bring whole-human being desasters,the rising of the sea level,the gradual drougt of the crops ,the high rate of the skin cancer and so on.Most of the carbon comes from our life.With the developments of the industry,more and more carbon dioxide are released to the atmosphere ,which worsens the situation .Besides that,people could cause much carbon dioxide in their daily life.
To lead a low-carbon life ,we need to take actions by ourselves.A small action,for example ,cut down the use of electric products  and so on.We can do a lot to build a low-carbon life.Let's work together to create a more wonderful future.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a6e64c63-34ec-324e-a72c-81a42c84fd3e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
at present,more and more people are aware of the importance of Low-carbon life.As we all know, greenhouse gases are constantally incresing over with time.We have advanced technique and have more consumption,but we do great harm to nature so that we have less and less fresh air and more and more stress in life.
if we are all conscious of these,we can understand the necesserity of Low-carbon Life.if we can take down to lead a Low-carbon Life,we can seek life as comfortable as before.
what's more ,in my opinion,doing something what you can is more effictive.we can decrease the use of electricity and water and gas.we'd better avoid make pollution and deal with all kinds of pollutions.If we all do like this,we can see our beautiful life soon.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bb1c66cd-f06f-34c6-97dc-6d142c72c575> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,with the science technology develop,the environment is polluted.In order to live in a well word more and more people get know it is important to protect our living environment.So they are begain concern about the Low-carbon Life.
For us,having a Low-carbon Life that is help us to protect the earth,which is our home.The earth is only one,we should value it.Otherwise,the last world days will neary and all of us would face more and more calamity.But Low-carbon Life is not,it means we should life in a quality.In a word,no matter you are for yourself or your descendants,you must protect the earth,and the Low-carbon Life is our choosen.
To have a Low-carbon Life,from me on.As a college student,it is necessary for me to do something to protect our home.The earth is becoming warmer and warmer,and it is cause with carbon dioxide.So the fisr important thing is to reduce the carbon dioxide.As me,I decide to use the bus instead the car when I go our.As everyone knows,the trees can clean air and beautiful our life.If possible,I would plant many trees with my friends.In the orther hand,I will use fewer plastic bags to reduce white pollution.All in all,it is not only I am a cologe student,but aslo I am study the Environmental Science and Engineering  specialty.So it is my duty to control the advanced scient knowledge to invent something to make a Low-carbon Life in the future!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 98738f85-32bc-36fb-8e7a-87a04d8d49bb> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy,the environment problem is also worse and worse.We begin to realise the serious problem and we put much more attention to protecting our home - the Earth.So scientists encourage us to live in Low-carbon Life.
What is the Low-carbon Life? It means we should save and recycle the resources and stop polluting our environment.To live in Low-carbon Life,it raises our awareness to protect our environment and make our environment more beautiful.What's more,we will easily get sick and have a bad mood if we live in a dirty environment everyday.Without a comfortable environment,we won't have the motivation to study hard or work hand.Only in a clean environment can we do all the things better.
In order to live in Low-carbon Life,we should take action from the details in our daily life.Firstly,we would rather take bus or ride bicycles than take a car to work.Secondly,don't waste every drop of water when we needn't it.Finally,we ought not to use one-off chopsticks and one-off plastic bags.
In conclusion,only by everyone's effort can we live a better and enjoyful life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 0618f760-efb9-3c7d-b05b-8312844f2a01> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,our life are becoming better and better,for the kinds of techonologies come into the society.So people become to concern more and more about the quanlity of life--Low-carbon Life.
Because we want to live for a long time,we need a good environtment of this world.And "Low-carbon Life" can give us this.For example,it reduses "the white polution" and "Green House".
Of cause,nothing can be perfet.Low-carbon Life in today,it's not very perfet,so we should do something morn.To me,I think I can do like that,don't threw rubbish,such as battery.In fact,the most important thing is that all the people can join in it.Let's all do everything about "Low-carbon Life",no matter what a small thing!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f9a6ff70-d9fe-322b-9dac-43576ef0d1de> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,more and more people pay more attentions to the Low-carbon Life.It is not only important to the environment,but also to ioporve our life qualites.
Low-carbon Life is become more and more important to our lives.Becaous the problems about environment is become more serious than before.Such as the Globle Warming , which is reulted by the carbon that people made in their lives.If we do not decrease the quanity of the carbon,our environment will become more severe.And ourlivee also will become worse.It would damage our health.
So we should live in the life with low-carbon.And made it come ture by our practices.Such as we  can use the bicycle or walking instead of the car,or we can close the
power switch when we left the room and so on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 1daa2464-710e-325d-833b-3a78ec1bf517> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,the earth faces a big problem which cause by us human-being.We make more and more carbon dioxide from our life and work with the development of science and technology.Now many people know this problem and then they pay more attention to the low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life mean we should make some change to reduce the carbon dioxide on the earth.This is a way that everyone can do and it will save the earth where we live in.If we do nothing for this,the earth will get worse and we will lose it at end.So it is very important for us to be aware of this and to participate in it.
What we should do or not to do is clear.We should save energy and prevent watse,such as turn off the lights when you leave and go to work on foot or by bike.And we can plant trees,advocate other people,etc.All in all,it is a attitude for our lives and our earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 7e5e4bf8-dc24-3b7a-a572-cb04d2794292> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
More and more people near about us look into low-carbon life as the modern society develope.
As everyone know,the new way of life always connect to our science and culture.So,let's have a quest about the new low-carton life.
Of course we think that we should open the low-carbon life up but most of us don't know why.
In the fact of actual,The importance of low-carbon is out of our imagine.Many time we always forget closing the light if the washroom,or we forget turning down the slowing water-resourse,or other bit and bit things we ignoce.But in this way we waste the earth's resourse.Though it's little and little but more and more and lots of people in the world still withless.So,if we foced
on the new low-carbon,most of people will suffer benifits we couldn't imagine.And the erath will be more wonderfull.
In a word,to be a low-carbon life ,we should do that from ourselves near our surrounding.Plent of things we could do for it.As like taking bus to shcool or work instans of car or taxi,go to supermaket with a green basket without other "white pullotion"etc.All we need to just chage our some life habits and hold on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cf4a4ba6-bc28-35e4-93c7-b5c4b0890f5f> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
In the nowadays,more and more greenhouse gases were emisted.And it lead to many serious problems for example the increasing global temperture.So,the people more and more think highly of the low carbon life.
Have a low carbon life is very importance for the environmental protection.For example,if we have a low carbon life,we can reduce carbon dioxide emissions and reduce energy consumption.It also can let us have have a good habit of energy saving.
How can we having a low carbon life?first,take a bicycle or take the bus as much as possible instead of drive a car.Second,when you left the house,plerse turu off all the electric equipment.Ofcause,if you can discovering others fuels which is more clean and more green to instead of the using of carbon,you help a lot to the environmental protection.
If everyone can having a low carbon life,The Earth will become more and more beautiful and the people will life more and more happily.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID b46bd3da-6335-3d62-b4b9-4c526e55d7e4> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Human  being have lived in earth more than 5 thousand years.with the time goes by,the style of life have changed day by day.
the weather become more and more hot in summer becaouse of too much carbon dioxide is made andget in to the air.Inorder to reduce the production of carbon dioxide.people pay more attention to live in Low-carbon life.
Living in Low-carbon life is very importemt.In one hand,it can help us to study a good behieve of life .In the anthor hang it can help us to portuct the enviroment.If our enviroment become worse and worse.we can not in the worth anymore.live in Low-carbon life and do not let the earth chang too quick os we can live in the earth too long.
everyone should try our best too protuct our living enviroment.so live in LOw-carbon life is a good chorce.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 2f8992e0-d483-3425-ad49-8949a1b33c8d> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of warmer and warmer day,everyone knows the earth is sick.We clearly find the carbon dioxide,which we make,is so more that the earth can not deal with.So human pay more attention to the low-carbon life,hoping to possess a health earth again.
The carbon dioxide get the earth be hotter,more animals are in imminent danger,for lossing their suitable environment.Such as the glacier in north pole is disappearing wiht a hight speed,the poler bear s are lossing their nice home for this reason,they are saying goodbye to their life.In addition to this,the bad weather bring more disaster tous to us.We offen make a hard stand against with these,lossing fortune ,time,even the life.By this token,the low-carbon life is important and necessary.As a human,we also long for possessing a wonderful environment to live ,and enjoy the happiness.
I dont want to live in a summer year.The winter,spring are also excellent experience.So I decide to lead a low-carbon life,give a little but useful hope to the sick earth.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID cae1cf6a-caa4-3a07-b43e-9c0bbc445e52> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays, people are becoming more and more concern about Low-carbon Life,noever on any aspect.Actually,Low-carbon Life is very important to humans.As we all know,with the enveolopment of technologe our earthquake is becoming more and more heat,so there are many dangerous things happen,such as the snow is melting at two poles,the product of agriculture is reducing in the world and so on.Only we have Low-carbon Life can we save our earthquake.
How can we do in order to live a Low-carbon Life?First,we can ask us to protect our envirotment,tell ourselves not topollute envirotment.Second,we should take out the light when we leave the room and take ride to go outside.Finally we all should tell people the important that we have a Low-carbon Life.By above adition,we hope ourlife are more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID d2a18289-5730-3958-bbaa-6a145907e7d7> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Because of more and more serious environmental problems,low-carbon life has become more and more popular in nowadays.
Low-carbon life requests low energy and no wast,so it can save the energy and protect the air from being polluted,which protect our environment and give all of us a economical and comfortable way of life.
So,what can we do for the low-carbon life?First,I think we must realize the important of it and propagate it to more people.Then,from now on,we should use fewer plastic bags to reduce white pollution,encourage adults use less car as they can.If it is allowed,we can plant more trees in our city.Finally,we can't waste water and conversely.
All in all,everyone has the duty to protect our earth,so take action now!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID bffdb13e-3ae0-3339-b943-65f8eca60048> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Now the  more and more people concerns about the Low-carbon Life.because the air pollution is increasingly severe and threatens the people's health, The Low-carbon Life is necessary.
But how to do we can? First,we can make little things like recycling, not throwing reach around and walking or biking instead of using our cars would contribute to a collective effort to clean up the environment and then protecting the atmosphere. Second,we can take the broadcast of the Low-carbon Life and make more people can support it.Finally,we can do it constantly.
The Low-carbon Life, start from me!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 9ecc8d45-b955-3c6b-864d-39b27cfb9481> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As we know,the environment today is more and more worse and the weather is hotter day after day.So that people is more and more pay close attention to the  Low-carbon life.
Why everyone is concentrate on this problem.First,it is good for save energy so that we can make a enough use of energy.And then,it is good for the economical development of our cuontry.If The last but not least is that will be beneficial to our health.
From now on,we should live in a Low-carbon Life.We can do the follow things to achieve it.For one thing we should save the energy such as everytime when we leave our home we should close the light and TV,for other thing we can go out with walking or by bike instead of by the car.And we can propagate the theory of Low-carbon life so that more and more people  will join this activity.
In a word,everyone should try our best to live in a Low-carbon life.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID c4700963-52cb-361d-a3d1-e03594cfada8> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,low-crbon life is become the popular life style.Government call people live in
low-carbon life,because today's trees is less and less but population is more and more,wo
should protect our invironment,so wo should low-carbon life.
Low-carbon life is so important to us,because if everyone live low-carbon life,wo will
save so much resource to our invironment,so we will protect our earth.It is so easy to
everyone to do it,but if everyone can do it well,it have a great advantage to us.
So,what should we do to live low-carbon life?I think we have walk or by bike or by bus to
instead by private car,and we don't have usually open air-condition and so on.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 206c1278-ba17-34c8-82ea-fb8943bdb69c> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As our society develops quickly,the environmental pollution becomes more and more serious,so nowadays people are more concerned about the"Low-carbon Life".
As is commonly acknowledge that the earth is polluted and becomes not good enough for us to live.And this change will make the earth become what it ever was not any longer.Now,here the"Low-carbon Life"comes and it can help us to handle this worldwide problem!It provides us with a healthy life-style,which can drive us to live in a healthy life.It is both good for our society developing and citisions health.First,it can make the air cleaner which is good for our health.Second,it can decrease the outlay in our daily life.Third,it can  keep an environmental thought in our minds.
If everyone keep a low carbon life style,our world will be more wonderful!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 11f4084b-e5c0-3ad2-9cd2-2aef9868fa27> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
As the enviromence gets worse and worse today,more and more people pay their attention on the low-carbon life.Most of them are trying their best to live a low-carbon life.
It's really important for our earth to have a low-carbon life.What we can see is that the enviromence is getting worse.Forsts disappearance frequently,rivers nither get dry nor become dirty,and the earth is wamer than ever before.Today,lots of city cannot see starts anymore,and no clear water for them to drink.If we still keep the life style liked before,the earth will not fit for human to live.
Low-carbon life is not a personnal thing.That is to say,everyone shuold try their best to have a low-carbon life.It's not a complicated work.Don't waste food,walk or take a bus instead of drive your own car,turn off the light if you don't use it...It's lots of things we can do in our daily life,without much energy.Further more,we can save a large of money in this way.
So don't try to abbondant your duty to protect our earth.We can find many things we can do to help the enviroment became better and better.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 23d55d1c-e133-362d-8b71-4ecd265ce13e> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Nowaday more and more people pay attention to Low-carbon Life.Look around,you may find some environmental behaviors.Many people refuse to use plastic bag when they go shopping:many people ride bicycle to work instead of taking bus.All what people do informs us that we are facing a strict environmental problem.
It's well known that our globe become warmer and warmer as the carbon gas are gathered in the atmosphere.If we continue to live such industry life  without any restriction,we will destoy our globe sooner or later.So it's important and necessary for us to live a Low-carbon life.
AS a student of environmental science,i am in duty bound to protect our environment.In future,i will refuse to waste energy:  cherish every drip,turn off the light when i don't need it and walk to school.l believe ,as long as every one of us has a strong sense of duty,we can make our giobe more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID 31e8149a-2d1b-3a2f-bca4-3995d1624470> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With the development of our society,more and more people pay higher attention to low-carbon life.Thus,a strong green storm is changing us that makes us care more about our environment now.
Low-carbon life attitude can play an important roles.First of all,since the global-warming makes the area of sea get broader,it's necessary to cut emission of carbon dioxide .Second,to achieve this goal ,we should save energy  such as turning off the light early at night.Only doing this can we make low-carbon life attitude take root in everyone's heart.Third,we can't be so selfish that waste resources which should be left to our children.
My dear friends,it's the exact time that we should make our efforts to protect our environment.Let's live a low-carbon life!

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID af22d208-4fae-3f2d-833b-9afb2b742dd9> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
Low-carbon life is becoming more and more popular around the world. Low-carbon life is good for everyone. To help with the environment, we should go to school or go to work by bike instead of taking a car. Besides, we'd better take a bag with us instead of using the plastic with us when we go shopping. We should reuse books, bottles, every piece of papeer and never forget to turn off the lights when we leave the rooms. We'd better not spend much money on expensive clothes and so on. We shoul try our best to do everything for low-carbon life in our life.Of course,I think it's our duty to live a low-carbon life. I belive if everyone lives a low-carbon life, our world will become more and more beautiful.

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID f0bc9fd3-a4d5-352a-bdf9-39a7004c8169> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
With more and more people knowing the importance of the nature
protecting, Low-carbon Life becomes a new and hot word of the
time. Rather than compare how much we have and consume, people would like to ask a question to others, “Have you got a Low-carbon Life today?"
People do pay more attentions on this project, one of the reason is
that people feel hotter than ever before. When we sometimes get the news that there is a new record of high temperature set, we always feel disappointed and pray for a soft summer day. Occasionally, some tragic
signs like the baby-killing of the polar bears really hit my mind. Try
to ask ourselves, who is guilty?
Keeping the greenhouse effect away is now a responsibility of human
beings, and living a Low-carbon Life may be the best way to do it.
Common sense tells us, carbon dioxide is the arch-criminal of greenhouse effect, and it's born form our daily expense of natural resources. For another, Low-carbon Life can also help us to keep ourselves healthy. With the pure and fresh air, everyone can feel at peace and relaxed.
Well, knowing the importance of Low-carbon Life, it's time to change our consciousness into action. To be honest, it's not a tough work at all. For adults, to choose bus or subway more rather than driving can be good. For we teenagers, why not keeping the disposable lunch box away to show your love to the nature? Low-carbon Life is beginning from the small surroundings.
Have you got a Low-carbon Life today?

<TITLE Low Carbon Life> <ESSAYID a80b7015-76a8-3853-9243-c86da13b6bcc> <SCHOOL GDUT> <SCORE ?>
nowaday,low-carbon life is more and more important that it attract many people focus on it.As the ripidly development of econmy,comes the  richer life but aslo the worse environment.For greatly change this awful situation,we should buid up a good quality life,then a low-carbon life is our alternatiev chioce.Living a low-carbon life,we will healthier for the fresher air purier water and other beneficial things.And also we will lead a delightful life.It can be easily born the same feeling that how i can be unhappy when i live in a relaxing lifestyle without bothering noise and odorous smell. it apearantly great thing for us,so we occur to set up buiding a low-carbon life.First,we should decrease the use of carbon ,this should be greatly supported by the government,such measures like buiding up more bus line is neccessary.And the second,it vital but easy for us to do beginning at the small thing and from our daily,and more efficent to  poccess a sincere attitude doing this.decreasing the use of the paper is very easy for us.Just do it,and live a low-carbon life.   28



